00 a: 

OU 166558 >m 



co 



OSMANIA UNIVERSITY LIBRARY 

Call No. !7t /D 51 $ Accession No. 4 

/ ^4 i ^ 
Author 



Tide 

trf C^u^. / ? 97. 

This oook should be returned on or before the date 
last marked below. 



For ive are not children of the bond-woman, but of 
the free. 

R pur sc tnuove. 



OUTLINES 



CRITICAL THEORY OF ETHICS 



BY 

JOHN DEWEY 

Professor of Philosophy in the University of Michigan 



HILLARY HOUSE 
New York 1957 



This is an exact reprint 
of the scarce 1891 edition. 

This edition 
Limited to 500 Copies 

Reissued 1957 
by Hillary House, Inc. 



Noble Offset Printers, Inc 
New York 3, N. Y. 



CONTENTS. 



INTRODUCTION 1-12 

PABT L FUNDAMENTAL ETHICAL NO- 
TIONS. 

CHAPTER I. The Good 13-138 

Hedonism 14 

Utilitarianism 62 

Evolutionary Utilitarianism 67 

Kantianism 78 

Problem and Solution 95 

Realization of Individuality 97 

Ethical Postulate 127 

CHAPTER II. The Idea of Obligation 139-158 

Bain's Theory 140 

Spencer's Theory 142 

Kant's Theory 147 

Its Real Nature 152 

CHAPTER III. The Idea of Freedom 158-166 

Negative Freedom 158 

Potential Freedom 159 

Positive Freedom 164 

PART EL THE ETHICAL WORLD. 

Social Relations 167 

Moral Institutions 169 



PART HE. THE MORAL LIFE OF THE 
INDIVIDUAL. 

Division of Subject 181 

CHAPTER I. The Formation and Growth of 

Ideals 182-211 

Conscience 182 

Conscientiousness 199 

Development of Ideals 206 

CHAPTER II. The Moral Struggle or the Real- 
izing of Ideals 211-227 
Goodness as Struggle 211 
Badness 214 
Goodness and Badness 221 

CHAPTER HI. Realized Morality or the Vir- 
tues 227-233 
Cardinal Virtues 231 

CONCLUSION 233-238 



PREFACE. 



ALTHOUGH the following pages have taken shape 
in connection with class-room work, they are in- 
tended as an independent contribution to ethical 
science. It is commonly demanded of such a work 
that its readers shall have some prefatory hint of 
its sources and deviations. In accordance with 
this custom, I may state that for the backbone of 
the theory here presented the coaception of the 
will as the expression of ideas, and of social ideas; 
the notion of an objective ethical world realized in 1 
institutions which afford moral ideals, theatre and 
impetus to the individual; the notion of the moral 
life as growth in freedom, as the individual finds 
and conforms to the law of his social placing for 
this backbone I am especially indebted to Green's 
* Prolegomena to Ethics ', to Mr. Bradley's ' EthicaJ 
Studies ', to Professor Caird's * Social Philosophy of 
Comte ' and ' Critical Philosophy of Kant ' (to this 
latter book in particular my indebtedness is funda- 
mental), and to Alexander's ' Moral Order and Pro- 
gress '. Although I have not been able to adopt 
the stand-point or the method of Mr. Spencer, or of 
Mr. Leslie Stephen my obligation to the ' Data of 
Ethics ' and to the ' Science of Ethics ' (especially 
to the latter) is large. 

As to the specific forms which give a flesh and 
blood of its own to this backbone, I may call atten- 



Vlll 

tion to the idea of desire as the ideal activity in con- 
trast with actual possession; to the analysis of indi- 
viduality into function including capacity and envi- 
ronment ; to the treatment of the social bearings of 
science and art (a point concerning which I am 
indebted to my friend, Mr. Franklin Ford) ; to the 
statement of an ethical postulate; to the accounts 
of obligation, of moral rules, and of moral badness. 

While the book is an analysis, in outline, of the 
main elements of the theory of ethics rather than 
a discussion of all possible detailed questions, it 
will not be found the less fitted, I hope, to give a 
student an idea of the main methods and problems 
of contemporary ethics. Other teachers, indeed, 
may agree that a general outline is better than a 
blanket- mortgage spread over and forestalling all 
the activity of the student's mind. 

I have not been unmindful of the advisability 
of avoiding in presentation both undue polemic, 
and undue dogmatism without sufficient reference 
to the statements of others. I hope the method 
hit upon, of comparing opposite one sided views 
with the aim of discovering a theory apparently 
more adequate, will help keep the balance. I have 
quoted freely from the chief modern authorities, 
hoping that the tastes here given will tempt the 
reader to the banquet waiting in the authors 
themselves. The occasional references introduced 
are not bibliographical, nor intended as exhaustive 
statements of authorities consulted; they are meant 
as aids to an intelligent reading on the part of the 
general student. For this reason they are confined 
mainly to modern English writings. 



INTRODUCTION. 



i. 

Definition The term ethics is derived from a 
of Greek word meaning manners, cus- 

Ethics. toms, habits, just as the term morals 
is derived from a Latin word with a similar mean- 
ing. This suggests the character of the science as 
en account of human action. Anthropology, eth- 
nology, psychology, are also, in their way, accounts 
of human action. But these latter branches of 
knowledge simply describe, while the business of 
ethics is to judge. 

This does not mean that it belongs to ethics to 
prescribe what man ought to do ; but that its busi- 
ness is to detect the element of obligation in con- 
duct, to examine conduct to see what gives it its 
worth. Anthropology, etc., do not take into account 
the whole of action, but simply some of its 
aspects either external or internal. Ethics deals 
with conduct in its entirety, with reference, that is, 
to what makes it conduct, its end, its real meaning. 
Ethics is the science of conduct, understanding by 
conduct man's activity in its whole reach. 

Three of the branches of philosophy may be called 
normative , implying that they deal with some norm, 



standard or end, estimating the value of their respect- 
ive' sub ject-matters as tested by this end These are 
Logic, dealing with the end Truth, and the value of 
intellectual processes with respect to it; Esthetics, 
dealing with Beauty and the value of emotional con- 
ditions as referred to it; and Ethics, as defined above. 
But this norm in no case comes from outside the sub- 
ject-matter; it is the subject-matter considered in its 
totality. 

II. 

Meaning In its widest sense, the term moral or 
of ethical means nothing more than relating 
Moral, to conduct; having to do with practice, 
when we look at conduct or practice from the 
point of view not of its occurrence, but of its value. 
Action is something which takes place, and as such 
it may be described like any objective fact. But 
action has also relation to an end, and so considered 
it is moral. The first step in ethics is to fix firmly 
in mind the idea that the term moral does not mean 
any special or peculiar kind of conduct, but simply 
means practice and action, conduct viewed not 
partially, but in connection with the end which it 
realizes. 

It ^should be noted that the term moral has a wider 
and a narrower sense, in the wider sense it means 
action in the moral sphere, as opposed to non-moral, 
and thus includes both good and bad conduct. In the 
narrower sense it means moral, as opposed to im- 
moral. See Bradley, Ethical Studies, p. .53, note, for a 
further meaning. 



111. 

Meaning Ethics then has to do with conduct or 
of action viewed completely, or in relation 
Conduct, to its end. But what is conduct? It 
must be distinguished from action in general; for 
any process of change, the working of a pump, the 
growth of a plant, the barking of a dog, may be 
called action. Conduct implies more than some- 
thing taking place; it implies purpose, motive, 
intention; that the agent knows what he is about, 
that he has something which he is aiming at. All 
action accomplishes something or brings about 
results, but conduct has the result in view. It 
occurs for the sake of producing this result. Con- 
duct does not simply, like action in general, have a 
cause, but also a reason, and the reason is present 
to the mind of the agent. There can be conduct 
only when there is a being who can propose to him- 
self, as an end to be reached by himself, something 
which he regards as worth while. Such a being is 
a moral agent, and his action, when conscious, is 
conduct. 

IV. 

Division The main ethical problem is just this: 
of What is the conduct that really deserves 

Ethics, the name of conduct, the conduct of 
which all other kinds of action can be on]y a per- 
verted or deflected form ? Or, since it is the end 



which gives action its moral value, what is the true 
end, summurn bonum of man ? Knowing this, we 
have a standard by which we judge particular 
acts. Those which embody this end are right, 
others wrong. The question of the Tightness of 
conduct is simply a special form of the question 
concerning the nature of the end or good. But the 
end bears another relation to specific acts. They 
are not only marked off by it as right or wrong, but 
they have to fulfill it. The end or good decides 
what should be or ought to be. Any act necessary 
to fulfill the end is a duty. Our second inquiry 
will be as to the nature of obligation or duty. 
Then we have to discuss the nature of a being who 
is capable of action, of manifesting and realizing the 
end ; capable of right (or wrong ) of obligatory and 
good action. This will lead us to discuss the question 
of Freedom, or Moral Capacity and its Realization. 
The discussion of these three abstract questions 
will constitute Part I of our theory ; Part II 
will take up the various forms and institutions 
in which the good is objectively realized, the fam- 
ily, state, etc. ; while Part III wil] be devoted to an 
account, of the moral experience of the individual. 

V. 

The Motive Before taking up the first problem 

in presented, the nature of the good or 

Conduct, the end of conduct, it is necessary to 



analyze somewhat farther the various sides and 
factors of conduct in order to see where the dis- 
tinctly ethical element is to be found. The ele- 
ments particularly deserving consideration are (1) 
the Motive; (2) the Feelings or , Sentiments; (3) 
Consequences of the Act; (4) Character of Agent. 
We shall begin with 

1. The Motive. The motive of the act is the 
end aimed at by the agent in performing the act. 
Thus the motive of Julius Caesar in crossing the 
Rubicon was the whole series of results which he 
intended to reach by that act of his. The motive 
of a person in coming to college is to gain knowl- 
edge, to prepare himself for a certain profession. 
The motive is thus identical with the ideal element 
of the action, the purpose in view. 

2. The Feelings or Disposition. Some writers 
speak of the feelings under which the agent acts 
as his motive. Thus we may suppose Julius Caesar 
' moved ' by the feelings of ambition, of revenge, 
etc., in crossing the Rubicon. The student may be 
' moved ' by curiosity, by vainglory, by emulation, 
by conscience, in coming to college. It is better, 
however, to regard the motive as the reason for 
which the act is performed, and to use the term 
moving or impelling cause for the feelings in their 
relation to action. Thus we may imagine a parent 
asking a child why he struck a playmate, meaning 



6 

-what was the motive of the action. If the child 
should reply that he struck his playmate because 
he was angry, this answer would give the moving 
cause or impelling force of the action, but not its 
motive. The motive would be the idea of punish- 
ing this playmate, of getting even with him, of 
taking something away from him. The motive is 
the end which he desired to reach by striking and 
on account of which he struck. This is implied by 
the fact that the parent would ask, " What made you 
angry*" 

VI. 

Moral Bearing It is the feelings which supply 

of These the impelling force to action. 

Distinctions. They may be termed, collectively, 

the natural disposition. The natural disposition 

in itself has no moral value. This has been well 

illustrated by Bentham. 

Principles of Morals and Legislation, pp. 49-55. 
Bentham here uses the term * motive' to designate 
what we have called the moving cause. 

We may select of the many examples which he 
gives that of curiosity. We may imagine a boy 
spinning a top, reading a useful book and letting 
a wild ox loose in a road. Now curiosity may be 
the * motive ' of each of these acts, yet the first act 
would generally be called morally indifferent, 'the 
second good, the third abominable. 



What we mean by the ' natural ' feelings, then, 
is the feelings considered in abstraction from 
activity. Benevolence, as a mere feeling, has no 
higher moral value than malevolence. But if it is 
directed upon action it gets a value at once; let the 
end, the act, be right, and benevolence becomes a 
name for a moral disposition a tendency to act in 
the due way. Nothing is more important than to 
distinguish between mere sentiments, and feeling 
as an element in conduct. 

VII. 

Relation Do the consequences of an act 

of have anything to do with its mo- 

Consequences rality? We may say no, pointing 

and to the fact that a man who does his 

Conduct. best we call good, although the 
consequences of his act may be far from good. 
We say his purpose in acting was right, and using 
as he did all the knowledge that he had, hie is not 
to be blamed for its bad consequences. On the 
other hand, it is evident that we do take into ac- 
count consequences in estimating the moral value 
of an act. Suppose, to use one of Bentham's exam- 
ples, a person were about to shoot an animal but 
foresaw that in doing so there was a strong proba- 
bility that he would also wound some bystander. 
If he shot and the spectator were wounded, should 
we not hold the agent morally responsible? Are 



8 

there not multitudes of intended acts of which we 
say that we cannot tell whether they are good or 
bad until we know how they are likely to turn 
out? 

The solution of the difficulty is in recognizing 
the ambiguity of the term * consequences '. It may 
mean the whole outcome of the act. When I speak, 
I set in motion the air, and its vibrations have, in 
turn, long chains of effects. Whatever I do must 
have an endless succession of 'consequences' of 
which I can know but very little; just so far as, in 
any act, I am ignorant of the conditions under 
which it is performed, so far I am ignorant 
of its consequences. Stick consequences are 
wholly irrelevant morally. They have no more to do 
with the morality of the act than has the fact that 
the earth is revolving while the act is taking 
place. 

But we may mean by consequences the foreseen 
consequences of an act. Just in the degree 
that any consequence is considered likely to result 
from an act, just in that degree it gets moral value, 
for it becomes part of the act itself. The reason 
that in^many cases we cannot judge of the morality 
of an intended act until we can judge its probable 
results, is that until we know of these results the 
action is a mere abstraction, having no content at 
all. The conceived results constitute the content of 



9 



the act to be performed. They are not merely rele- 
vant to its morality, but are its moral quality. The 
question is whether any consequence is foreseen, 
conceived, or not. The foreseen, the ideal conse- 
quences are the end of the act, and as such form 
the motive. 

See on Sections 6 and 7, Alexander, Moral Order and 
Progress, pp. 36-46; on Section 7, Green, Prolegomena 
to Ethics, pp. 317-323. 

VIII. 

Character We have seen that the moral senti- 
and ments, or the moral disposition (dis- 
Conduct, tinguished from the feelings as passing 
emotions), on one side, and the consequences as 
ideal or conceived (distinguished from the con- 
sequences that, de facto, result), on the other, both 
have moral value. If we take the moral feelings, 
not one by one, but as a whole, as an attitude of 
the agent toward conduct, as expressing the kind of 
motives which upon the whole moves him to action, 
we have character. And just so, if we take the 
consequences willed, not one by one, but as a 
whole, as the kind of end which the agent endeav- 
ors to realize, we have conduct. Character and 
conduct are, morally, the same thing, looked at first 
inwardly and then outwardly. Character, except 
as manifest in conduct, is a barren ideality. Our 
moral judgments are always severe upon a man 



10 



who has nothing to show but ' good intentions ' never 
executed. This is what character comes to, apart 
from conduct. Our only way of telling the nature 
of character is the conduct that issues from it. 
But, on the other hand, conduct is mere outward 
formalism, excepting as it manifests character. To 
say that a man's conduct is good, unless it is the 
manifestation of a good character, is to pass a 
judgment which is self -contradictory. 

See Alexander Op. cit., pp. 48-50 and p. 39. 

From this point of view we are enabled to 
identify the two senses of motive already discussed 
the ideal of action and the moving feelings. 
Apart from each other they are abstractions. 
Caesar's motive in crossing the Rubicon may have 
been ' ambition,' but this was not some bare feeling. 
It was a feeling of ambition produced in view of 
the contemplation of a certain end which he wished 
to reach. So a boy's motive in striking a playmate 
may be anger, but this means (if the act is any- 
thing more than one of blind physical reaction) an 
anger having its conscious cause and aim, and not 
some abstract feeling of anger in general. The 
feeling, which has its nature made what it is by the 
conceived end, and the end which has ceased to be 
a bare abstract conception and become an interest, 
are all one with each other. 

Morality is then a matter pertaining to charac- 



11 

ter to the feelings and inclinations as transformed 
by ends of action; and to conduct to conceived 
ends transformed into act under the influence of 
emotions. But what kind of character, of conduct, 
is right or realizes its true end ? This brings us to 
our first problem. 



PART I. 

FUNDAMENTAL ETHICAL NOTIONS. 



CHAPTER I. THE GOOD. 



IX. 

Subdivision We may recognize three main 
of types of theories regarding the good, 

Theories, of which the first two represent (we 
shall attempt to show) each respectively one side of 
the truth, while the third combines the one-sided 
truths of the other two. Of the first two theories 
one is abstract, because it tends to find the good in 
the mere consequences of conduct aside from 
character. This is the hedonistic theory, which 
finds the good to be pleasure. This is either indi- 
vidualistic or universalistic according as it takes 
individual or general pleasure to be the good. The 
second type of theories attempts to find the good 
in the motive of conduct apart from consequences 
even as willed; it reduces the good to conformity 
to abstract moral law. The best type of this 



14 

theory is the Kantian. We shall criticize these 
theories with a view to developing the factors 
necessary to a true moral theory. 

X. 

Hedonism. According to the strict hedonistic 
position, the pleasure resulting to the agent from 
his act is the end of conduct and is therefore the 
criterion of its morality. The position as usually 
taken involves, first, that pleasure is psychologically 
the sole motive to action; and, secondly, that the 
results of an act in the way of the pain or pleasure it 
produces are the only tests we have of the Tightness 
of the act. 

It is said above that these two points are involved 
in the hedonistic position as usually taken. They are 
not necessarily involved. 

Sidgwick (Methods of Ethics, Bk. I, ch. IV and 
Bk. IV, ch. I) holds that pleasure is not the object 
of desire or motive of action, but that happiness is 
the moral end and criterion. On the other hand 
Hodgson (Theory of Practice, Vol. II, ch. 11) holds 
that pleasure may be the motive (in the sense of im- 
pelling force) but it is never the criterion of conduct. 
Kant adopts the psychology of hedonism regarding 
pleasure as the object of desire, but holds that on that 
very account no object of desire can be the standard 
of moral conduct. 

A good statement of strict individualistic hedon- 
ism is the following from Barratt, Physical Ethics, 
page 71: "If man aims at pleasure merely by the 
physical law of action, that pleasure must evidently be 
ultimately his own, and whether it be or not preceded 



15 

by phenomena which he calls the pain and pleasure of 
others, is a question not of principle but of detail, just 
as the force of a pound weight is unaltered whether it 
be composed of lead or of feathers, or whether it act 
directly or through pulleys." 

XI. 

The Hedonistic Hedonism holds that pleasure 
Position is both the natural end and the 
Supported. proper criterion of action: 
The following quotation from Bentham (Princi- 
ples of Morals and Legislation, Works, Vol. 1, p. 1) 
gives a statement of both these elements. " Nature 
has placed man under the governance of two sovereign 
masters, pain and pleasure. It is for them alone to 
point out what we ought to do, [i. e. they are criteria] 
as well as to determine what we shall do [motives). On 
the one hand, the standard of right or wrong [crite- 
rion |; on the other the chain of causes and effects 
[motives], are fastened to their throne." 

1. Pleafiiw as Criterion. That the tendency 
of an action to produce pleasure is the standard 
for judging its moral value is generally held by the 
hedonists to be so axiomatic as to be beyond 
argument. 

See Bain, Moral Science, p. 27. " The ultimate data 
must be accepted as self-evident: they have no higher 
authority than that mankind generally are disposed to 
accept them. . . Now there can be no proof offered 
for the position that happiness is the proper end of all 
human pursuits, the criterion of all right conduct. It 
is an ultimate or final assumption to be tested by 
reference to the individual judgment of mankind." 
80 Bentham, Enquiry 1,11, "The principle is not 



16 

susceptible of direct proofs for that which is used to 
prove everything else can not itself be proved; a chain 
of proofs must have their commencement some- 
where/' Mill, Utilitarianism. (Dissertations and 
Discussions, pp. 348-349). " The only proof capable of 
being given that an object is visible is that people 
actually see it. In like manner the sole evidence it is 
possible to produce that anything is desirable is that 
people do actually desire it." See Stephen, Science 
of Ethics, p. 42; Spencer, Data of Ethics, pp. 30-32 
and p. 4G; Lotze, Practical Philosophy, pp. 18-19; 
Sidgwick, Methods of Ethics, pp. 368-369. 

Hedonism, then, represents the good or the 
desirable and pleasure to be two names for the 
same fact. What indeed can be worth while unless 
it be either enjoyable in itself or at least a means 
to enjoyment ? Would theft be considered bad if it 
resulted in pleasure or truth itself good if its 
universal effect were pain ? 

2. Pleasure as objed of. desire. It is also 
urged that psychological analysis shows that pleas- 
ure is not only the desirable, but also always the 
desired. Desire for an object is only a short way 
of saying desire for the pleasure which that object 
may bring. To want food is to want the pleas- 
ure it brings; to want scientific ability is to desire 
to find satisfaction, or attain happiness. Thus it 
is laid down as a general principle that the inva- 
riable object of desire, and motive of action is some 
pleasure to be attained; the action itself and the 
direct end of action being simply means to pleasure. 



17 

For a strong statement of this doctrine see Mill, 
Op. cit., pp. 354-5. " Desiring a thing and finding it 
pleasant, aversion to it and thinking of it as painful, 
are phenomena entirely inseparable, or rather two 
parts of the same phenomenon, in strictness of lan- 
guage, two different modes of naming the same psy- 
chological fact; to think of an' object as desirable and 
to think of it as pleasant are one and the same thing. 
See also, Bain, Emotions and Will, p. 436, Senses and 
Intellect, pp. 338-344; Sully, Outlines of Psychology, p. 
575, " The inclination or tendency of the active mind 
towards what is pleasurable and away from what is 
painful is the essential fact in willing." Also pp. 576- 
577. 

XII. Criticism. 

Pleasure Not Taking up the points in reverse 

the End order, we shall endeavor to show 

of Impulse, first, that the motive of action, in 

the sense of end aimed at, is not pleasure. This 

point in itself, is, of course, rather psychological 

than ethical. Taking up then the psychology of 

pleasure in its connection with will, we shall 

discuss its relation to impulse, to desire and to 

motive. 

It is generally agreed that the raw material of 
volition is found in some form or other of the im- 
pulsive or instinctive actions. Such tendencies 
(e. g., the impulse for food, for drink, for unim- 
peded motion) clearly precede the reaching of an 
end, and hence the experience of any pleasure in 
the end. Our first actions, at least, are not for 



18 

pleasure; on the contrary, there is an activity for 
Borne independent end, and this end being reached 
there is pleasure in an act which has succeeded. 
This suggests as a possible principle that pleasure 
is not so much the end of action, as an element in 
the activity which reaches an end. What Aristotle 
says of another matter is certainly true of instinct- 
ive action. "It is not true of every characteristic 
function that its action is attended with pleasure, 
except indeed the pleasure of attaining its end" 

See Martineau, Types of Ethical Theory, Vol. II, 
pp. 299-300; JSidgwick, Op. cit., pp. 38-45. 

XIII. Criticism Continued. 
Pleasure Not It may, however, be said that, 

the End while our instinctive actions have 
of Desire, another end than pleasure, this is 
not true of conscious desires that, indeed, just the 
difference between instinct and desire is that the 
former goes blindly to its end, while the latter 
superimposes the thought of the pleasure to be 
reached upon the mere instinct. So we have to 
analyze the nature of desire. 

A child, led by impulse, has put a piece of sugar 
into his mouth, just as, under the same circum- 
stances, he would put a piece of stone into his 
mouth. But his action results in a state of pleas- 
ure wholly unforseen by him. Now the next time 
the child sees the sugar he will not merely have 



19 

the impulse to put it in his mouth. There will 
also be the remembrance of the pleasure enjoyed 
from sugar previously. There is consciousness of 
sugar as satisfying impulse and hence desire for it. 
1. This is a description of an instance of desire. 
Does it bear us out in the doctrine that pleasure is 
the object of desire? It is possible that, in an irra- 
tional animal, the experience of eating food rein- 
forces the original instinct for it with associated 
images of pleasure. But even this is very different 
from a desire for pleasure. It is simply the pri- 
mordial instinct intensified and rendered more 
acute by new sensational factors joined to it. In 
the strict sense, there is still no desire, but only 
stronger impulse. Wherever there is desire there 
is not only a feeling of pleasure associated with 
other feelings (e. (/., those of hunger, thirst), but 
there is the consciousness of an object in which 
satisfaction is found. TUB error of the hedonistic 
psychology is in omitting one's consciousness of an 
object which satisfies. The hedonists are quite 
right in holding that the end of desire is not any 
object external to consciousness, but a condition 
of consciousness itself. The error begins in elim- 
inating all objective (that is, active) elements from 
consciousness, and declaring it to be a mere state 
of feeling or sensation. The practical conscious- 
ness, or will, cannot be reduced to mere feeling, 



20 

any more than the theoretical consciousness, or 
knowledge, can be so reduced. 

Even Mill, in its statement of the hedonistic 
psychology, does not succeed in making the object 
of desire mere pleasure as a state of feeling. It 
is the u pleasant thing'' and not pleasure alone 
which ho finds equivalent to the desire. It is 
true enough that sugar as an external fact does not 
awaken desire, but it is equally true that a child does 
not want a passive pleasure. What he wants is his 
own activity in which he makes the sugar his own. 
And it should be remembered that the case of sugar 
is at once a trivial and an exceptional one. Not 
evon children want simply sweat-meats; and the 
larger the character which finds expression in wants, 
the more does the direct object of want, the bread, 
the meat, become a mere element in a larger system 
of activity. What a man wants is to live, and he 
wants sweet meats, amusements, etc., just as he 
wants substantial on account of their value in 
life. 

Professor James compares the idea that pleasure is 
the end of desire to saying that " because no steamer 
can go to se i without incidentally consuming coal, 
. . . therefore no steamer can go to sea for any other 
motive than that of coal-consumption." Psychology, 
Vol. II, p. 558. See the entire passage, pp. 549-559. 

2. But granting that an ' object ' and a ' pleas- 
ure ' are both necessary to desire, it may be argued 



21 

that the ' object ' is ultimately a means to ' pleas- 
ure.' This expressly raises a question already inci- 
dentally touched upon: What is the controlling 
element in desire ? Why is the object thought of 
as pleasant ? Simply because it is thought of as 
satisfying want. The hedonists, says Green (Pro- 
legomena to Ethics, p. 168), make the " mistake of 
supposing that a desire can be excited by the antic- 
ipation of its own satisfaction." This is to say, of 
course, that it exists before it exists, and thus 
brings itself into being. 

Green, Op. cit., p. 167, states the matter thus: 
" Ordinary motives are interests in the attainment of 
objects, without which it sepms to the man thmt he 
cannot satisfy himself, and in the attainment of 
which, because he has desired tJiem, he will find a cer- 
tain pleasure, but only because he has previously de- 
sired them, not because pleasures are the objects 
desired." P.radley says on this same point (Ethical 
Studies, p. 230): " The difference is between my find- 
ing my pleasure in an end, and my finding means for 
the end of my pleasure, find the difference is enor- 
mous." Consult the entire passage, pp. 226-235. See 
also Caird, Critical Philosophy of Kant, Vol. II, p. 229. 

It is the object, then, which controls, and the 
pleasure is on account of the attaining of the 
desired object. But even this statement makes 
more division in desire than actually exists; for 

3. The real object of desire is activity itself. 
The will takes its rise, as we have seen, in impulse; 
in the reaching for something to satisfy some felt 



22 

lack. Now, in reality, desire adds nothing to 
impulse excepting consciousness of the impulse. 
Volitional action does not differ from impulsive or 
instinctive, except in bringing to consciousness the 
nature of the want and of the activity necessary to 
satisfy it. But this makes just the difference 
between * natural ' or animal activity, and ' moral ' 
or human activity. To be conscious of the impulse 
is to elevate it from a blind impelling force to an 
intended or proposed end; and thus, by bringing it 
before consciousness, both to extend its range and 
to idealize it, spiritualize it. To be conscious of an 
impulse for food means to give up the unreasoned 
and momentary seizing of it; to consider the rela- 
tion of things to this want, what will satisfy it best, 
most easily, etc. The object of desire is not some- 
thing outside the action; it is an element in the 
enlarged action. And as we become more and 
more conscious of impulse for food, we analyze our 
action into more and more i objects ' of desire, but 
these objects never become anything apart from the 
action itself. They are simply its analyzed and 
denned content. Man wants activity still, but he 
knows bstter what activity means and includes. 

Thus, when we learn what the activity means, it 
changes its character. To the animal the activity 
wanted is simply that of eating the food, of 
realizing the momentary impulse. To man the 



23 

activity becomes enlarged to include the satisfaction 
of a whole life, and not of one life singly, but of 
the family, etc., connected with the single life. 
The material well-being of the family becomes 
one of the objects of desire into which the original 
impulse has grown. But we misinterpret, when 
we conceive of this well-being as an external object 
lying outside the action. It means simply one 
aspect of the fuller action. By like growing con- 
sciousness of the meaning of the impulse, produc- 
tion and exchange of commodities are organized. 
The impulse for food is extended to include a 
whole range of commercial activities. 

It is evident that this growing consciousness of 
the nature of an impulse, whereby we resolve it into 
manifold and comprehensive activities, also takes 
the impulse out of its isolation and brings it into 
connection with other impulses. We come to have 
not a series of disconnected impulses, but one all- 
inclusive activity in which various subordinate ac- 
tivities (or conscious impulses) are included. Thus, 
in the previous example, the impulse for food is 
united with the family impulse, and with the 
impulse for communication and intercourse with 
society generally. It is this growing unity with 
the- whole range of man's action that is the 
* spiritualizing ' of the impulse the natural 
and brutal impulse being just that which insists 



24 

upon itself irrespective of all other wants. The 
spiritualizing of the impulse is organizing it so 
that it becoms one factor in action. Thus we lit- 
erally come to ' eat to live ', meaning by life not 
mere physical existence, but the whole possible 
sphere of active human relations. 

4. Relation of activity to pleasure. We have 
seen that the ' object ' of desire in itself is a mere 
abstraction; that the real object is full activity itself. 
We are always after larger scope of movement, 
fuller income in order to get larger outgo. The 
* thing ' is always for the sake of doing; is a part of 
the doing. The idea that anything less or other 
than life (movement, action, and doing), can satisfy 
man is as ridiculous when compared with the act- 
ual course of things in history, as it is false psy- 
chologically. Freedom is what we want, and free- 
dom means full unimpeded play of interests, that 
is, of conscious impulses (see Sec. 34 and 51). If 
the object is a mere abstraction apart from activity, 
much more is pleasure. Mere pleasure as an 
object is simply the extreme of passivity, of mere 
having, as against action or doing. It is possible to 
make pleasure to some degree the object of desire; 
this is just what the voluptuary does. But it is a 
commonplace that the voluptuary always defeats 
himself. He never gets satisfaction who identifies 
satisfaction with having pleasures. The reason is 



25 

evident enough. Activity is what we want, and since 
pleasure comes from getting what we want, pleasure 
comes only with activity. To give up the activity, 
and attempt to get the pleasure is a contradiction in 
effect. Hence also the ' hedonistic paradox ' that 
in order to get pleasure we must aim at something 
else. 

There is an interesting recognition of this in Mill 
himself, (see his Autobiography, p. 142). And in his 
Utilitarianism, in discussing the feasibility of getting 
happiness, he shows (pp. 318-319) that the sources of 
happiness are an intelligent interest in surrounding 
things objects of nature, achievements of art, inci- 
dents of history and especially an unselfish devotion 
to others. Which is to say that man does not find sat- 
isfaction in pleasure as such at all, but only in ob- 
jective affairs that is, in complete interpretation, in 
activity with a wide and full content. Further con- 
sideration of the end of desire and its relation to 
pleasure may be found in Green, Op. cit., pp. 123-132; 
pp. 163-167. Bradley, Mind, Vol. XIII, p. 1, and 
Dewey, Psychology, pp. 360-365. 

XIV. Criticism Continued. 
Character It now being admitted that the end 
and of desire is activity itself in which the 
Pleasu re. ' object ' and ' pleasure ' are simply fac- 
tors, what is the moving spring to action ? What 
is it that arouses the mind to the larger activity? 
Most of the hedonists have confounded the two 
senses of motive already spoken of, and have held 
that because pleasure is the end of desire, therefore 



26 

it is the moving spring of conduct (or more often 
that because it is the moving spring of conduct 
it therefore is the end of desire). 

Mr. Stephen (Science of Ethics, pp. 46-58), 
although classing himself as a hedonist, has 
brought out this confusion very clearly. Ordinary 
hedonism confounds, as he shows, the judgment of 
what is pleasant the supposed end with the 
pleasant judgment the moving spring. (See also- 
Bradley, Op. cit., pp. 232-236). It maybe ad- 
mitted that it is feeling which moves to action, but 
it is the present feeling which moves. If the 
feeling aimed at moves, it is only as through 
anticipation it becomes the present feeling. Now 
is this present feeling which moves ( 1 ) mere pleas- 
ure and (2 ) mere feeling at all ? This introduces 
us to the question of the relation of pleasure (and 
of feeling in general) to character. 

1. If the existing state of consciousness that 
which moves were pure pleasure, why should 
there be any movement, any act at all ? The feel- 
ing which moves must be in so far complex: over 
against the pleasure felt in the anticipation of an 
end as-satisfying, there must be pain felt in the 
contrasting unsatisfactory present condition. There 
must be tension between the anticipated or ideal 
action, and the actual or present (relative) non- 
action. And it is this tension, in which pain is just 



27 

as normal an element as pleasure, which moves. 
Desire is just this tension of an action which satis- 
fies, and yet is only ideal, against an actual posses- 
sion which, in contrast with the ideal action, is felt 
as incomplete action, or lack, and hence as unsatis- 
factory. 

2. The question now comes as to the nature of 
this tension. We may call it i feeling,' if we will, 
and say that feeling is the sole motive power to 
action. But there is no such thing as feeling at 
large, and the important thing, morally, is what 
kind of feeling moves. To take a mere abstraction 
like 4 feeling ' for the source of action is, at root, 
the fallacy of hedonism. To raise the question, 
What is it that makes the feeling what it is, is to 
recognize that the feeling, taken concretely, is char- 
acter in a certain attitude. 

Stephen, who has insisted with great force that 
feeling is the sole * motive' to action, has yet shown 
with equal cogency the moral uselessness of such a 
doctrine, when feeling is left undefined (Op. cit., p. 44). 
"The love of happiness must express the sole possible 
motive of Judas Iscariot and his master; it must ex- 
plain the conduct of Stylites on his column, of Tiberius- 
at Caprese,of A Kempis in his cell, and of Nelson in the 
cockpit of the Victory. It must be equally good for 
saints, martyrs, heroes, cowards, debauchees, ascetics, 
mystics, cynics, misers, prodigals, men, women, and 
babes in arms." Surely, this is only to say, in effect, 
that Move of happiness ' is a pure bit of scholasticism, 
an undefined entity. 



28 

In a hedonistic argument ( by Stan ton Coit,Mind, 
Yol. XI, p. 849), the fallacy is seen in the following 
discussion. The story is told of Abraham Lincoln 
that he once passed an animal in distress by the 
side of the road, and that, after going by, he finally 
went back and got him out of the ditch. On being 
praised for his act, he replied that he did it on his 
own account, since he kept getting more uncomfort- 
able as he thought of t.he animal in distress. From 
this, it cannot be inferred that love of pleasure is at 
the basis of moral acts. The mere lumping off of 
feeling as the spring of conduct overlooks the only 
important thing morally the fact that Lincoln felt 
pain at the thought of the animal unrelieved, 
and pleasure at the idea of its relief, just be- 
cause he was a man of compassionate character. 
It was not the feeling, but the character revealed 
in, and creative of, the feeling that was the real 
source of the act. 

To connect this with our previous account of de- 
sire (p. 26 ): the important thing morally is that the 
nature of the tension between fact and idea the 
actual state and the ideal activity is an expression 
of character. What kind of activity does it take 
to satisfy a man? Does riding in a comfortable 
carriage, and following the course of his own re- 
flections exhaust his need of action ? or does his full 
activity require that note be taken of a suffering 



29 

animal? It is the kind of character one is (that is,, 
the kind of activity which satisfies and expresses 
one) which decides what pleasure shall be taken in 
an anticipated end, what feeling of lack or hin- 
drance (what pain) there shall be in the given state, 
and hence what the resulting tension, or desire, 
shall be. It is, therefore, character which moves to 
conduct. 

Mere wishing, the mere floating fancy of this or 
that thing as desirable, is not desire. To want is 
an active projection of character ; really and deeply 
to want is no surface and passing feeling; it is the 
stirring of character to its depths. There may be 
repressed activity; that is not, of itself, desire. 
There may be an image of larger activity; that is 
not, of itself, desire. But given the consciousness 
of a repressed activity in view of the perception of 
a possible larger action, and a man strives within 
himself to break his bonds and reach the new satis- 
faction. This striving within one's self, before the 
activity becomes overt, is the emotional antecedent 
of action. But this inward striving or tension, 
which CDnstitutes desire, is so far from being mere 
emotion that it is character itself character as it 
turns an inward or ideal advance into an outward, 
or "real progress, into action. 

We may fall back on Aristotle's statement (page 
38, of Peters' translation of his ethics): " The pleasure- 



30 

or pain that accompanies an act must be regarded as a 
test jot' character. He who abstains from the pleasures 
of the body and rejoices in his abstinence is temperate, 
while he who is vexed at having to abstain is still pro- 
fligate. As Plato tells us, man needs to be so trained 
from youth up as to take pleasure and pain in the right 
objects" 

XV. 

Summary. The truth in hedonism is its convic- 
tion that the good, the end of man, is not to be 
found in any outward object, -but only in what 
comes home to man in his own conscious experi- 
ence. The error is in reducing this experience to 
mere having, to bare feelings or affections, elimi- 
nating the element of doing. It is this doing 
which satisfies man, and it is this which involves as 
its content (as knowledge of impulse, instead of 
blind impulse) objective and permanent ends. 
When Mill speaks of the end of desire as a " satis- 
fied life," (p. 817 of Utilitarianism) be carries our 
assent ; but to reduce this satisfied life to feelings of 
pleasure, and absence of pains, is to destroy the 
life and hence the satisfaction. As Mill recognizes, 
a life bounded by the agent's own feelings would 
be, as of course, a life " centred in his own mis- 
erable individuality." (Mill, p. 319). Such words 
have meaning only because they suggest the con- 
trast with activity in which are comprehended, as 
* ends ' or ' objects ' (that is, as part of its defined 



31 

content) things art, science and industry and 
persons (see Sees. 34 and 35). 

Here too we must * back to Aristotle.' According 
to him the end of conduct is eudaimonia, success, wel- 
fare, satisfied life. But eudaimonia is found not in 
pleasure, but in the fulfillment of human powers and 
functions, in which fulfillment, since it is fulfillment^ 
pleasure is had. (Ethics, Bk. J, ch. 4-8). 

We now take up the question whether pleasure 
is a standard of right action, having finished the 
discussion concerning it as an end of desire. 

XVI. 

Pleasure The line of criticism on this point 
as the may be stated as follows: Pleasure 
Standard fails as a standard for the very reason 
of that it fails as a motive. Pleasure, 

Conduct, as conceived by the hedonist, is pas- 
sive, merely agreeable sensations, without any objec- 
tive and qualitative (active) character. This being 
so, there is no permanent, fixed basis to which we 
may refer acts and by which we may judge them. 
A standard implies a single comprehensive end 
which unifies all acts and through connection with 
which each gets its moral value fixed. Only action 
can be a standard for acts. To reduce all acts to 
means to getting a mere state of feeling is the inevi- 
table consequence of hedonism. So reducing them 
is to deprive them of any standard of value. 

An end to serve as standard must be (1) a com- 



32 

prehensive end for all the acts of an individual, and 
(2) an end comprehending the activities of various 
individuals a common good. 

1. The moral end must be that for the sake of 
which all conduct occurs the organizing principle 
of conduct a totality, a system. If pleasure is 
the end it is because each detail of conduct gets its 
placing, its moral value through relation to pleas- 
ure, through the contribution it makes to pleasure. 

2. The moral end must also include the ends of 
the various agents who make up society. It must 
be capable of constituting a social system out of 
the acts of various agents, as well as an individual 
system out of the various acts of one agent; or, 
more simply, the moral end must be not only the 
good for all the particular acts of an individual, 
but must be a common good a good which in satis- 
fying one, satisfies others. 

All ethical theories would claim that the end 
proposed by them served these two purposes. We, 
shall endeavor to show that the hedonistic theory, 
the doctrine that the pleasure is the good, is not 
capable of serving either of them. 

XVII. 
Pleasure 1. It does not unify character. In 

Not a the first place, the hedonistic theory 
Standard, makes an unreal and impossible sepa- 
ration between conduct and character. The psy- 



33 

chology of hedonism comes into conflict with its 
ethics. According to the former the motive of all 
action is to secure pleasure or avoid pain. So 
far as the motive is concerned, on this theory there 
can be no immoral action at all. That the agent 
should not be moved by pleasure, and by what, at 
the time of acting, is the greatest pleasure pos- 
sible, would be a psychological impossibility. 
Every motive would be good, or rather there would 
be no distinction of good or bad pertaining to the 
motive. The character of the agent, as measured 
by his motives, could never, under such circum- 
stances, have any moral quality. 

To the consequences of action, or the conduct 
proper, however, the terms good and bad might be 
applied. Although the agent is moved by pleasura- 
ble feelings, the result of his action may be painful 
and thus bad. In a word, on the hedonistic theory, 
it is only the external consequences of conduct, or 
conduct divorced from character, to which moral 
adjectives have any application. Such a separation 
not only contradicts our experience (see VIII), but 
inverts the true order of moral judgment. Con- 
sequences do not enter into the moral estimate at 
all, except so far as, being foreseen, they are the 
act in idea. That is, it is only as the consequences 
are taken up into the motive, and thus related to 

character, that they are subject to moral judgment.. 
3 



34 

Indeed, except BO far as action expresses character, 
it is not conduct, but mere physical sequence, as 
irrelevant to morality as the change in blood distri- 
bution, which also is the ' result ' of an action. 
Hedonism has to rule out at the start the only 
thing that gives totality to action the character of 
the agent, or conduct as the outcome of motives. 
Furthermore, the ordinary judgment of men, instead 
of saying that the sole moral motive is to get pleasure, 
would say that to deduce everything to means for 
getting pleasure is the very essence of immorality. 

On the point above, compare Bentham, Op. cit., I, 
p. 48. " A motive is substantially nothing more than 
pleasure or pain operating in a certain manner. Now 
pleasure is in itself a good: nay, even, setting aside 
immunity from pain, the only good; pain is in itself 
an evil, and, indeed, without exception, the only evil; 
or else the words good and evil have no meaning. And 
this is alike true of every sort of pain and of every 
sort of pleasure. It follows, therefore, immediately 
and incontestably, that there is no such thing as any 
sort of motive that is in itself a bad one. If motives 
are good or bad, it is only on account of their effects; 
good on account of their tendency to produce pleas- 
ure or avert pain; bad on account of their tendency to 
produce pain or avert pleasure Now the case is, that 
from one and the same motive, and from every kind 
of motive, may proceed actions that are good, others 
that are bad and others that are indifferent." Further, 
on p. 60, Bentham asks: "Is there nothing, then, 
about a man that can properly be termed good or bad, 
when on such or such an occasion he suffers himself 
to be governed by such or such a motive? Yes, cer- 



35 

tainly, his disposition. Now disposition is a kind of 
fictitious entity, feigned for the convenience of dis- 
course, in order to express what there is supposed to 
be permanent in a man's frame of mind. It is with 
disposition as with everything else; it will be good or 
bad according to its effects." The first quotation, it 
will be noticed, simply states that the motive is in 
itself always good, while conduct (i. e., consequences) 
may be good, bad or indifferent. The second quotation 
seems, however, to pass moral judgment upon charac- 
ter under the name of disposition. But disposition is 
judged according to the tendency of a person's actions. 
A good or bad disposition, here, can mean nothing 
intrinsic to the person, but only that the person has 
been observed to act in ways that usually produce pain 
or pleasure, as the case may be. The term is a 
'fiction', and is a backhanded way of expressing a 
somewhat habitual remit of a given person's conduct 
his motive remaining good (or for pleasure) all the 
time. The agent would never pronounce any such judg- 
ment upon his own disposition, unless as a sort of 
suprise that, his motive being 'good,' his actions turn 
out so ' bud ' all the time. At most, the judgment 
regarding disposition is a sort of label put upon a man 
by others, a label of "Look out for him, he is dan- 
gerous," or, " Behold, a helpful man." 

The moral standard of hedonism does not, then, 
bear any relation to the character of the> agent, does 
not enable us to judge it, either as a whole or in 
any specific manifestation. 

XVIII. 

It Does Not Give a Pleasure, as the end, 

Criterion for fails also to throw light 

Concrete Acts. on the moral value of 

any specific acts. Its failure in this respect is, 



36 

indeed, only the other side of that just spoken 
of. T^iere is no organizing principle, no ' univer- 
sal ' on the basis of which various acts fall into a 
system or order. The moral life is left a series of 
shreds and patches, where each act is torn off, as 
to its moral value, from every other. Each act is 
right or wrong, according as it gives pleasure or pain r 
and independently of any whole of life. There 
is, indeed, no whole of moral life at all, but only a 
series of isolated, disconnected acts. Possession, 
passivity, mere feeling, by its very nature cannot 
unite each feeling is itself and that is the end of 
it. It is action which reduces multiplicity to unity. 
We cannot say, in the hedonistic theory, that pleas- 
ure is the end, but pleasures. 

Each act stands by itself the only question is: 
What pleasure will it give? The settling of this 
question is the "hedonistic calculus." We must 
discover the intensity, duration, certainty, degree 
of nearness of the pleasure likely to arise from the 
given act, and also its purity, or likelihood of being 
accompanied by secondary pains and pleasures. 
Then we are to strike the balance between the 
respective"sums on the pleasure and pain sides, and, 
according as this balance is one of pleasure or pain, 
the act is good or evil. 

Bentham, Op. cit., p. 16, was the first to go into 
detail as to this method. He has also given certain 



37 

memoriter verses stating " the points on which the 

whole fabric of morals and legislation may be seen to 

rest. 

Intense, long, certain, speedy, fruitful, pure, 
Such marks in pleasures and in pains endure, 
Such pleasures seek, if private be thy end. 
If it be public, wide let them extend. 
Such pains avoid whichever be thy view, 
If pains must come, let them extend to few." 
This, however, in its reference to others, states the 

utilitarian as well as the hedonistic vi^w. 

Now, it must be remembered that, if pleasure 
is the end, there is no intrinsic connection between 
the motive of the act, and its result. It is not 
claimed that there is anything belonging intrins- 
ically to the motive of the act which makes it result 
in pleasure or pain. To make such a claim would 
be to declare the moral quality of the act the cri- 
terion of the pleasure, instead of pleasure the 
criterion of the act. The pleasures are external to 
the act; they are irrelevant and accidental to its 
quality. There is no ' universal,' no intrinsic bond 
of connection between the act and its consequences. 
The consequence is a mere particular state of feel- 
ing, which, in this instance, the act has happened 
to bring about. 

More concretely, this act of truth-telling has in 
this instance, brought about pleasure. Shall we 
call it right? Eight in this instance, of course; 
but is it right generally ? Is truth- telling, as such, 



38 

right, or is it merely that this instance of it hap- 
pens to be right? Evidently, on the hedonistic 
basis, we cannot get beyond the latter judgment. 
Prior to any act, there will be plenty of difficulties 
in telling whether it, as particular, is right or wrong. 
The consequences depend not merely on the result 
intended, but upon a multitude of circumstances 
outside of the foresight and control of the agent. 
And there can be only a precarious calculation of 
possibilities and probabilities a method which 
would always favor laxity of conduct in all but the 
the most conscientious of men, and which would 
throw the conscientious into uncertainty and per- 
plexity in the degree of their conscientiousness. 

" If once the pleas of instinct are to be abolished 
and replaced by a hedonistic arithmetic, the whole 
realm of animated nature has to be reckoned with in 
weaving the tissue of moral relations, and the problem 
becomes infinite and insoluble". Martineau, Op. cit., 
Vol. J I, p. 334. 

But waive this ; let the particular case be settled. 
There is still no law, no principle, indeed no presump- 
tion as to future conduct. The act is not right be- 
cause it is truth-telling, but because, in this instance, 
cicumstanees were such as to throw a balance of 
pleasure in its favor. This establishes no certainty, 
no probability as to its next outcome. The result 
then will depend wholly upon circumstances exist- 
ing then circumstances which have no intrinsic 



39 

relation to the act and which must change from 
time to time. 

The hedonist would escape this abolition of all 
principle, or even rule, by falling back upon a 
number of cases 'past experience' it is called. 
We have found in a number of cases that a certain 
procedure has resulted in pleasure, and this result 
is sufficient to guide us in a vast number of cases 
which come up. 

Says Mill (Op. cit., pp. 332-4): "During the whole 
past duration of the species, mankind have been learn- 
ing by experience the tendencies of actions, on which 
experience all the prudence as well as all the morality 

of life are dependent Mankind must by this 

time have acquired positive belief as to the effects of 
some actions on their happiness; and the beliefs which 
have thus come down are the rules of morality for the 
multitude, and for the philosopher, until he has suc- 
ceeded in finding better Nobody argues that 

the art of navigation is not founded on astronomy, 
because sailors cannot wait to calculate the 'Nautical 
Almanac '. Being rational creatures, they go to sea 
with it ready calculated; and all rational creatures go 
out upon the sea of life with their minds made up on 
the common questions of right and wrong, as well as 
on man v of the far more difficult questions of wis and 
foolish." 

That we do learn from experience the moral 
nature of actions is undoubted. The only ques- 
tion is: if hedonism, were true, could we so learn? 
Suppose that I were convinced that the results of 
murder in the past had been generally, or even 



40 



without exception (though this could not be proved), 
painful; as long as the act and the result in the 
way of feeling (pain or pleasure) are conceived as 
having no intrinsic connection, this would not prove 
that in the present instance murder will give a sur- 
plus of pain. I am not thinking of committing mur- 
der in general, but of murder under certain specific 
present circumstances. These circumstances may, 
and, to some extent, must vary from all previous in- 
stances of murder. How then can I reason from 
them to it? Or, rather, lot me use the previous 
cases as much as I may, the moral quality of the 
act I am now to perform must still be judged not 
from them, but from the circumstances of the pres- 
ent case. To judge otherwise, is, on hedonistic 
principles, to be careless, perhaps criminally care- 
less as to one's conduct. The more convinced a man 
is of the truth of hedonism and the more conscien- 
tious he is, the more he is bound not to be guided 
by previous circumstances, but to form his judg- 
ment anew concerning the new case. This result 
flows out of the very nature of the hedonistic ideal. 
Pleasure is not an activity, but simply a particular 
feeling, enduring only while it is felt. Moreover, 
there is in it no principle which connects it intrin- 
sically with any kind of action. To suppose then 
that, because ninety- nine cases of murder have re- 
sulted in pain, the hundredth will, is on a par with 



41 

reasoning that because ninety-nine days have been 
frosty, the hundredth will be. Each case, taken as 
particular, must be decided wholly by itself. There 
is no continuous moral life, and no system of con- 
duct. There is only a succession of unlike acts. 

Mill, in his examination of Whewell, (Diss. and Diss., 
Vol. Ill, pp. 158-59),tries to establish a general principle, 
if not a universal law, by arguing that, even in excep- 
tional cases, the agent is bound to respect the rule, 
because to act otherwise would weaken the rule, and 
thus l^ad to its being disregarded in other cases, in 
which its observance results in pleasure. There are, 
he says, persons so wicked that their removal from the 
earth would undoubtedly increase the sum total of 
happiness. But if persons were to violate the general 
rule in these cases, it would tend to destroy the rule. 
"If it were th'ought allowable for any one to put to 
death at pleasure any human being whom he believes 
that the world would be well rid of, nobody's life 
would be safe.'' That is to say, if every one were 
really to act upon and carry out the hedonistic princi- 
ple, no rule of life would exist. This does very well 
as a reductio ad absurdumof hedonism, or as an argu- 
ment against adopting hedonism, but it is difficult to 
see how Mill thought that it established a 'rule ' on a 
hedonistic basis. Mill's argument comes to saying 
that if hedonism were uniformly acted upon, it would 
defeat itself that is, pleasure would not result. There- 
fore, in order to get pleasure, we must not act upon the 
principle of hedonism at all, but follow a general rule. 
Otherwise put: hedonism gives no general rule, but 
we must have a general rule to make hedonism workf 
and therefore there is a general rule ! This begging of 
the question comes out even more plainly as Mill goes 



42 

on: * If one person may break through the rule on his 
own judgment, the same liberty cannot be refused to 
others; and, since no one could rely on the rule's 
being observed, the rule would cease to exist." All of 
this is obviously true, but it amounts to saying: " We 
must have a rule, and this we would not have if we 
carried out the hedonistic principle in each case; there- 
fore, we must not carry it out." A principle, that car- 
ried out destroys all rules which pretend to rest upon 
it, lays itself open to suspicion. Mill assumes the en- 
tire question in assuming that there is a rule. Grant 
this, and the necessity of not 'making exceptions/ 
that is, of not applying" the hedonistic standard to 
each case, on its own merits, follows. But the argu- 
ment which Mill needs to meet is that hedonism 
requires us to apply the standard to each case in itself, 
and that, therefore, there is no rule. Mill simply says 
assume the rule, and it follows, etc. 

See Bradley, Op. cit., pp. 96-101; Green, I3k. IV, Ch. 
3; Martineau, Vol. II, pp. 829-334. 

XIX. 

The Sum We have been dealing with hedon- 
and the ism in its strict form that which 
Quality makes a pleasure, considered as to 
of its intensity, certainty, etc., the end 

Pleasure of an act. Hedonism in this form 
as the fails to unify life, and fails, there- 
Stan dafcd. fore, to supply any standard. But 
the end of conduct is often stated to be the greatest 
possible sum of pleasures, thus introducing a cer- 
tain element of generality. Mill goes further and 
brings in the idea of quality of pleasure. 



43 

Regarding the sum of pleasures the following from 
Sidgwick (Op. cit. p. 382; see also p. 114) gives the 
hedonistic statement. "The assumption is involved 
that all pleasures are capable of being compared quali- 
tatively with one another and with all pains; that 
every feeling has a certain intensive quality, positive 
or negative (or perhaps zero) in respect to its desira- 
bleness arid that the quantity may be known, so that 
each may be weighed in ethical scales against any 
other. This assumption is involved in the very motion 
of maximum happiness," as the attempt to make " as 
great as possible a sum of elements not quantitatively 
commensurable would be a mathematical absurdity." 

I. Sum of pleasures as the moral end. This, 
first, taken as criterion, comes into conflict with the/ 
hedonistic psychology of pleasure as the motive of 
acts; and, secondly, it requires some objective 
standard by means of which pleasure is to be 
summed, and is, in so far, a surrender of the whole 
hedonistic position. 

1. If the object of desire is pleasure or a state 
of feeling which exists only as it is felt, it is im- 
possible that we should desire a greatest sum of 
pleasures. We can desire a pleasure and that only. 
It is not even possible that we should ever desire a 
continuous series of pleasures. We can desire one 
pleasure and when that is gone, another, but we can 
not unify our desires enough to aim at even a sum 
of pleasures. 

This is well put by Green (Op. cit. p. 236). "For 
the feeling of a pleased person, or in relation to his 



44 

sense of enjoyment, pleasure cannot form a sum. How- 
ever numerous the sources of a state of pleasant feel- 
ing, it is one and is over before another can be 
enjoyed. It and its successors can be added together 
in thought, but not in enjoyment or in imagination of 
an enjoyment. If the desire is only for pleasure, i. e., 
for an enjoyment or feeling of pleasure, we are sim- 
ply victims of words when we talk of desire for a sum 
of pleasures, much more when we take the greatest 
imaginable sum to be the most desirable." See the 
whole passage, pp. 235-246. 

2. But the phrase "sum of pleasures'' undoubt- 
edly has a meaning though the fact that it has a 
meaning shows the untruth of the hedonistic psy- 
chology. Surrendering this psychology, what shall 
we say of the maximum possibility of pleasure as 
the criterion of the morality of acts ? It must be con- 
ceded that this conception does afford some basis 
although a rather slippery one for the unification 
of conduct. Each act is considered now not in its 
isolation merely, but in its connection with other 
acts, according as its relation to them may increase 
or decrease the possible sum of future happiness. 
But this very fact that some universal, or element of 
relation, albeit a quantitative one, has been intro- 
duced, arouses this inquiry: Whence do we derive 
it ? How do we get the thought of a sum of pleasure, 
and of a maximum sum? Only by taking into 
account the objective conditions upon which pleas- 
ures depend, and by judging the pleasures from the 



45 

standpoint of these objective conditions. When 
we imagine we are thinking of a Bum of pleasures, 
we are really thinking of that totality of conditions 
which will come nearest affording us self-satisfac- 
tion we are thinking of a comprehensive and con- 
tinuous activity whose various parts are adjusted to 
one another. Because it is complete activity, it is 
necessarily conceived as giving the greatest possible 
pleasure, but apart from reference to complete 
activity and apart from the objects in which this is 
realized, the phrase ' greatest sum of happiness ' is 
a more phrase. Pleasures must be measured by a 
standard, by a yard stick, before they can be sum- 
med in thought, and the yard stick we use is the 
activity in which the pleasure comes. We do not 
measure conduct by pleasure, but we compare and 
sum up pleasures on the basis of the objects which 
occasion them. To add feelings, mere transitory 
consequences, without first reducing those feelings 
to a common denominator by their relation to one 
objective standard, is an impossibility. Pleasure is 
a sort of sign or symbol of the object which satis- 
fies, and we may carry on our judgment, if we will, 
in terms of the sign, without reference to the stand- 
ard, but to argue as if the sign were the thing, as 
if the sum of pleasure were the activity, is suicidal. 

Thus (Jreen s;ns (Op. cit., p. 244): "In truth a 
man's reference to his own true happiness is a refer- 



46 

ence to the objects which chiefly interest him, and has 
its controlling power on that account. More strictly, 
it is a reference to an ideal state of well-being-, a state 
in which he shall be satisfied; but the objects of the 
man's chief interests supply the filling of that ideal 
state" See the argument as put by Alexander (Moral 
Order and Progress, pp. 199-200). Alexander has also 
brought out (Ibid, pp. 207-210) that even if we are 
going to use a quantitative standard, the idea of a 
sum is not a very happy one. It is not so much a sum 
of pleasures we want, as a certain proportionate dis- 
tribution and combination of pleasures. " To regard 
the greatest sum of pleasures as the test of conduct, 
supposing that we could express it in units of pleas- 
ure, would be like declaring that when you had an 
atomic weight of 98 you had sulphuric acid. The 
numerical test would be useless unless we knew what 
elements were to be combined, and in what pro- 
portion. Similarly till we know what kinds of 
activities (and therefore what kinds of pleasures) 
go with one another to form the end, the greatest sum 
of pleasures will give us only the equivalent of the 
end, but will not tell us what Uie composition of the 
end is, still less how to get at it; or, to put the matter 
more simply, when we know what the characters of 
persons are, and how they are combined in morality, 
we then estimate the corresponding sum of pleasures." 
(p. 209.) 

II. A certain quality of pleasure the end. 
Some moralists, notably John Stuart Mill, introduce 
considerations regarding the quality of pleasure into 
the conception of the end. "It is quite com- 
patible," says Mill, " with the principle of utility to 
recognize the fact that some kinds of pleasure 



47 

are more desirable and more valuable than others." 
(p. 310.) Is it compatible? Is kind of pleasure 
the same thing as pleasure? does not strict hedon- 
ism demand that all kinds of pleasure equally pre- 
sent as to intensity in consciousness shall be of 
the same value? To say otherwise is to give up 
pleasure as such as the standard and to hold that 
we have means for discriminating the respective 
values of pleasures which simply, as* feelings, are 
the same. It is to hold, that is to say, that there ie 
some standard of value external to the pleasures as 
such, by means of which their moral quality may 
be judged. In this case, this independent standard 
is the real moral criterion which we are employing. 
Hedonism is surrendered. 

Kant's position on this point seems impregnable. 
" It is surprising," he says,*' that men otherwise astute 
can think it possible to distinguish between higher 
and lower desires, according as the ideas which are 
connected with the feeling of pleasure have their ori- 
gin in the senses or in the understanding; lor when 
we inquire what are the determining grounds of desire, 
and place them in some expected pleasantness, it is of 
no consequence whence the idea of this pleasing 

object is derived, but only how much it pleases 

The only thing that concerns one, in order to decide 
choice, is how great, how long continued, how easily 
obtained and how often repeated, this agreableness is 
For as to the man who wants money to spend, it is all 
the same whether the gold was dug out of the moun- 
tain or washed out of the sand, provided it is every- 



48 

where accepted at the same value; so the man who 
cares only for the enjoyment of life does not ask 
whether the ideas are of the understanding or the 
senses, but only how much and how great pleasure 
they will give for the longest time." 
See also Bradley, Op. cit., pp. 105-110. 

When we ask how the differences in quality are 
established and how we translate this qualitative 
difference into moral difference, the surrender of 
pleasure as the standard becomes even more evi- 
dent. We must know not only the fact of different 
qualities, but how to decide which is ' higher ' than 
any other. We must bring the qualities before a 
tribunal of judgment which applies to them some 
standard of measurement. In themselves qualities 
may be different, but they are not higher and lower. 
What is the tribunal and what is the law of judg- 
ment? According to Mill tho tribunal is the pref- 
erence of those who are acquainted with both kinds 
of pleasure. 

" Of two pleasures, if there be one to which all. or 
almost all who have experience of both, give a decided 
preference, irrespective of. :my feeling ot moral obli- 
gation to prefer it, that is tho more desirable 
pleasure." It is an unquestionable fact that such 
differences exist. " Few human creatures would con- 
sent to be changed into any of the lower animals for a 
promise of the fullest allowance of a beast's pleasures. 
No intelligent person would consent to be a fool; no 
instructed person would be an ignoramus; no person 
of feeling and conscience would be selfish and base, 



49 

even though they should be persuaded that the fool, 
the dunce or the rascal is better satisfied with hig lot 

than they are with theirs It is better to be a 

human being dissatisfied, than a pig satisfied; better 
to be a Socrates dissatisfied, than a fool satisfied. And 
if the fool or the pig are of a different opinion, it is 
because they only know their own side of the ques- 
tion. The other party to the comparison knows both 
sides." Mill, Op. cit., pp. 311-313. And in an omitted 
portion Mill says the reason that one of the higher 
faculty would preier a suffering which goes along 
with that higher capacity, to more pleasure on a lower 
plane, is something of which "the most appropriate 
appellation is a sense of dignity, which all human 
beings possess in one form or another." 

A question immediately arises regarding this 
standard of preferability. IB it the mere historical 
fact that some man, who has experienced both, pre- 
fers A to B that makes A more desirable? Surely 
I might say that if that person prefers A, A is more 
desirable to him, but that I for my part prefer B, 
and that I do not intend to give up my preference. 
And why should I, even though thousands of other 
men happened to prefer A? B is the greater 
pleasure, none the less, to me, and as a hedonist I 
must cling to the only standard that I have. The 
hedonists, in a word, have appealed to feeling, and 
to feeling they must go for judgment. And feeling 
exists only as it is felt and only to him who feels it. 

On the other hand, perhaps it is not the bare 

fact that some men prefer one pleasure to another 
4 



50 

that makes it more desirable, but something in the 
character of the men who prefer. And this is 
what Mill implies. It is a " sense of dignity " 
belonging to man which makes his judgment of 
pleasure better than that of animals; it is the 
human being against the pig, Socrates against the 
fool, the good man against the rascal. This is the 
complete surrender of hedonism, and the all but 
explicit assertion that human character, goodness, 
wisdom, are the criteria of pleasure, instead of 
pleasure the criterion of character and goodness. 
Mill's "sense of dignity," which is to be consid- 
ered in all estimates of pleasures, is just the sense 
of a moral (or active) capacity and destiny belong- 
ing to man. To refer pleasures to this is to make 
it the standard, and with this standard the anti- 
hedonist may well be content, while asking, how- 
ever, for its further analysis. 

To sum up our % long discussion of pleasure as a 
criterion of conduct in respect of its unity, we may 
say: Pleasure, as it actually exists in man, maybe 
taken as a criterion, although not the really primary 
one, of action. But this is not hedonism; for 
pleasure "as it exists is something more than pleas- 
urable feeling; it is qualified through and through 
by the kind of action which it accompanies, by the 
kind of objects which the activity comprehends. 
And thus it is always a secondary criterion. The 



51 

moment we begin to analyze we must ask what 
kind of activity, what kind of object it is which 
the pleasure accompanies and of which it is a sym- 
bol. We may, if we will, calculate a man's 
wealth in terms of dollars and cents; but this is 
only because we can translate the money, the 
symbol, into goods, the reality. To desire pleasure 
instead of an activity of self, is to substitute 
symbol for fact, and a symbol cut off from fact 
ceases to be a symbol. Pleasure, as the hedonist 
treats it, mere agreeable feeling without active and 
thus objective relationships, is wholly an abstrac- 
tion. Since an abstraction, to make it the end of 
desire results in self contradiction; while to make 
it the standard of conduct is to deprive life of all 
unity, all system, in a word of all standard. 

XX. 

The Failure of Thus far our examination of 

Pleasure as a the hedonistic criterion has been 

Standard devoted to showing that it will 

to Unify Con- not make a system out of indivi- 

duct Socially, dual conduct. We have now to 

recognize the fact that pleasure is not a common 

good, and therefore fails to give a social unity to 

conduct that is, it does not offer an end for which 

men may cooperate, or a good which reached by 

one must be shared by another. No argument is 

needed to show, theoretically, that any proposed 



52 

moral criterion must, in order to be valid, harmon- 
ize the interests and activities of different men, or 
to show, practically, that the whole tendency of the 
modern democratic and philanthropic movement 
has been to discover and realize a good in which 
men shall share on the basis of an equal principle. 
It is contended that hedonism fails to satisfy these 
needs. /According to it, the end for each man is 
his own pleasure. Pleasure is nothing objective in 
which men may equally participate. It is purely 
individual in the most exclusive sense of that term. 
It is a state of feeling and can be enjoyed only 
while felt, and only by the one who feels it. To set 
it up for the ideal of conduct is to turn life into an 
exclusive and excluding struggle for possession of 
the means of personal enjoyment ; it is to erect into 
a principle the idea of the war of all against all. 
No end more thoroughly disintegrating than indi- 
vidual agreeable sensation could well be imagined. 

Says Kant, (page 116 of Abbott's Trans., entitled 
Kant's Theory of Ethics) on the basis of the desire of 
happiness '* there results a harmony like that which a 
certain satirical poem depicts as existing between a 
married couple bent on going to ruin: O, marvellous 
harmony^ what he wishes, she wishes also; or like 
what is said of the pledge of Francis I to the emperor 
Charles V, what my brother Charles wishes that I 
wish also (viz., Milan)." 

Almost all modern moralists who take pleas* 
ure as the end conceive it to be not individual 



53 

pleasure, but the happiness of all men or even of 
all sentient creatures. Thus we are brought to the 
consideration of Utilitarianism. 

Says Mill (Op. cit., p. 323), " The happiness which 
forms the Utilitarian standard of what is right in con- 
duct is not the agent's own happiness, but that of all 
concerned; as between his own happiness and that of 
others, Utilitarianism requires him to be as strictly 
impartial as a disinterested and benevolent spectator." 
And (page 315) the Utilitarian standard is "not the 
agent's own greatest happiness, but the greatest 
amount of happiness altogether." See also Sidgwick 
(Op. cit., p. 379), " By Utilitarianism is here meant 
the ethical theory, first distinctly formulated by Ben- 
tham, that the conduct which, under any given cir- 
cumstances is externally or objectively right is that 
which will produce the greatest amount of happiness 
on the whole; that is, taking into account all whose 
happiness is affected by the conduct. It would tend to 
clearness if we might call this principle, and the 
method based upon it, by some such name as Uni- 
versalistic hedonism." As popularly put, the utilita- 
rian standard is the " greatest happiness of the great- 
est number." While in its calculation "each is to 
count for one and only one." (Bentham). And finally 
Bain (Emotions and Mill, p. 303), " Utility is opposed 
to the selfish theory, for, as propounded, it always im- 
plies the good of society generally, and the subordina- 
tion of individual interests to the general good." 

XXI. 

Criticism of The utilitarian theory certainly 

.Utilitarian- does away entirely with one of the 

ism. two main objections to hedonism 

its failure to provide a general, as distinct from a 



54 

private end. The question which we have to meet, 
however, is whether this extension of the end from 
the individual to society is consistent with the fun- 
damental principles of hedonism. How do we get 
from individual pleasure to the happiness of all? 

An intuitional utilitarian, like Sidgwiek. bus ready 
an answer which is riot open to the empirical utilita- 
rians, like Benth.un, Mill and Bain. Methods of Eth- 
ics, Bk. JII, ch. 13-14, p. 355. "We may obtain the 
self-evident principle that the good oi' any one individ- 
ual is of no more importance, as a part of universal 
good, than the good of any other. The abstract prin- 
ciple of the duty of benevolence, so far as it is cogni- 
zable by direct intuition" is, "that one is morally 
bound to regard the good of any other individual as 
much as one's own" and page 3(>4, "the principles, 
so far as they are immediately known by abstract, ?'?/,- 
tuition, can only be stated as precepts to seek (1) one's 
own good on the whole, and (2) the good of any other 
no less than one's own, in so far as it is no less an ele- 
ment of universal good/' Sidgwick, that is, differs in 
two important points from most utilitarians. He 
holds that pleasure is not the sole, or even the usual 
object of desire. And he holds that we have an imme- 
diate faculty of rational intuition which informs us 
that the good of others is as desirable an end of our 
conductas is our own happiness. Our former arguments 
against pleasure as the end, bear, of course, equally 
against this theory, but not the following arguments. 
Criticisms of this position of Sidgwick's will be found 
in Green (Op. cit., pp. 406-415); Bradley (Op. cit, pp. 
114-117). 

The popular answer to the question how we get 
from individual to general happiness, misses the 



55 

entire point of the question. This answer simplj 
says that happiness is 'intrinsically desirable '. 
Let it be so; but i happiness ' in this general way ia 
a mere abstraction. Happiness is always a partic- 
ular condition of one particular person. Whose 
happiness is desirable and to whom ? Because my 
happiness is intrinsically desirable to me, does it 
follow that your happiness is intrinsically desirable 
to me? Indeed, in the hedonistic psychology, is it 
not nonsense to say that a state of your feeling is 
desirable to me? Mill's amplified version of the 
popular answer brings out the ambiguity all the 
more plainly. He says (Utilitarianism, p. 849), 
44 No reason can be given why the general happi- 
ness is desirable, except that each person, so far as 
he believes it to be obtainable, desires his own hap- 
piness. This, however, being a fact, we have not 
only all the proof which the case admits of, but all 
which it is possible to require, that happiness is a 
good; that each person's happiness is a good to 
that person; and the general happiness, therefore', 
a good to the aggregate of all persons." But does 
it follow that because the happiness of A is an end 
to A, the happiness of B an end to B, and the 
happiness of C an end to C, that, therefore, the 
happiness of B and C is an end to A ? There is 
obviously no connection between the premises and 
the supposed conclusion. And there appears to be, 



56 

as Mill puts it, only an account of the ambiguity 
of his last clause, " the general happiness a good 
to the aggregate of all persons." The good of A 
and B and C may be a good to the aggregate 
(A + B + C), but what universalistic hedonism 
requires is that the aggregate good of A + B + 
C, be a good to A and to B and to C taken separately 
a very different proposition. Mill is guilty of 
the fallacy known logically as the fallacy of divi- 
sion arguing from a collective whole to the dis- 
tributed units. Because all men want to be happy, 
it hardly follows that every man wants all to be 
happy. There is, accordingly, no direct road from 
individualistic hedonism private pleasure to uni- 
versalistic general pleasure. Moreover, if we 
adopt the usual psychology of hedonism and say 
that pleasure is the motive of acting, it is abso- 
lutely absurd to say that general pleasure can be a 
motive. How can I be moved by the happiness 
which exists in some one else ? I may feel a pleasure 
resembling his, and be moved by it, but that is 
quite a different matter. 

XXII. 

Indirect Means Is there any indirect 

of Identifying method of going from the 

Private and pleasure of one to the 

General Pleasure, pleasure of 'all? Upon the 

whole, the utilitarians do not claim that there is any 



57 

natural and immediate connection between the 
desire for private and for general happiness, but 
suppose that there are certain means which are, 
instrumental in bringing about an identity. Of 
these means the sympathetic emotions and the 
influence of law and of education are the chief. 
Each of these, moreover, cooperates with the other. 

1. Sympathetic and Social Emotions. 

We are so constituted by nature that we take 
pleasure in the happiness of others and feel 
pain in their misery. A proper regard for our 
own welfare must lead us, therefore, to take an 
interest in the pleasure of others. Our own feel- 
ings, moreover, are largely influenced by the feelings 
of others toward us. If we act in a certain way 
we shall incur the disapprobation of others, and 
this, independently of any overt punishment it 
may lead them to inflict upon us, arouses feelings 
of shame, of inferiority, of being under the dis- 
pleasure of others, feelings all of which are de- 
cidedly painful. The more enlightened our judg- 
ment, the more we see how our pleasures are bound 
up in those of others. 

" The Dictates of Utility" (Bentham, Op. cit., p. 56) 
are neither more nor less than the dictates of the most 
extensive and enlightened (that is, well advised) benev- 
olence," and (p. 18), " The pleasures of benevolence are 
the pleasures resulting from the view of any pleasures 
supposed to be possessed by the beings who may be- 



58 

the objects of benevolence These may also be 

called the pleasures of good will, the pleasures of sym- 
pathy, or the pleasures of the benevolent or social 
affections"; and (p. 144), ** What motives (independent 
of such as legislation and religion may choose to fur- 
nish) can one man have to consult the happiness of 
another? .... In answer to this, it cannot but be 
admitted that the only interests which a man at all 
times and upon all occasions is sure to find adequate 
motives for consulting, are his own. Notwithstanding 
this, there are no occasions in which a man has not 
some motives for consulting the happiness of other 
men. In the first place he has, on all occasions, the 
purely social motive of sympathy and benevolence; 
in the next place he has, on most occasions, the semi- 
social motives of love of amity and love of reputa- 
tion." And so in the Deontology, which, however, 
was not published by Bentham himself, page 203, " The 
more enlightened one is, the more one forms the 
habit of general benevolence, because it is seen that 
the interests of men combine with each other in more 
points than they conflict in." 

2. Education and Law. 

Education, working directly and internally upon 
the feelings, and government, appealing to them from 
without through commands and penalties, are con- 
stantly effecting an increasing identity of self- 
interest and regard for others. These means 
supplement the action of sympathy and the more 
instinctive emotions. They stimulate and even 
induce a proper interest in the pleasures of others. 
In governmental law, with its punishments, we 
have an express instrument for making the pleas- 



59 

ores of one harmonize with (or at least not conflict 
with) the pleasures of others. 

Thus Bentham, after stating that an enlightened 
mind perceives the identity of self-interest and that of 
others (or of egoism and altruism, as these interests 
are now commonly called), goes on (Deontology, p. 
201): " The majority do not have sufficient enlighten- 
ment, nor enough moral feeling so that their character 
goes beyond the aid of laws, and so the legislator 
should supplement the frailty of this natural interest, 
in adding to it an artificial interest more appreciable 
and more continuous. Thus the government augments 
and extends the connexion which exists between pru- 
dence and benevolence." Mill says (Op. cit., p. 323): 
" To do as you would be done by, and to love your 
neighbor as yourself, constitute the ideal perfection of 
utilitarian morality. As the means of making the 
nearest approach to this ideal, utility would enjoin, 
first, that laws and social arrangements should place 
the happiness or the interest of every individual as 
nearly as possible in harmony with the interest of the 
whole; and, secondly, that education and opinion, 
which have so vast a power over human character, 
should so use that power as to establish in the mind of 
every individual an indissoluble association between 
his own happiness and the good of the whole." 

XXIII. 

Private Pleasures In criticism of these Indi- 
an d rect methods of establishing 
General Welfare, the identity of 'egoism ' and 
4 altruism,' it may be said: 

1. That the supposed relation between the pri- 
Tate and the general happiness is extrinsic, and 



60 

hence always accidental and open to exception. 
It is not contended that there is any order which 
morally demands that there be an identity of in- 
terests. It is simply argued that there are certain 
physical and psychological forces which operate, 
as matter of fact, to bring about such a result 
Now we may admit, if we like, that such forces 
exist and that they are capable of accomplishing all 
that Bentham and Mill claim for them. But all 
that is established is, at most, a certain state of 
facts which is interesting as a state of facts, but 
which has no especial moral bearing. It is not 
pretended that there is in the very order of things 
any necessary and intrinsic connection between the 
happiness of one and of another. Such identity 
as exists, therefore, must be a mere external result 
of the action of certain forces. It is accidental 
This being the case, how can it constitute the uni- 
versal ideal of action ? Why is it not open for an 
agent, under exceptional circumstances, to act for 
his own pleasure, to the exclusion of that of others ? 
We may admit that, upon the whole (or that 
always, though this is wholly impossible to prove) 
in past ^experience, personal pleasure has been best 
attained by a certain regard for the pleasures of 
others; but the connection being wholly empirical 
(that is, of past instances and not of an intrinsic 
law), we may ask how it can be claimed that the- 



61 

same connection is certain to hold in this new case T 
NOT is it probable that any one would claim that 
the connection between individual pleasure and 
general pleasure had been so universal and inva- 
riable in past experience. 

Intrinsic moral considerations (that is, those 
based on the very nature of human action) being 
put aside, a pretty strong case could be made 
out for the statement that individual happiness is 
best attained by ignoring the happiness of others. 
Probably the most that can be established on the 
other side is that a due prudence dictates that some 
attention be paid to the pleasures of others, in cal- 
culating one's own pleasures. 

And this suggests: 

2. That the end is still private pleasure, general 
pleasure being simply a means. Granting all that 
the hedonists urge, what their arguments prove is 
not that the general pleasure is the end of action, 
but that, private pleasure being the end, regard for 
the pleasures of others is one of the most efficient 
means of reaching it. If private pleasure is a 
selfish end, the end is not less selfish because the 
road to it happens to bring pleasure to others also. 

See Royce, Religious Aspect of Philosophy, pp. 
.61-74. 

3. The use of education and law to bring about 
this identity, presupposes that we already have the 



62 

ideal of the identity as something desirable to 
realize it takes for granted the very thing to be 
proved. Why should it occur to men to use the 
private influence of opinion and education, and 
the public influences of law and penalty to identify 
private welfare with public, unless they were al- 
ready convinced that general welfare was the end 
of conduct, the one desirable thing? What the 
hedonist has to do is to show how, from the end of 
private happiness, we may get to the end of general 
happiness. What Bentham and Mill do show is, 
that if we take general happiness as the end, we 
may and do use education and law to bring about 
an identity of personal and general pleasures. 
This may go undoubted, but the question how we 
get the general happiness as the end, the good, re- 
mains unanswered. 

Nor is this all. The conception of general hap- 
piness, taken by itself, has all the abstractness, 
vagueness and uncertainty of that of personal hap- 
piness, multiplied indefinitely by the greater num- 
ber of persons introduced. To calculate the effects 
of actions upon the general happiness when hap- 
piness is interpreted as a state of feeling is an 
impossibility. And thus it is that when one is 
speaking of pleasures one is really thinking of wel- 
fare, or well-being, or satisfied and progressive 
human lives. Happiness is considered as it would 



63 

be, if determined by certain active and well defined 
interests, and thus the hedonistic theory, while con- 
tradicting itself, gets apparently all the support of 
an opposed theory. Universalistic hedonism thus, 
more or less expressly, takes for granted a social 
order, or community of persons, of which the agent 
is simply one member like any other. This is the 
ideal which it proposes to realize. In this way 
although at the cost of logical suicide the ideal 
gets a content and a denniteness upon which it is 
possible to base judgments. 

That this social organ izat ion of persons is the 
ideal which Mill is actually thinking of, rather than 
any succession of states of agreeable sensation, is evi- 
dent by his treatment of the whole subject. Mill is 
quite clear that education and opinion may produce 
any sort of feeling, as well as truly benevolent motives 
to actions. For example, in his critique of Whewell, 
he says, (Op. cit., p. 151): *' All experience shows that 
the moral feelings are preeminently artificial, and the 
products of culture; that even when reasonable, they 
are no more spontaneous than the growth of corn and 
wine (which are quite as natural), and that the most 
senseless and pernicious feeling can as easily be raised 
to the utmost intensity by inculcation, as hemlock and 
thistles could be reared to luxuriant growth by so wing 
them instead of wheat." It is certainly implied here 
that legislation, education and public opinion must 
have as a presupposed standard the identity of general 
and private interests or else they may produce any- 
thing whatever. That is to say, Mill instead of arriv- 
ing at his result of general happiness simply takes it 
for granted. 



64 

This fact and the further fact that he virtually 
defines happiness through certain objective interests 
and ends (thus reversing the true hedonistic position) 
is obvious from the folio wing, (Mill, Op. cit., pp. 343- 
347): After again stating that the moral feelings are 
capable of cultivation in almost any direction, and 
stating that moral associations that are of artificial 
construction dissolve through the force of intellectual 
analysis (cf. his Autobiography, p. 136), and that the as- 
sociation of pleasure with the feeling of duty would 
similarly dissolve unless it had a natural basis of sen- 
timent, he goes on. " But there is this basis of power- 
ful natural sentiment. This firm foundation is that 
of the social feelings of mankind; the desire to be in 
unity with our fellow-creatures. The social state is at 
once so natural, so necessary, and so habitual to man 
that except in some unusual circumstances, or by an 
effort of voluntary abstraction he never conceives of 
himself otherwise than as a member of a body. Any 
condition, therefore, which is essential to a state of 
society becomes more and more an inseparable part of 
every person's conception of the state of things which 
he is born into, and which is the destiny of a human 
being 1 ." Mill then goes on to describe some of the 
ways in which the social unity manifests itself and 
influences the individual's conduct Then the latter 
"comes, as though instinctively, to be conscious of 
himself a a being who of course pays regard to others. 
The goed of others becomes to him a thing naturally 
and necessarily to be attended to, like any of the phy- 
sical conditions of our existence. The deeply -rooted 
conception which every individual even now has of 
himself as a social being tends to make him feel it as 
one of his natural wants, that there should be harmony 
between his feelings and aims and those of his fellow- 



65 

creatures. This conviction is the ultimate sanction of 
the greatest happiness morality." 

It is to be noticed that there is involved in this 
account three ideas, any one of which involves such 
a reconstruction of the pleasure theory as to be a 
surrender of hedonism. 

1. There is, in one instance, a natural (or in- 
trinsic) connection between the end of conduct and 
the feelings, and not simply an external or artificial 
bond. This is in the case of the social feelings. 
In other words, in one case the ideal, that is, happi- 
ness, is intrinsically, or necessarily connected with 
a certain kind of conduct, that flowing from the 
social impulses. This, of course, reverses hedonism 
for it makes happiness dependent upon a certain 
kind of conduct, instead of determining the nature 
of conduct according as it happens to result in 
pleasure or pain. 

2. Man conceives of himself, of his end or of 
his destiny as a member of a social body, and 
this conception determines the nature of his wants 
and aims. That is to say, it is not mere happiness 
that a man wants, but a certain kind of happiness, 
that which would satisfy a man who conceived of 
himself as social, or having ends and interests in 
common with others. 

3. Finally, it is not mere general " happiness" 

which is the end, at all. It is social unitv; " har- 
5 



66 

mony of feelings and aims," a beneficial condition 
for one's self in which the benefits of all are included. 
Instead of the essentially vague idea of states of 
pleasurable sensation we have the conception of a 
community of interests and ends, in securing which 
alone is true happiness to be found. This concep- 
tion of the moral ideal we regard as essentially 
true, but it is not hedonism. It gives up wholly 
the notion that pleasure is the desired, and, since it 
sets up a standard by which it determines pleas- 
ure, it gives up equally the notion that pleasure as 
such is the desirable, 

In addition to the works already referred to, the 
following" will give fuller ideas of hedonism and util- 
itarianism: For historical treatment see Sidgwick, 
History of Ethics; Jodl, Geschichte der Ethik, Vol. 
II., pp. 4H2-4M; Bain, Moral Science, Historical Men- 
tion; Guyau, La Morale Anglaise Coriternporaine; 
Wallace, Epicureanism; Pater, Marius, the Epicurean. 
Paley, Moral and Political Philosophy; Grote, Exam- 
ination of the Utilitarian Philosophy (especially fair 
and valuable criticism); Lecky, History of European 
Morals, Vol. I, ch. 1; Hirks, Utilitarianism (hostile); 
Blackie, Four Phases of Morals: Essay on Utilitar- 
ianism (hostile); Gizycki, Students' Manual of Ethical 
Philosophy, (Colt's trans., favorable); Calderwood, 
Hand-Book of Moral Philosophy (opposed); Laurie, 
Ethica (e. #., p. 10). " The object of will is not pleas- 
ure, not yet happiness, but reason-given law the law 
of harmony; but this necessarily ascertained through 
feeling, and, therefore, through happiness." 

Wilson and Fowler, Principles of Morals, Vol. I, 



67 

pp. 98-112; Vol. II, pp. 262-273. Paulsen, System der 
Ethik, pp. 195-210. 

XXIV. 

The Utilitarian Theory There has lately 
Combined With the been an attempt to 
Doctrine of Evolution, c o m b i n e utilitarian 
morality with the theory of evolution. This posi- 
tion, chiefly as occupied by Herbert Spencer and 
Leslie Stephen, we shall now examine. 

Alexander, also, Moral Order and Progress, makes 
large use of the theory of evolution, but does not 
attempt to unite it with any form of hedonism. 

For the combination, at least three decided ad- 
vantages are claimed over ordinary utilitarianism. 

1. It transforms 'empirical rules' into i rational 
laws.' The evolutionary hedonists regard pleasure 
as the good, but hold that the theory of evolution en- 
ables them to judge of the relation of acts to 
pleasure much better than the ordinary theory. As 
Mr. Spencer puts it, the ordinary theory is not sci- 
entific, because it does not fully recognize the 
principle of causation as existing between certain 
acts as causes, and pleasures (or pains) as effects. 
It undoubtedly recognizes that some acts do result 
in pain or pleasure, but does not show how or why 
they so result. By the aid of the theory of evolu- 
tion we can demonstrate that certain acts must be 
beneficial because furthering evolution, and others 
painful because retarding it. 



68 

Spencer, Data of Ethics, pp. 5758. "Morality 
properly so-called the science of right conduct has 
for its object to determine how and why certain rules 
of conduct are detrimental, and certain other rules 
beneficial. Those good and bad results cannot be acci- 
dental, but must be necessary consequences of the 
constitution of things; and I conceive it to be the 
business of moral science to deduc.e, from the laws of 
life and the conditions of existence, what kinds of 
action necessarily tend to produce happiness, and what 
kinds to produce unhappiness. Having done this, its 
deductions are to be recognized as laws of conduct; 
and are to be conformed to irrespective of a direct 
estimation of happiness or misery The objec- 
tion which I have to the current utilitarianism is, 
that it recognizes no more developed form of utility 
does not see that it has reached but the initial stage 

of moral science It is supposed that in future, 

as now, utility is to be determined only by observation 
of results; and that there is no possibility of knowing 
by deduction from fundamental principles what con- 
duct must be detrimental and what conduct mmt be 
beneficial." Of. also ch. IX, and Stephen, Science of 
Ehtics, ch. JX. 

It is contended, then, that by the use of the evo- 
lutionary theory, we may substitute certain condi- 
tions, which in the very nature of things tend to 
produce happiness, for a calculation, based upon 
observation of more or less varying cases in the past, 
of the probable results of the specific action. Thus 
we get a fixed objective standard and do away with 
all the objections based upon the uncertainty, 
vagueness and liability to exceptions, of the ordinary 
utilitarian morality. 



69 

Spencer, Op. cit., p. 162: " When alleging that 
empirical utilitarianism is but introductory to rational 
utilitarianism I pointed out that the last does not 
take welfare for its immediate object of pursuit, but 
takes for its immediate object of pursuit conformity 
to certain principles which, in the nature of things, 
causally determine welfare." 

2. It reconciles 'intuitionalism' with 'empir- 
icism.' The theory of evolution not only gives us 
an objective standard on which happiness neces- 
sarily depends, and from which we may derive our 
laws of conduct, instead of deriving them from ob- 
servation of particular cases, but it enables us to 
recognize that there are certain moral ideas now 
innate or intuitive. The whole human race, the 
whole animal race, has for an indefinite time been 
undergoing experiences of what leads to pleasure 
and of what leads to pain, until finally the results 
of these experiences have become organized into 
our very physical and mental make-up. The first 
point was that we could substitute for consideration 
of results consideration of the causes which deter- 
mine these results ; the present point is that so far 
as we have to use results, we can use those of the 
race, instead of the short span of the individual's 
life. 

Spencer, Op. cit., pp. 123-124. " The experiences of 
utility organized and consolidated through all past 
generations of the human race have been producing 
corresponding nervous modifications, which, by con- 



70 

tinued transmission and accumulation, have become 
in us certain faculties of moral intuition certain 
emotions corresponding to right and wrong conduct,- 
which have no apparent basis in the individual expe- 
riences of utility The evolution hypothesis tjtous 

enables us to reconcile opposed moral theories 

The doctrine of innate powers of moral perception 
become congruous with the utilitarian doctrine, when 
it is seen that preferences and aversions are rendered 
organic by inheritance of the effects of pleasurable 
and painful experiences in progenitors." 

3. It reconciles i egoism' with 'altruism/ As 
we have seen, the relation of personal pleasure to 
general happiness presents very serious difficulties to 
hedonism. It is claimed, however, that the very pro- 
cess of evolution necessitates a certain identity. 
The being which survives must be the being which 
has properly adapted himself to his environment, 
which is largely social, and there is assurance that 
the conduct will be adapted to the environment 
just in the degree in which pleasure is taken in 
acts which concern the welfare of others. If an 
agent has no pleasure in snch acts he will either not 
perform them, or perform them only occasionally, 
and thus will not meet the conditions of surviving. 
If surrounding conditions demand constantly certain 
actions, those actions in time must come to be pleas- 
urable. The conditions of survival demand altru- 
istic action, and hence such action must become 
pleasurable to the agent (and in that sense egotistic). 



71 

" From the laws of life (Spencer Op. cit., p. 205) it 
must be concluded that unceasing social discipline 
will so mould human action, that eventually sympa- 
thetic pleasures will be pursued to the fullest extent 

advantageous to each and all Though pleasure 

may be gained by giving pleasure, yet the thought of 
the sympathetic pleasure to be gained will not occupy 
consciousness, but only the thought of the pleasure 
given.' 1 

XXV. 

Criticism Regarding the whole foregoing 

of scheme, it may be said BO far as it 

E vo I u t i o n a ry is true, or suggestive of truth, it is 
Utilitarianism, not hedonistic. It does not judge 
actions from their effects in the way of pleasure or 
pain, but it judges pleasures from the basis of an 
independent standard ' in the nature of things.' 
It is expressly declared that happiness is not to be 
so much the end, as the test of conduct, and it is 
not happiness in general, of every sort and kind, 
but a certain kind of happiness, happiness condi- 
tioned by certain modes of activity, that is the test. 
Spencer's hedonism in its final result hardly comes 
to more than saying that in the case of a perfect 
individual in a perfect society, every action what- 
ever would be accompanied by pleasure, and that, 
therefore, in such a society, pleasure would be an 
infallible sign and test of the morality of action a 
position which is not denied by any ethical writer 
whatever, unless a few extreme ascetics. Such a 



72 

position simply determines the value of pleasure 
by an independent criterion, and then goes on to 
say of pleasure so determined, that it is the test of 
the morality of action. This may be true, but, true 
or not, it is not hedonistic. 

Furthermore, this standard by which the nature 
of pleasure is determined is itself an ethical (that 
is, active) standard. We have already seen that 
Spencer conceives that the modes of producing hap- 
piness are to be deduced from the " laws of life and 
the conditions of existence". This might be, of 
course, a deduction from physical laws and condi- 
tiono. But when we find that the laws and condi- 
tions which Spencer employs are mainly those of 
social life, it is difficult to see why he is not employ- 
ing a strictly ethical standard. To deduce not 
right actions directly from happiness, but the kinds 
of actions which will produce happiness from a con- 
sideration of a certain ideal of social relationships 
seems like a reversal of hedonism ; but this is what 
Mr. Spencer does. 

XXVI. 

The Real Mr. Spencer expressly recognizes 

Criterion that there exists (1) an ideal code of 

of conduct, formulating the conduct of 

Evolutionary the completely adapted man in the 

Ethics. completely evolved society. Such a 

code is called absolute ethics as distinguished from 



73 

relative ethics a code the injunctions of which are 
alone to be considered " as absolutely right, in con- 
trast with those that are relatively right or least 
wrong, and which, as a system of ideal conduct, is 
to serve as a standard for our guidance in solving, 
as well as we can, the problems of real conduct " 
(p. 275 of the Data of Ethics). T4ie ideal code 
deals, it will be observed, with the behavior of the 
completely adapted man in a completely evolved 
society." This ideal as elsewhere stated, is " an 
ideal social being so constituted that his spontane- 
ous activities are congruous with the conditions 
imposed by the social environment formed by 

other such beings The ultimate man is 

one in whom there is a correspondence between 
all the promptings of his nature and all the 
requirements of his life as carried on in society " 
(p. 275). Furthermore, " to make the ideal man 
serve as a standard, he has to be defined in terms 
of the conditions which his nature fulfill in terms 
of the objective requisites which must be met 
before conduct can be right" (p. 179). " Hence it 
is manifest that we must consider the ideal man as 
existing in the ideal social state " (p. 280). 

Here we have in the most express terms the rec- 
ognition of a final and permanent standard with 
reference to which the nature of happiness is deter- 
mined, and the standard is one of social relation- 



74 



ships. To be sure it is claimed that the standard 
is one which results in greatest happiness, but every 
ethical theory has always claimed that the ideal 
moral condition would be accompanied by the max- 
imum possible happiness. 

2. The ideal state is defined with reference to 
the end of evolution. That is, Spencer defines 
pleasure from an independent standard instead of 
using pleasure as the standard. This standard is 
to be got at by considering that idea of " fully 
evolved conduct " given by the theory of evolution. 
This fully evolved conduct implies: (i.) Greatest 
possible quantity of life, both in length and 
breadth; (ii.) Similar maintenance of life in pro- 
geny; and (iii.) Life in which there is no interfer- 
ence of actions by one with those of another, and, 
indeed, life in which the " members, of a society 
give material help in the achievement of ends, 
thus rendering the " lives of all more complete ". 
(See Chap. II of Data of Ethics). Furthermore, 
the " complete life here identified with the ideally 
moral life " may be otherwise defined as a life of 
perfect equilibrium (p. 74), or balance of functions 
(p. 90), and this considered not simply with refer- 
ence to the individual, but also with reference to 
the relation of the individual to society. " Com- 
plete life in a complete society is but another name 
for complete equilibrium between the co-ordinated 



75 

activities of each social unit and those of the ag- 
gregate of units" (p. 74, and the whole of chap. 
V. See also pp. 169-170 for the position that 
the end is a society in which each individual has 
full functions freely exercised in due harmony, and 
is, p. 100, " the spontaneous exercise of duly pro- 
portioned faculties "). 

8. Not only is pleasure thus determined by an 
objective standard of " complete living in a com- 
plete society " but it is expressly recognized that 
as things are now, pleasure is not a perfect guide 
to, or even test of action. And this difficulty is 
thought to be removed by reference to the ideal 
state in which right action and happiness will fully 
coincide. 

The failure of pleasure as a perfect test and 
guide of right conduct, comes out in at least three 
cases: 

1. There is the conflict of one set of pleasures 
with another, or of present happiness with future, 
one lot having to be surrendered for the sake of 
another. This is wrong, since pleasure as such is 
good, and, although a fact at present, exists only on 
account of the incomplete development of society. 
When there is " complete adjustment of humanity 
to the social state there will be recognition of the 
truth that actions are completely right only when, 
besides being conducive to future happiness, special 



76 

and general, they are immediately pleasurable, and 
thai, painfulness, not only ultimate but proximate, 
is the concomitant of actions which are wrong " 
(p. 29. See for various cases in which "pleasures 
are not connected with actions which must be per- 
formed " and for the statement that this difficulty 
will be removed in an ideal state of society, p. 77 ; 
pp. 85-87; pp. 98-99). 

2. There is also, at present, a conflict of indi- 
vidual happiness with social welfare. In the first 
place, as long as there exist antagonistic societies, 
the individual is called upon to sacrifice his own 
happiness to that of others, but " such moralities 
are, by their definition, shown to belong to incom- 
plete conduct; not to conduct that is fully 
evolved" (See pp. 133-137). Furthermore, there 
will be conflict of claims, and consequent compro- 
mises between one's own pleasure and that of 
others (p. 148), until there is a society in which 
there is " complete living through voluntary co- 
operation", this implying negatively that ooe shall 
not interfere with another and shall fulfill contracts, 
and positively that men shall spontaneously help to 
aid one another lives beyond any specified agree- 
ment (pp. 146-149). 

3. There is, at present, a conflict of obligation 
with pleasure. Needed activities, in other words, 
have often to be performed under a pressure, which 



77 

either lessens the pleasure of the action, or brings 
pain, the act being performed, however, to avoid a 
greater pain ( so that this point really comes under 
the first head). But " the remoulding of human 
nature into fitness for the requirements of social 
life, must eventually make all needful activities 
pleasurable, while it makes displeasurable all 
activities at variance with these requirements n 
(p. 18^). "The things now done with dislike, 
through sense of obligation, will be done then 
with immediate liking" (p. 84, and p. 180; 
and pp. 255-250). All the quotations on these 
various points are simply so many recognitions 
that pleasure and pain as such are not tests of 
morality, but that they become so when morality 
is independently realized. Pleasure is not now a 
test of conduct, but becomes such a test as fast as 
activity becomes full and complete! What is this 
but to admit (what was claimed in Sec. XIII) that 
activity itself is what man wants; not mere activity, 
but the activity which belongs to man as man, and 
which therefore has for its realized content all 
man's practical relationships. 

Of Spencer's conception of the ideal as something 
not now realized, but to be some time or other realized 
once for all, we have said nothing. But see below, 
Sec. 64, and also Alexander,Op. cit., pp. 264-277, and 
also James, Unitarian Review, Vol. XXII., pp. 212-213. 

AVe have attempted, above, to deal with evolu- 



78 

tionary ethics only in the one point of its supposed 
connection with pleasure as a standard. Accounts and 
criticisms of a broader scope will be found in Darwin, 
Descent of Man; Martineau, Op. cit., Vol. II, pp. 335- 
393; Schurman, Ethical Import of Darwinism; Sorley, 
Ethics of Naturalism, chapters V, and VI; Stephen, 
Science of. Ethics, particularly pp. 31-34; 78-89; 359- 
379; Royce, Religious Aspect of Philosophy, pp. 74-85; 
Everett, Poetry, Comedy and Duty, Essay on the New 
Ethioe; Seth in Mind, Jan. 1889, on Evolution of Mo- 
rality; Dewey, Andover Review, Vol. VII, p. 570; 
Hyslop, Ibid., Vol. IX, p. 348. 

XXVII. 

Formal Ethics. We come now to the ethical 
theories which attempt to find the good not only 
in the will itself, but in the will irrespective of 
any end to be reached by the will. The typical 
instance of such theories is the Kantian, and we 
shall, therefore, make that the basis of our examin- 
ation. Kant's theory, however, is primarily a theory 
not of the good, but of the nature of duty, and that 
makes a statement of his doctrine somewhat more 
difficult. 

"The concept of good and evil must not be deter- 
mined before the moral law (of which it seems as if it 
must be the foundation), but only after it and by 
means of it y (Abbott's Trans., p. 154). 

Separating, as far as we can, his theory of the 
good from that of duty, we get the following re- 
sults: 

1. Goodness belongs to the will, and to that alone. 



79 

" Nothing can possibly be conceived, in the world 
or out of it, which can be called good without qual- 
ification except a good will." The will is not good 
because of what it brings about, or what it is fitted 
to bring about; that is, it is not good on account 
of its adaptation to any end outside of itself. It 
is good in itself. " It is like a jewel which 
shines by its own light, having its whole value in 
itself." 

2. The good, then, is not to be found in any 
object of will or of desire, nor in the will so far as it 
is directed towards an end outside itself. For the 
will to be moved by inclination or by desire is for it 
to be moved for the sake of some external end, which, 
moreover, is always pleasure (Kant, i. c., agrees 
with the hedonists regarding the object of desire, 
but on that very ground denies that pleasure is the 
good or the desirable). If, then, no object of desire 
can be the motive of a good will, what is its motive ? 
Evidently only some principle derived from the will 
itself. The good will is the will which acts from 
regard to its own law. 

3. What is the nature of this law? All objects 
of desire (i. e., all material) have been excluded 
from it. It must, therefore, be purely formal. 
The only content of the law of the good will is the 
idea of law itself. The good will acts from rever- 
ences for law as law. It not only acts in confor- 



80 

mity with law, but has the conception of law as its 
directing spring. 

4. There must, however, be some application of 
this motive of law in general to particular motives 
or acts. This is secured as follows: The idea of 
law carries with it the idea of universality or self- 
identity. To act from the idea of law is then so to 
act that the motive of action can be generalized 
made a motive for all conduct. The good will is 
the legislative will; the will whose motive can be 
made a law for conduct universally. The ques- 
tion in a specific case is then: Can your motive 
here be made universal, i. e., a law? If the action 
is bad, determined by an object of desire, it will be 
contingent and variable, since pleasures are differ- 
ent to different persons and to the same person 
from moment to moment. The will is good, 
then, when its motive (or maxirn) is to be found 
solely in the legislative form of the action, or in its 
fitness to bo generalized into a universal principle 
of conduct, and the law of the good will is: "Act 
so that the maxim of thy will can always at the 
same time hold good as a principle of universal 
legislation " (Abbott's Trans., p. 119; also p. 55). 

5. The application may be illustrated by the fol- 
lowing cases: 

(a) Some one, wearied by what he conceives to 
be the entire misery of life proposes to commit sui- 



81 

cide, but he asks himself whether thiw maxim based 
on the principle of self-love could become a univer- 
sal law of nature; and " we see at once that a system 
of nature in which the very feeling, whose office is 
to compel men to the preservation of life, should 
lead men by a universal law to death, cannot be 
conceived without contradiction". That is to say, 
the principle of the motive which would lead a man 
to suicide cannot be generalized without becoming 
contradictory it cannot be made a law universal. 

(b) An individual wishes to borrow money which 
he knows that he cannot repay. Can the maxim of 
this act be universalized ? Evidently not: "a system 
of nature in which it should be a universal law to 
promise without performing, for the sake of private 
good, would contradict itself, for then no one would 
believe the promise the promise itself would be- 
come impossible as well as the end it had in view." 

(c) A man finds that he has certain powers, 
but is disinclined to develop them. Can he make 
the maxim of such conduct a universal law? He 
cannot will that it should become universal. " As a 
rational being, he must will that his faculties be 
developed." 

(d) A prosperous individual is disinclined to re- 
lieve the misery of others. Can his maxim be gen- 
eralized ? " It is impossible to mill that such a 

principle should have the universal validity of a 
6 



82 

law of nature. For a will which resolved this 
would contradict itself, in as much as many cases 
might occur in which one would have need of the 
love and sympathy of others, and in which, by 
such a law of nature, sprung from his own will, he 
would deprive himself of all hope of the aid he 
desires." 

In conclusion, then, the good is the good will 
itself, and the will is good in virtue of the bare 
form of its action, independently of all special 
material willed. 

See Abbott's trans., pp. 9-4f>, 105-120. Caird's Criti- 
cal Philosophy of Kant, Vol. II, pp. 171-181; 209-212. 

XXVIII. 

Relation The Kantian theory, as already 
of this noticed, agrees in its psychology with 
Theory hedooism. It holds that pleasures 
to are the objects of desire. But it 

Hedonism, reverses the conclusion which hedon- 
ism draws from this fact as to the desirable. Since 
pleasures are the object of desire, and pleasures 
can give no law, no universality to action, the end 
of action must be found wholly outside the pleas- 
ures, and wholly outside the desires. It can be 
found only in the bare law of the will itself. 

1. Hedonism finds the end of conduct, or the 
desirable, wholly determined by the various partic- 
ular desires which a man happens to have; Kant- 



83 

ianism holds that to discover the end of conduct, 
we must wholly exclude the desires. 

2. Hedonism holds that the Tightness of con- 
duct is determined wholly by its consequences; 
Kantianism holds that the consequences have noth- 
ing to do with the Tightness of an act, but that it 
is decided wholly by the motive of the act. 

From this contrast, we may anticipate both our 
criticism of the Kantian theory and our concep- 
tion of the true end of action. The fundamental 
error of hedonism and Kantianism is the same 
the supposition that desires are for pleasure 
only. Let it be recognized that desires are for 
objects conceived as satisfying or developing the 
self, and that pleasure is incidental to this fulfill- 
ment of the capacities of self, and we have the 
means of escaping the one-sidednoss of Kantianism 
erf well as of hedonism. We can see that the end 
is neither the procuring of particular pleasures 
through the various desires, nor action from the 
mere idea of abstract law in general, but that it is 
the satisfaction of desires according to law. The 
desire in its particular character does not give the 
law; this, as we saw in our criticism of hedonism, is 
to take away all law from conduct and to leave us 
at the mercy of our chance desires as they come 
and go. On the other hand the law is not some- 
thing wholly apart from the desires. This, as we 



84 

shall see, is equally to deprive us of a law capable 
of governing conduct. The law is the law of the 
desires themselves the harmony and adjustment 
of desires necessary to make them instruments 
in fulfilling the special destiny or business of the 
agent. 

From the same point of view we can see that the 
criterion is found neither in the consequences of 
our acts as pleasures, nor apart from consequences. 
It is found indeed in the consequences of acts, but in 
their complete consequences : those upon the agent 
and society, 'as helping or hindering them in ful- 
fillment of their respective functions. 

XXIX. 

Criticism 1. With reference to the unification 
of of the conduct of the individual. Of 

Kantian pleasure as the object of desire, we need 
Criterion now say nothing further, but may pro- 
of ceed at once to the criticism of the 
Conduct, theory that the will, acting according 
to the mere idea of law in general, is the end of man 
and hence that it is the criterion of the Tightness 
or wrongness of his acts. We shall attempt to 
show that such an end is wholly empty, and that it 
fails (as much as hedonism) to unify conduct or 
to place any specific act as to its morality. 

The difficulty of the end proposed by Kant is 
that it is an abstraction; that it is remote. The 



85 

hedonist leaves out one element from conduct, and 
takes into account the merely particular or individ- 
ualistic side; the Kantian abstracts the opposite 
element the merely universal. The formal 
universal, or universal stripped of all particular 
content, has, considered as an end of action, at least 
three defects. 

I. It is an end which would make impossible 
that very conduct of which it is taken to be the 
end that is, moral conduct. In denying that 
pleasure is the end of action, we took pains to show 
that it (or rather the feeling due to the tension 
between pleasure of a state considered better and 
the pain of the experienced worse state) is a neces- 
sary element in the force impelling to action. The 
mere conception of an end is purely intellectual; 
there is nothing in it to move to action. It must 
be felt as valuable, as worth having, and as more 
valuable than the present condition before it can 
induce to action. It must interest, in a word, and 
thus excite desire. But if feeling is, as Kant de- 
clares, to be excluded from the motive to action, be- 
cause it is pathological or related to pleasure as the 
object of desire, how can there be any force mov- 
ing to action? The mind seems to be set over 
against a purely theoretical idea of an end, with 
nothing to connect the mind with the end. 
Unless the end interests, unless it arouses emotion, 



86 

why should the agent ever aim at it ? And if the 
law does excite feeling or desire, must not this, 
on Kant's theory, be desire for pleasure and thus 
vitiate the morality of the act? We seem to be in 
a dilemma, one side of which makes moral action 
impossible by taking away all inducing force, 
while the other makes it impossible by introducing 
an immoral factor into the motive. 

Kant attempts to escape from this difficulty by 
claiming that there is one feeling which is rational, 
and not sensuous in quality, being excited not by 
the conception of pleasure or pain, but by that of 
the moral law itself. This is the feeling of rever- 
ence, and through this feeling we can be moved to 
moral action. Waiving the question whether the 
mere idea of law in general would be capable of 
arousing any moral sentiment or, putting the 
matter from the other side, whether Kant gives us 
a true account of the feeling of reverence it is 
clear that this admission is fatal to Kant's theory. 
If desire or feeling as such is sensuous (or patho- 
logical, as Kant terms it), what right have we to 
make this one exception? And if we can make 
this one exception, why not others ? If it is possi- 
ble in the case of reverence, why not in the case, 
say, of patriotism, or of friendship, or of philan- 
thropy, or of love or even of curiosity, or of 
indignation, or of desire for approbation? Kant's 



87 

separation of reverence, as the one moral sentiment 
from all others as pathological, is wholly arbitrary. 
The only distinction we can draw is of the feelings 
as they well up naturally in reaction upon stimuli, 
sentiments not conceived and thus neither moral nor 
immoral, and sentiments as transformed by ends 
of action, in which case all without exception may 
be moral or immoral, according to the character of 
the end. The Kantian separation is not only ar- 
bitrary psychologically, but is false historically. 
So far is it from true that the only moral sentiment 
is reverence for law, -that men must have been 
moved toward action for centuries by motives of 
love and hate and social regard, before they became 
capable of such an abstract feeling as reverence. 
And it may be questioned whether this feeling, as 
Kant treats it, is even the highest or ultimate form 
of moral sentiment whether it is not transitional 
to love, in which there is complete union of the 
individual interest on one hand, and the objective 
end on the other. 

For these criticisms at greater length, see Caird, 
Critical Philosophy of Kant, Vol. II, Bk. II, eh. IV. 

II. The Kantian end would not bring about any 
system in conduct on the contrary, it would tend 
to differences and collisions. What is required to 
give unity to the sphere of conduct is, as we have 
seen, a principle which shall comprehend all the 



88 

motives to action, giving each its due place in con- 
tributing to the whole a universal which shall 
organize the various particular acts into a harmon- 
ious system. Now Kant's conception of the good 
does not lead to such result. We may even say 
that it makes it impossible. According to Kant each 
act must be considered independently of every 
other, and must be capable of generalization on its 
own account. Each motive of action must be 
capable of being itself a universal law of nature. 
Each particular rule of action is thus made abso- 
lute, and we are left not with one universal which 
comprehends all particulars in their relations to 
one another, but literally with a lot of universals. 
These not only fail to have a unity, but each, as 
absolute, must contradict some other. If the prin- 
ciples always to tell the truth and always to 
preserve life are universal in themselves, and not 
universal simply through their relation to some 
total and controlling principle of life, it must be 
impossible to reconcile them when they come into 
conflict. 

See Caird, Op. cit, Vol. II, pp. 187-190, and p. 215. 
Cf. "Treated as universal and without exception, 
even- two suchf commands as e. </., 'Thou shalt not 
steal,' and ' Thou shalt not kill,' must ultimately come 
into conflict with each other; for, if all other interests 
are to be postponed to the maintenance of the rights 
of property, it is impossible that all other interests 
should also be postponed to the preservation of 



89 

human life and to make either property or life an 
absolute end is to raise a particular into a universal, 
to treat a part as if it were a whole. But the true 
moral vindication of each particular interest cannot 
be found in elevating it into something universal and 
absolute, but only in determining its place in relation 
to the others in a complete system of morality." 

III. The principle is so empty of all content 
that it does not enable us to judge of any specific 
act. 

A caution should be noticed here, which is equally 
applicable to the criticism of hedonism: When it is 
said that the end does not enable us to judge of specific 
acts, the objection is not that the theory (Kantianism 
or hedonism, as the case may be) does not give us 
rules for moral conduct. It is not the business of any 
theory, however correct as a theory, to lay down rules 
for conduct. The theory has simply to discover what 
the end is, and it is the end in view which determines 
specific acts. It is no more the business of ethics to 
tell what in particular a man ought to do, than it is of 
trigonometry to survey land. But trigonometry must 
state the principles by which land is surveyed, and so 
ethics must state the end by which conduct is gov- 
erned. The objection to hedonism and Kantianism is 
that the end they give does not itself stand in any 
practical relation to conduct. We do not object to 
Kantianism because the theory does not help us as to 
specific acts, but because the end, formal law, does 
not help us, while the real moral end must determine 
the whole of conduct. 

Suppose a man thrown into the complex 
surroundings of life with an intelligence fully 
developed, but with no previous knowledge of right 



90 

or wrong, or of the prevailing moral code. He is 
to know, however, that goodness is to be found in 
the good will, and that the good will is the will 
moved by the mere idea of the universality of law. 
Can we imagine such an one deriving from his 
knowledge any idea of what concrete ends he ought 
to pursue and what to avoid? He is surrounded 
by special circumstances calling for special acts, 
and all he knows is that whatever he does is to be 
done from respect for its universal or legislative 
quality. What community is there between this 
principle and ivhat he is to do ? There is no bridge 
from the mere thought of universal law to any 
concrete end coming under the law. There is no 
common principle out of which grows the concep- 
tion of law on one hand, and of the various special 
ends of action, on the other. 

Suppose, however, that ends are independently 
suggested or proposed, will the Kantian conception 
serve to test their moral fitness ? Will the concep- 
tion that the end must be capable of being general- 
ized tell us whether this or that end is one to be 
followed ? The fact is, that there is no end what- 
ever^ that in or by itself, cannot be considered as 
self -identical, or as universal. If we presuppose a 
certain rule, or if we presuppose a certain moral 
order, it may be true that a given motive cannot be 
universalized without coming into conflict with this 



91 

presupposed rule or order. But aside from some 
moral system into connection with which a pro- 
posed end may be brought, for purposes of compar- 
ison, lying is just as capable as truth- telling of 
generalization. There is no more contradiction in 
the motive of universal stealing than there is in 
that of universal honesty unless there is as stand- 
ard some order or system of things into which the 
proposed action is to fit as a member. And this 
makes not the bare universality of the act, but the 
system, the real criterion for determining the moral- 
ity of the act. 

Thus Mill remarks, regarding Kant's four illustra- 
tions (Ante, p. 80). that Kant really has to employ utili- 
tarian considerations to decide whether the act is 
moral or riot. 

For the foregoing criticisms, see Bradley, Ethical 
Studies, Essay IV; Caird, Op. cit., Vol. II, pp. 185-186, 
and 212-214, and, indeed, the whole of eh. II of Bk. II. 

XXX. 

Criticism of 2. With reference to the furnish- 

Kantian ing of a common good or end. If 

Criterion the Kantian end is so formal and 

of Conduct, empty as not to enable us to bring 

into relation with one another the various acts of one 

individual, we may agree, without argument, that 

it does not provide us with an end which shall unify 

the acts of different men into a connected order of 

conduct. The moral end, the acting from regard 



92 

for law as law, IB presented to each individual by 
himself, entirely apart from his relations to others. 
That he has such relations may, indeed, furnish ad- 
ditional material to which the law must be applied, 
but is something to which the character of the law 
is wholly indifferent. The end is not in itself a 
social end, and it is a mere accident if in any case 
social considerations have to be taken into account. 
It is of the very quality of the end that it appeals 
to the individual as an isolated individual. 

It is interesting to note the way in which Kant, 
without expresslly giving up the purely formal 
character of the moral end, gives it more and more 
content, and that content social. The moral law is 
not imposed by any external authority, but by the ra- 
tional will itself. To be conscious of a universal self- 
imposed law is to be conscious of one's self as having 
a universal aspect. The source of the law and its end 
are both in the will in the rational self. Thus man 
is an end to himself, for the rational self is man. Such 
a being is a person" Rational beings are persons, be- 
cause their nature marks them out as ends in them- 
selves, i. e., as beings who should never be used merely 

as means S uch beings are not ends simply for us, 

whose existence as brought about by our action has 
value, but objective ends, i. e., beings whose existence 
is an end in itself, an end for which no other end can 
be substituted so as to reduce it to a mere means." 
Thus, we get a second formula. " Always treat human- 
ity, both In your own person and in the person of 
others, as an end and never merely as a means." (Ab- 
bott's Trans., pp. 46-47; Caird, Op. cit., Vol. II, 219). 
Here the criterion of action is no longer the bare self- 



93 

consistency of its motive, but its consistency with the 
rational nature of the agent, that which constitutes 
him a person. And, too, "the will of every rational 
being is likewise a universally law-giving will." (Ab- 
bott, p. 49). The conception of humanity embodied in 
others as well as in one's self is introduced, and thus 
our criterion is socialized. Even now, however, we 
have a lot of persons, each of whom has to be consid- 
ered as an end in himself, rather than a social unity as 
to which every individual has an equal and common 
reference. Kant advances to this latter idea in his 
notion of a " Kingdom of ends." " We get the idea of 
a complete and systematically connected totality of 
all endsa whole system of rational beings as ends in 
themselves as well as of the special ends which each 
of them may set up for himself i. e., a kingdom of 

ends Morality is the reference of all deeds to the 

legislation which alone can make such a kingdom pos- 
sible." (See Abbott's Trans., pp. 51-52). This trans- 
formation of a mere formal universal into a society or 
kingdom of persons while not sufficiently analyzed 
as Kant states it (see Caird, Vol.11, pp. 225-226) gives 
us truly a social criterion, and we shall hereafter meet 
something resembling it as the true ideal. As finally 
stated, it does not differ in essential content from Mill's 
individual who "conceives of himself only as a member 
of a body," or from Spencer's free man in a free society. 

XXXI. 

Value of Kantian We must not leave the Kant 
Theory. ian theory with the impression 

that it is simply the caprice of a philosopher's brain. 
In two respects, at least, it presents us, as we shall 
see, with elements that must be adopted; and even 
where false it is highly instructive. 



94 

Kant's fundamental error is in his conception 
that all desires or inclinations are for private pleas- 
ure, and are, therefore, to be excluded from the 
conception of the moral end. Kant's conclusion, ac- 
cordingly, that the good will is purely formal follows 
inevitably if ever it is granted that there is any 
intrinsic opposition between inclination as such, 
and reason or moral law as such. If there is such 
an opposition, all desire must be excluded from re- 
lation to the end. Wo cannot make a compromise 
by distinguishing between higher and lower de- 
sires. On the contrary, if the end is to have content, 
it must include all desires, leaving out none as in 
itself base or unworthy. Kant's great negative 
service was showing that the ascetic principle log- 
ically results in pure formalism meaning by ascetic 
principle that which disconnects inclinations from 
moral action. 

Kant's positive service was, first, his clear in- 
sight into the fact that the good is to be found only 
in activity; that the will itself, and nothing beyond 
itself, is the end; and that to adopt any other doc- 
trine, is to adopt an immoral principle, since it is to 
subordinate the will (character, self and personal- 
ity), to some outside end. His second great service 
was in showing the necessity of putting in abeyance 
the immediate satisfaction of each desire as it hap- 
pens to arise, and of subordinating it to some law 



95 

not to be found in the particular desire. He 
showed that not the particular desire, but only the 
desire as controlled by the idea of law could be the 
motive of moral action. And if he fell into the 
error of holding that this meant that the desire 
must be excluded from the moral motive, this error 
does not make it less true that every particular 
desire must be controlled by a universal law. The 
truth of asceticism is that the desire must be 
checked until subordinated to the activity of the 
whole man. See Caird, Op. cit., Vol. II, p. 200; 
pp. 203-207; 226-227. 

XXXII. 

TheProblem If we gather together the results 
and of our observations of hedonism 

Its Solution, and of Kantianism we get some- 
thing like the following problem and solution 
in outline. The end of action, or the good, is the 
realized will, the developed or satisfied self. This 
satisfied self is found neither in the getting of a 
lot of pleasures through the satisfaction of desires 
just as they happen to arise, nor in obedience to 
law simply because it is law. It is found in satis- 
faction of desires according to law. This law, 
however, is not something external to the desires, 
but is their own law. Each desire is only one 
striving of character for larger action, and the only 



96 

way in which it can really find satisfaction (that is, 
pass from inward striving into outward action) is as 
a manifestation of character. A desire, taken as a 
desire for its own apparent or direct end only, is an 
abstraction. It is a desire for an entire and con- 
tinuous activity, and its satisfaction requires that it 
fitted into this entire and continuous activity; that 
it b made conformable to the conditions which will 
bring the whole man into action. It is this fitting - 
in which is the law of the desire the * universal ' 
controlling its particular nature. This 'fitting-in' is 
no mechanical shearing off, nor stretching out, 
but a reconstruction of the natural desire till it 
becomes an expression of the whole man. The 
problem then is to find that special form of char- 
acter, of self, which include* and transforms all 
special desires. This form of character is at once 
the Good and the Law of man. 

We cannot be content with the notion that the 
end is the satisfaction of the self, a satisfaction 
at once including and subordinating the ends of 
the particular desire. This tells us nothing posi- 
tive however valuable it may be negatively in 
warning us against one-sided notions until we 
know what that whole self is, and in what con- 
cretely its satisfaction consists. As the first step 
towards such a more concrete formula, we may 
say: 



97 

XXXIII. 

The Moral End or In saying that this realiza- 
the Good is the tion is by a person and as a 
Realization by person we are saying nothing 
a Person and new. We are simply repeat- 
as a Person ing what we have already 
of Individuality, learned about moral conduct 
(Sec. III). Conduct is not that which simply reaches 
certain consequences a bullet shot from a rifle 
does that; there is conduct only when the conse- 
quences are foreseen; made the reason of action. 
A person is a being capable of conduct a being 
capable of proposing to himself ends and of attempt- 
ing to realize them. 

But what is the meaning of the rest of the for- 
mula ? What do we mean by individuality ? We 
may distinguish two factors or better two aspects, 
two sides in individuality. On one side, it means 
special disposition, temperament, gifts, bent, or 
inclination; on the other side, it means special 
station, situation, limitations, surroundings, oppor- 
tunities, etc. Or, let us say, it means specific capac- 
ity and specific environment. Each of these ele- 
ments, apart from the other, is a bare abstraction 
and without reality. Nor is it strictly correct to 
say that individuality is constituted by these two 
factors together. It is rather, as intimated above, 
that each is individuality looked at from a cer- 



98 

tain point of view, from within or from without. 
If we are apt to identify individuality with the 
inner side alone, with capacity apart from its sur- 
roundings, a little reflection will show the error. 
Even the most devoted adherent of " self-culture " 
would not hold that a gift could be developed, or a 
disposition manifested, in isolation from all exterior 
circumstances. Let the disposition, the gift be 
what it may (amiable or irascible, a talent for 
music or for abstract science, or for engineering), 
its existence, to say nothing of its culture, apart 
from some surroundings is bare nonsense. If a 
person shuts himself up in a closet or goes out into 
the desert the better to cultivate his capacities, 
there is still the desert or the closet there; and it 
is as conditioned by them, and with reference to 
them that he must cultivate himself. For more is 
true than that, as a matter of fact, no man can 
wholly withdraw himself from surroundings; the 
important'point is that the manner and the purpose 
of exercising his capacity is always relative to and 
dependent upon the surroundings. Apart from the 
environment the capacity is mere emptiness; the 
exercise of capacity is always establishing a relation 
to something exterior to itself. All we can say of 
capacity apart from environment is that if certain 
circumstances were supplied, there would be some- 
thing there. We call a capacity capability, possi- 



99 

bility, as if for the very purpose of emphasizing 
the necessity of external supplementing. 

We get the same fact, on the other side, by call- 
ing to mind that circumstances, environment are 
not indifferent or irrelevant to individuality. The 
difference between one individual and another lies 
as much in the station in which each is placed as in 
the capacity of each. That is to say, environment 
enters into individuality as a constituent factor, 
helping make it what it is. 

On the other hand, it is capacity which makes the 
environment really an environment to the individual. 

The environment is not simply the facts which 
happen objectively to lie about an agent; it is such 
part of the facts as may be related to the capacity 
and the disposition and gifts of the agent. Two mem- 
bers of the same family may have what, to the out- 
ward eye, are exactly the same surroundings, and 
yet each may draw from these surroundings wholly 
unlike stimulus, material and motives. Each has a 
different environment, made different by his own 
mode of selection; by the different way in which 
his interests and desires play upon the plastic ma- 
terial about him. It is not, then, the environment 
as physical of which we are speaking, but as it ap- 
peals to consciousness, as it is affected by the make- 
up of the agent. This is the practical or moral 
environment. The environment is not, then, 



100 

what is then and there present in space. To the 
Christian martyr the sufferings of his master, and 
the rewards of faithfulness to come to himself were 
more real parts of his environment than the stake 
and fire. A Darwin or a Wallace may find his en- 
vironment in South America or the Philippine 
Islands or, indeed, in every fact of a certain sort 
wherever found upon the earth or in whatever geo- 
logical era. A man of philanthropic instincts may 
find his environment among Indians or Congo 
negroes. Whatever, however near or remote in 
time and space, an individual's capacities and 
needs relate him to, is his environment. The mo- 
ment we realize that only what one conceives as 
proper material for calling out and expressing some 
internal capacity is a part of his surroundings, wo 
see not only that capacity depends upon envi- 
ronment, but that environment depends upon ca- 
pacity. In other words, we see that each in itself 
is an abstraction, and that the real thing is the in- 
dividual who is constituted by capacity and envi- 
ronment in their relation to one another. 

Function is a term which we may use to express 
union of the two sides of individuality. The idea 
of function is that of an active relation established 
between power of doing, on one side, and some- 
thing to be done on the other. To exercise a 
function as a student is not to cultivate tastes and 



101 

possibilities internally; it is also to meet external 
demands, the demands of fact, of teachers, of 
others needing knowledge. The citizen exercises 
his function not simply in cultivating sentiments of 
patriotism within ; one has to meet the needs of the 
city, the country in which one lives. The realiza- 
tion of an artistic function is not poring over emo- 
tions of beauty pumped up within one's self; it is 
the exercise of some calling. On the other hand, 
it hardly needs saying that the function of a stu- 
dent, a citizen, an artist, is not exercised in bare 
conformity to certain external requirements. With- 
out the inner disposition and inclination, we call 
conduct dead, perfunctory, hypocritical. An activ- 
ity is not functional, unless it is organic, expressing 
the life of the agent. 

A function thus includes two sides the exter- 
nal and the internal and reduces them to elements 
in one activity. We get an analogy in any animal 
function. The digestive function includes the ma- 
terial appropriated, just as much as it does the 
organ appropriating. It is the service, the work 
which the organ does in appropriating material. So, 
morally, function is capacity in action; environment 
transformed into an element in personal service. 
* Thus we get another formula for the moral end: 

The performance by a person of his specific 
function, this function consisting in an activity 



102 

which realizes wants and powers with reference to 
their peculiar surroundings. 

xxxiv. 

Moral Functions If morality consists in the 
as exercise of one's specific func- 

I nterests. tions, it follows that no detailed 

account of the content of the moral end can possi- 
bly be given. This content is thoroughly individual 
or infinite. It is concrete to the core, including 
every detail of conduct, and this not in a rigid 
formula, but in the movement of life. All we can 
do is, by abstraction, to select some of the main 
features of the end, such as the more common and 
the more permanent. While each individual has 
his own particular functions, which can no more be 
exhausted by definition or description than the 
qualities of any other individual object, it is also 
true that we can recognize certain typical functions 
to be found permanently and in all. These make, 
as it were, the skeleton of the moral end which each 
clothes with his own flesh and blood. 

Functions are interests objective interests were 
not the term tautological. Interests have three 
traits worth -special mention. 

1. They are active. An interest is not an emo- 
tion produced from without. It is the reaction of 
the emotion to the object. Interest is identified, in 
ordinary speech, with attention; we take an inter- 



103 

est, or, if we say simply ' interested,' that involves 
some excitation, some action just beginning. We 
talk of a man's interests, meaning his occupations 
or range of activities. 

2. They are objective. The emotion aroused 
goes out to some object, and is fixed upon that; we 
are always interested in something. The active 
element of interest is precisely that which takes it 
out of the inner mood itself and gives it a ter- 
minus, an end in an object. 

3. An interest is satisfaction. It is its own re- 
ward. It is not a striving for something unreal- 
ized, or a mere condition of tension. It is the 
satisfaction in some object which the mind already 
has. This object may be possessed in some 
greater or less degree, in full realization or in faint 
grasp, but interest attaches to it as possessed: This 
differentiates it from desire, even where otherwise 
the states are the same. Desire refers to the lack, 
to what is not present to the mind. One state of 
mind may be called both interest in, and desire for, 
knowledge, but desire emphasizes the unknown, 
while interest is on account of the finding of self, 
of intelligence, in the object. Interest is the union 
in feeling, through action, of self and an object. 
An interest in life is had when a man an prac- 
tically identify himself with some object lying 
beyond his immediate or already acquired self 



104 

and thus be led to further expression of himself. 
To have an interest, then, is to be alert, to have 
an object, and to find satisfaction in an activity 
which brings this object home to self. 

Not every interest carries with it complete satisfac- 
tion. But no interest can be wholly thwarted. The 
purer the interest, the more the interest is in the ob- 
ject for its own sake, and not for that of some ulterior 
consequence, the more the interest fulfills itself. " It 
is better to have loved and lost than never to have 
loved at all", and love is simply the hig-hest power of 
interest interest freed from all extrinsic stuff. 

Of the interests, two abstract forms may be rec- 
ognized, interest in persons and interest in things. 
And these may be subdivided: Interest in persons : 
interest in self and others. Interest in things 
into their contemplation ( knowledge ) and into their 
production (art). And art again may be either 
productive of things to be contemplated (fine art), 
or useful manufactures, industry, etc. The 
moral end, then, or the Good will consist in the 
exercise of these interests, varied as they may be in 
each individual by the special turn which his capa- 
cities and opportunities take. 

XXXV. 
The Exercise Let us now, as a means of ren- 

of Interests dering our conception of the 
as the moral end more concrete, consider 

Moral End. briefly each of the forms of in- 
terest. 



105 
1. Interest in self. We must free ourselves 

i 

from any notion that an interest in self is non- 
moral, if not actually immoral. The latter position 
is seldom consciously assumed, but it is not uncom- 
mon to have interest in self, under the name of 
prudence, marked off from the moral sphere. In- 
terest in self, if the interest is pure, is just as much 
an interest in the moral end as interest in anything 
or anybody else. Interest in self may take the 
form of selfishness, or of sentimentalism ; but this 
is only an impure interest, an interest not in self, 
but in some conseqences to which the self may be 
directed. Interest in self may take many forms, 
according to the side of self which is the object of 
attention, and according to the range of the self 
taken into account. A rudimentary form is pru- 
dence, but even this, instead of being non-moral, is, 
in proper place and degree, moral, as moral as be- 
nevolence; and, if not in its proper place, immoral. 
From such an interest there are all stages up to 
the interest in self as it most deeply and broadly is, 
the sense of honor, moral dignity, self-respect, 
conscientiousness, that attempt to be and to make 
the most of one's self, which is at the very root of 
moral endeavor. 

The ground that is usually given for making the 
distinction between Prudence, Self-Regard, Self-Love 
as non-moral, and Benevolence, Altruism etc., as moral, 
is that in the former case a mere regard for one's own 



106 

advantage dictates proper conduct, while in the latter 
case there must l>e a positive virtuous intent. We 
may, for example, be pointed to some cool calculating 
man who takes care of his health and his property, 
who indeed is generally 'prudent', because he sees that 
it is for his advantage, and be told that while such an 
end is not immoral it is certainly not moral. But in 
return it must be asked what is meant here by advan- 
tage? If by it is meant private pleasure, or advan- 
tage over somebody else, then this conduct does not 
spring from interest in self at all, but from interest in 
some exterior consequence, and as springing from such 
an impure interest is not simply non-moral, but posi- 
tively immoral. On the other hand, if 'advantage/ 
means regard for one's whole function, one's place in 
the moral order, then such interest in self is moral. 
Care for bodily health in the interest of efficiency in 
conduct is supremely moral beside reckless disregard 
of it in the interest of some supposed higher or more 
spiritual function. 

If it is meant that conduct is immoral because it 
springs from some interest on the part of the agent, 
the reply is that all conduct must so arise, and that 
any other supposition leads us immediately into ascet- 
icism and into formalism. 

2. Interest in others. The generic form of in- 
terest in others is sympathy, this being specified by 
the various forms of social organization of which the 
individual is a member. A person is, we have seen, 
one who can conceive of ends and can act to realize 
these ends. Only a person, therefore, can conceive 
of others as ends, and so have true sympathy. 

It is not meant, of course, that animals do not per- 
form acts which, de facto, are altruistic or even self- 



107 

sacrificing. What is meant is that the animal does 
not act from the idea of others of his kind as ends in 
themselves. If the animal does so act, it cannot be 
denied the name of person. 

True interest in others is pure, or disinterested, 
in the sense of having no reference to some further 
and external consequence to one's self. Interest in 
others need not be moral (or pure) any more than 
interest in self is necessarily immoral (or impure). 
It is a mistake to distinguish interest in self as 
egoistic and interest in others as altruistic. Gen- 
uine interests, whatever their object, are both ego- 
istic and altruistic. They are egoistic simply because 
they are interests imply satisfaction in a realized 
end. If man is truly a social being, constituted by 
his relationships to others, then social action must 
inevitably realize himself, and be, in that sense, 
egoistic. And on the other hand, if the individ- 
ual's interest in himself is in himself as a member of 
society, then such interest is thoroughly altruistic. 
In fact, the very idea of altruism is likely to carry 
a false impression when it is so much insisted upon, 
as it is nowadays in popular literature, as the 
essence of morality. The term as used seems to 
imply that the mere giving up of one's self to others, 
as others, is somehow moral. Just as there may be 
an immoral interest in self, so there may be an im- 
moral ' altruism.' It is immoral in any case to sac- 
rifice the actual relationships in the case, those 



108 

which demand action, to some feeling outside them- 
selves as immoral when the feeling to which the 
sacrifice is offered up is labelled ' benevolence', as 
when it is termed * greediness '. It is no excuse 
when a man gives unwisely to a beggar that he 
feels benevolent. Moral benevolence is the feeling 
directed toward a certain end which is known to be 
the fit or right end, the end which expresses the sit- 
uation. The question is as to the aim in giving. 
Apart from this aim, the act is simply relieving the 
agent's own feelings and has no moral quality. 
Rather it is immoral; for feelings do have a moral 
capacity, that is, a relation to ends of action, and 
hence to satisfy them on their account, to deprive 
them of their practical reference, is bad. Aside 
from what this illustrates, there is a tendency in the 
present emphasis of altruism to erect the principle 
of charity, in a sense which implies continued social 
inequality, and social slavery, or undue dependence 
of one upon another, into a fundamental moral 
principle. It is well to " do good " to others, but 
it is much better to do this by securing for them 
the freedom which makes it possible for them to 
get along in the future without such ' altruism ' from 
others. There is what has been well termed an 
" egotism of renunciation " ; a desire to de for others 
which, at bottom, is simply an attempt to regulate 
their conduct. Much of altruism is an egoism of a 



109 

larger radius, and its tendency is to " manufacture 
a gigantic self", as in the case where a father sacri- 
fices everything for his children or a wife for her 
husband. 

See Caircl, Op. cit., Vol. II, p. 402. See also Hinton, 
The Law Breaker, p. 287: "The real meaning 
of the difficulty about a word for " regard for others" 
is that we do not want it. It would mislead us if we 
had it. It is not a regard for others that we need, but 
simply a true regard, 'a regard to the facts, to nature; 
it is only a truth to facts in our regard, and its nature 
is obscured by a reference to "others", as if that were 

the essential point It is not as being for 

others, but as being true, that the regard for others is 
demanded." 

Some ethical writers have gone to the other 
extreme and held that all benevolence is a disguised 
or an enlightened selfishness, since having a neces- 
sary reference to self. The reference to self must 
be admitted; unless the action springs from an 
interest of the agent himself the act may be out- 
wardly useful, but cannot be moral. But the argu- 
ment alluded to inverts the true relation involved. 
If a man's interests are such that he can find satis- 
faction only in the satisfaction of others, what an 
absurdity to say that his acting from these inter- 
ests is selfish! The very fact of such identity of 
self with others in his interest is the proof of his 
unselfishness. 

See Leslie Stephen, Science of Ethics, p. 241, for an 
admirable discussion of this difficulty. When it is said 



110 

that your pain is painful to me, he says, the inference 
is ol ten "insinuated that I dislike your pain because 
it is painful to me in some special relation. I do not 
dislike it as your pain, but in virtue of some partic- 
ular consequence, such, for example, as its making you 
less able to render me a service. In that case I do not 
really object to your pain aft your pain at all, but only 
to some removable and accidental consequences." 
(And see his whole treatment of sympathy, pp. 230-245). 
The whole question is shown to come to this: Is my 
interest in, my sympathy with, your joy and sorrow as 
such, or in your joy and sorrow as contributing 1 to 
mine? If the latter, of course the interest is selfish, 
not being an interest in others at all. But if the for- 
mer, then the fact that such sympathy involves one's 
own satisfaction is the best proof that man is not sel- 
fishly constructed. When Stephen goes on to say that 
such sympathy does not involve the existence of a real 
unity larger than the individual, he seems to me to 
misread his own facts, probably because he conceives 
of this unity as some abstract or external thing. 

Discussion regarding self-love and benevolence, 
or, in modern phrase, egoism and altruism, has been 
rife in English ethics since the time ol Hobbes, and 
especially of Shaftesbury nnd Butler. See, in particu- 
lar, the Sermons of the latter, winch gave the central 
point of discussion for almost a century. With reier- 
ence to the special weakness of this point of view, 
with its co-ordination of two independent principles, 
see Green, Philosophical Works, Vol. Ill, pp 99-104. 
The essential lack (the lack which we have tried to 
make good in the definition ol individuality us the 
union of capacity and surroundings in function), was 
the failure to analyze the idea of the individual. 
Individuality being defined as an exclusive principle, 
the inevitable result was either (i.) the u disguised 



Ill 

selfishness" theory; or (ii.) the assumption of two 
fundamentally different principles in man. The ordi- 
nary distinction between prudence and virtue is an echo 
of the latter theory. Then, finally, (iii.) a third princi- 
ple, generally called conscience by Butler, was brought 
in as umpire in the conflict of prudence and virtue. 
Suggestive modern treatment of the matter, from 
a variety of points of view, will be found in Spencer, 
Data of Ethics, chs. XI-XIII; Stephen, Op. cit., ch. 
VI; Sidgwick, Op. cit., Bk. V, ch. VII; Royce, Op. 
it., ch. I V; Sorley, Ethics of Naturalism, pp. 134-150; 
Alexander, Op. cit., pp. 172-180; Caird, Op. cit., Vol.11, 
pp. 400-405; Paulsen, System der Ethik, pp. 295-311. 

3. Interest in Science and Art. Man is inter- 
ested in the world about him; the knowledge of the 
nature and relations of this world become one of 
his most absorbing pursuits. Man identifies him- 
self with the meaning of this world to the point that 
he can be satisfied only as he spells out and reads 
its meaning. (See, for example, Browning's 
"Grammarian's Funeral".) The scientific interest 
is no less a controlling motive of man than the per- 
sonal interest. This knowledge is not a means for 
having agreeable sensations; it is not dilettanteism 
or 'love of culture"; it is interest in the large and 
goodly frame of things. And so it is with art; man 
has interests which can be satisfied only in the 
reconstruction of nature in the way of the useful 
and the beautiful. 

I have made no distinction between 'fine' and 
1 useful ' art. The discussion of this question does not 



112 

belong here, but the rigid separation of them in aes- 
thetic theory seems to me to have no justification. 
Both are products of intelligence in the service of 
interests, and the only difference is in the range of 
intelligence and interests concerned. 'Use* is a lim- 
ited service and hence implies an external end; beauty 
is complete use or service, and hence not mere use at 
all, but self-expression. Historically, all art which has 
not been merely sentimental and 'literary' has 
sprung from interest in good workmanship in the 
realizing of an idea. 

It seems as if here interests violated their gen- 
eral law, and, in the case of use at least, were an 
interest in some ulterior end. But it may be ques- 
tioned whether a carponter whose aim was con- 
sciously beyond the work he was doing, would be 
a good workman and this whether the further 
end is his own private advantage, or social benefit 
at large. The thought of the further benefit to 
self and of the utility to accrue to some one else, 
will, if it becomes a part of what he is doing, un- 
doubtedly intensify his interest it must do so, for 
it enlarges its content. But to identify one's own 
or another's well-being with work, and to make the 
work a mere means to this welfare, are two quite 
different things: The good artisan " has his heart 
in his work". His self-respect makes it necessary 
for him to respect this technical or artistic capacity, 
and to do the best by it that he can without 
scrimping or lowering. To a good business man 



113 

business is not the mere means to money- making; 
and it is sentimentalism (and hence immoral) to 
demand that it be a mere means to the good of so- 
ciety. The business, if it is a moral one (and any 
business, so far as it is thus carried on, is moral), 
is carried on for the sake of the activity itself, as a 
realizing of capacity in a specific situation. 

XXXVI. 

The Moral We seem, however, to meet here, 
Quality in relation to science and art, a diffi- 
of Science, culty which threatens our whole 
theory. Can it be claimed, it may be asked, that 
devotion to science or art constitutes goodness in 
the same sense that devotion to the interests of 
one's family or state constitutes it? No one doubts 
that a good father or a good citizen is a good man, 
in so far forth. Are we ready to say that a good 
chemist or good carpenter, or good musician is, in 
so far, a good man? In a word, is there not a 
reference to the good of persons present in one case 
and absent in another, and does not its absence 
preclude the scientific and artistic activities from 
any share, as such, in the moral end ? 

It must be remembered that the moral end does 
not refer to some consequence which happens, de 
facto, *to be reached. It refers to an end milled ; 
i. 6., to an idea held to and realized as an idea. And 

this fact shows us the way to meet the query, in 

8 



114 

part at least. If, when we say good carpenter, or 
good merchant, we are speaking from the stand- 
point of results, independently of the idea con- 
ceived as end in the mind of the agent; if we mean 
simply, i we like what that man does', then the 
term good has no moral value. A rnari may paint 
4 good ' pictures and not be, in so far, a good man, 
but in this sense a man may do a great deal of 
1 good', and yet not be a good man. It was agreed 
at the outset that moral goodness pertains to the 
kind of idea or end which a man clings to, and not 
to what ho happens to effect visibly to others. 

If a scientific man pursues truth as a mere 
means to reputation, to wealth, etc., we do not (or 
should not) hesitate to call him immoral. 

This dors not mean that if he ////w/rvof the repu- 
tation, or of weatii, tie is immoral, for h^ may foresee 
wraith ami the reputation as necessarily bound up in 
what he is doing; it may become a part of the end. It 
means that if knowledge of truth is ;i mere munis to 
an end beyond it, the man is immoral. 

What reason is there why wo should not call him 
moral if ho does his work for its own sake, from 
interest in this cause which takes him outside his 
"own miserable- individuality", in Mill's phrase? 
After all, the phrase a * good father ' means but a 
character manifesting itself in certain relations, as 
is right according to these relations; the phrase has 
moral significance not in itself, but with reference 



115 

to the end aimed at by character. And so it is 
with the phrase * a good carpenter.' That also 
means devotion of character to certain outer rela- 
tions for their own sake. These relations may not 
be so important, but that is not lack of moral 
meaning. 

XXXVII, 

Adjustment So far we have been discussing 
to the moral ideal in terms of its 

Environment, inner side capacity, interest. 
We shall now discuss it on its outer or objective 
side as ' adjustment to environment ' in the phrase 
made familiar by the evolutionists. Certain cau- 
tions, however, must be noted in the use of the 
phrase. We must keep clearly in rnind the rela- 
tivity of environment to inner capacity; that it ex- 
ists only as one element of function. Even a plant 
must do something more than adjust itself to a 
fixed environment; it must assert itself against its 
surroundings, subordinating them and transforming 
them into material and nutriment; and, on the 
surface of things, it is evident that transformation 
of existing circumstances is moral duty rather than 
mexe reproduction of them. The environment 
must be plastic to the ends of the agent. 

But admitting that environment is made what it 
is by the powers and aims of the agent, what 
sense shall we attribute to the term adjustment? 



116 

Not^bare conformity to circumstances, nor bare ex- 
ternal reproduction of them, even when circum- 
stances are taken in their proper moral meaning. 
The child in the family who simply adjusts himself 
to his relationships in the family, may be living a 
moral life only in outward seeming. The citizen 
of the state may transgress no laws of the state, he 
may punctiliously fulfill every contract, and yet be 
a selfish man. True adjustment must consist in 
willing the maintenance and development of moral 
surroundings as one's own end. The child must 
take the spirit of the family into himself and live 
out this spirit according to his special membership 
in the family. So a soldier in the army, a friend 
in a mutual association, etc. Adjustment to intel- 
lectual environment is not mere conformity of ideas 
to facts. It is the living assimilation of these facts 
into one's own intellectual life, and maintaining 
and asserting them as truth. 

There are environments existing prior to the 
activities of any individual agent; the family, for 
example, is prior to the moral activity of a child 
born*into it, but the point is to see that ' adjust- 
ment', to*have ajnoral sense, means making the en- 
vironment a reality for one's self. A true descrip- 
tion of the case would say that the child takes for 
his own end, ends already existing for the wills of 
others. And, in making them his own, he creates and 



117 

supports for himself an environment that already 
exists for others. In such cases there is no special 
transformation of the existing environment; there 
is simply the process of making it the environment 
for one's self. So in learning, the child simply ap- 
propriates to himself the intellectual environment 
already in existence for others. But in the activity 
of the man of science there is more than such per- 
sonal reproduction and creation; there is increase, 
or even reconstruction of the prior environment. 
While the ordinary citizen hardly does more than 
make his own the environment of ends and inter- 
ests already sustained in the wills of others, the 
moral reformer may remake the whole. But 
whether one case or the other, adjustment is not 
outer conformity; it is living realization of certain 
relations in and through the will of the agent. 

XXXVHI. 

The Moral End is the Since the perform- 
Realization of ance of function is, 

a Community of Wills, on the other side, the 
creation, perpetuation, and further development of 
an environment, of relations to the wills of others, 
its performance is a common good. It satisfies 
others who participate in the environment. The 
member of the family, of the state, etc., in exer- 
cising his function, contributes to the whole of 
which he is a member by realizing its spirit in 



118 

himself. But the question discussed in section 
XXXVI recurs under another aspect. Granting 
that the satisfying of personal interests realizes a 
common good, what shall we say of the impersonal 
interests interests in science and art. Is the 
good carpenter or chemist not only in so far a good 
man, hut also a good social member? In other 
words, does every form of moral activity realize a 
common good, or is the moral end partly social, 
partly non social V 

One objection sometimes brought to the doctrine 
that the moral end is entirely social, may be now 
briefly dismissed. This is the objection that a man 
has moral duties toward hinwelf. Certainly, but what 
of ?i unset ft If he is essentially a social member, his 
duties toward himself have a social basis and bearing. 
The only relevant question is whether one is wholly a 
social member- whether scientific and artistic activi- 
ties may not be non-social. 

The ground here taken is that the moral end is 
wholly social. This does not mean that science 
and art are means to some social welfare beyond 
themselves. We have already stated that even the 
production of utilities must, as moral, be its own 
end. The position then is that intellectual and 
artistic interests are themtH'Ires social, when consid- 
ered in the completeness of their relations- that in- 
terest in the development of intelligence is, in and 
of itself, interest in the well-being of society. 

Unless this be true there is no moral end at all, 



119 

but only moral ends. There is no comprehensive 
unity in life, but a number of ends which, being 
irreducible to a common principle, must be com- 
bined on the best principle of compromise avail- 
able. We have no 'The Good 7 , but an aggregate of 
fragmentary ends. 

It helps nothing to say that this necessary unity is 
found in the self to be realized, unless we are pointed 
to something in the self that unites the social and non- 
social functions. Our objection is that the separation 
of intf'lleetudl interests from social makes a chasm in 
the self. 

For the same reason it follows that in the case 
of a collision of social with intellectual ends say 
the conflict of a man's interests as a member of a 
family with his interests in new scientific discovery 
no reconciliation is possible. If the interests are 
forms of social interest, there is a common end in 
both, on the basis of which the conflict can be re- 
solved. While such considerations do not prove 
that there is but one end, and that social, they may 
well make us hesitate about carelessly taking a 
position of which they are the logical consequence. 

Of course, every one recognizes that a certain 
amount of scientific and artistic interest is social 
in character. A certain amount of interest in truth, 
or in intelligence, a certain amount of susceptibility 
to beauty, a certain amount of devotion to utility, 
are universally recognized to be necessary to make 



120 

judicious, agreeable and efficient social members. 
The whole system of modern education has mean- 
ing only on this supposition. 

More than this: A certain amount of intelli- 
gence, and a certain amount of susceptibility to 
embodied ideals, must exist to give moral conduct. 
A moral end is, as we have seen, always a concep- 
tion, an idea. The very act of bringing conduct 
out of the impulsive into the moral sphere, depends 
upon the development of intelligence so as to trans- 
form a feeling into the perception of a situation. 
And, as we watch moral development from child- 
hood to maturity, is it not evident that progress 
consists in power to conceive of larger and better 
denned ends? to analyze the situation which de- 
mands active response, the function which needs 
exercise, into specific relations, instead of taking it 
partially or even upon some one else's say so? 
Conduct, so far as not based upon an intelligent 
recognition and realization of the relationships in- 
volved, is either sentimental, or merely habitual 
in the former case immoral, and iu the latter fail- 
ing of the complete morality possible. 

If the necessary part played in conduct by artis- 
tic cultivation is not so plain, it is largely because 
4 Art' has been made such an unreal Fetich a 
sort of superfine and extraneous polish to be acquired 
only by specially cultivated people. In reality, liv- 



121 

ing is itself the supreme art; it requires fineness of 
touch; skill and thoroughness of workmanship; 
susceptible response and delicate adjustment to a 
situation apart from reflective analysis ; instinctive 
perception of the proper harmonies of act and act, 
of man and man. Active art is the embodiment of 
ideals; the clothing of ideas otherwise abstract 
in their peculiar and fit garb of concrete outward 
detail; passive art is the quick and accurate 
response to such embodiments as are already 
made. What were human conduct without the one 
and the other ? 

Granting the necessity of knowledge and of 
its artistic application in conduct, the ques- 
tion arises as to where the line is to be drawn. 
Evidently, if anywhere, at specialisms, remote phil- 
osophic or mathematical endeavors; life- times 
spent in inventive attempts without appreciable 
outcome. But to draw the line is not easy. The 
remote of one generation is the social tool of the 
next; the abstract mathematics and physics of the 
sixteenth and seventeenth centuries are the great 
social forces of the nineteenth the locomotive, the 
telegraph, the telephone, etc. And how, in any 
case, can we tell a scientific investigator that up to 
a certain experiment or calculation his work may 
be social, beyond that, not ? All that we can say is 
that beyond a certain point its social character is not 



122 

obvious to sense and that the work must be carried 
on by faith. 

Thus it is that we dispose of objections like 
Bradley's (Ethical Studies, p. 202): " Nothing is 
easier than to suppose a life of art or speculation 
which, as far as we can see, though true to itself, 
has, so far as others are concerned, been sheer 
waste or even loss, and which knew that it was so." 
That we can not we any social result in such cases 
has nothing to do with the question whether or not 
the interests themselves are social. We may imag- 
ine a life of philanthropic activity, say of devotion 
to emancipation of slaves in a country wholly given 
over to slavery, or of a teacher in an unenlightened 
country, which, as far as we can see, ( though, in 
this case, as in the one referred to by Mr. Bradley, 
everything depends upon how far we can woe) has 
been sheer waste, BO far as influence on others is 
concerned. The point is whether in such cases the 
life lived is not one of devotion to the interests of 
humanity as such. 

We have been trying 1 to show that everyone admits 
that science and art, up to a certain point, are social, 
and that to draw a line where they cease to be so, is in 
reality to draw a line where we cease to see their social 
character. That we should cease to nee it, is necessary 
in the case of almost every advance. Just because the 
new scientific movement is new, we can realize its 
social effects only afterwards. But it may be ques- 
tioned whether the motive which actuates the man of 



123 

science is not, when fully realized, & faith in the social 
bearing of what he is doing-. If we were to go into a 
metaphysical analysis, the question would have to 
be laised whether a barely intellectual fact or theory 
be not a pure abstraction an unreality if kept apart 
entirely from the activities of men in relation to one 
another. 

XXXIX. 

Science Let us consider the problem on its 
and other side. What kind of an interest is 
Art our interest in persons, our distinct- 

as ively social interest? Suppose we 

Necessary attempt to separate our interests in 
Factors truth, beauty, and use from our iriter- 
of est in persons: Wliat remains in ihe 

Social iK'rsons 1o be iiilercsled in 1 ! Is not a 
Welfare, necessary part of out interest in per- 
sons, an interest, in them as beings fuliilling their 
respective intellectual and artistic capacities; and 
if we cut this out of our social interest, have we not 
maimed and stunted our interest in persons? We 
wish the fullest life possible to ourselves and to 
others. And the fullest life means largely a com- 
plete and free development oi capacities in knowl- 
edge and production production of beauty and use. 
Our interest in others is not satisfied as long as 
their intelligence is cramped, their appreciation of 
truth feeble, their emotions hard and uncompre- 
hensive, their powers of production compressed. 
To will their true good is to will the freeing of all 



124 

such gifts to the highest degree. Shall we say 
that their true good requires that they shall go to 
the point of understanding algebra, but not quater- 
nions, of understanding ordinary mechanics, but 
not to working out an electro magnetic theory of 
light? to ability to appreciate ordinary chords and 
and tunes, but not to the attempt to make further 
developments in music? 

And this throws light upon the case referred to 
by Mr. Bradley. Social welfare demands that the 
individual be permitted to devote himself to the 
fulfilling of any scientific or artistic capacity that 
he finds within himself provided, of course, it does 
not conflict with some more important capacity 
irrespective of results. To say to a man: You may 
devote yourself to this gift, provided you demon- 
strate beforehand its social bearing, would be to 
talk nonsense. The new discovery is not yet made. 
It is absolutely required by the interests of a pro- 
gressive society that it allow freedom to the indi- 
vidual to develop such functions as he finds in 
himself, irrespective of any proved social effect. 
Here, as elsewhere, morality works by faith, not by 
sight. 

Indeed the ordinary conception of social inter- 
ests, of benevolence, needs a large over-hauling. 
It is practically equivalent to doing something 
directly for others to one form or another of 



125 

charity. But this is only negative morality. A 
true social interest is that which wills for others 
freedom from dependence on our direct help, which 
wills to them the self -directed power of exercising, 
in and by themselves, their own functions. Any 
will short of this is not social but selfish, willing 
the dependence of others that we may continue 
benignly altruistic. The idea of " giving pleasure " 
to others, " making others happy", if it means any- 
thing else than securing conditions so that they 
may act freely in their own satisfaction, means 
slavery. 

As society advances, social interest must consist 
more and more in free devotion to intelligence for 
its own sake, to science, art and industry, and in 
rejoicing in the exercise of such freedom by others. 
Meantime, it is truth which makes free. 

See Spencer, Data of Ethics, pp. 249-257, where this 
doctrine is stated with great force. 

Where, finally, does the social character of sci- 
ence and art come in ? Just here : they are elements 
in the perfection of individuality, and they are ele- 
ments whose very nature is to be moving, not rigid ; 
distributed from one to another and not monopo- 
listic possessions. If there are forms of science 
and 'art which, at present, are static, being merely 
owned collections of facts, as one may have a col- 
lection of butterflies in a frame, or of etchings in a 



126 

closed portfolio, this is not because they are sci- 
ence and art, but imperfect science and art. To 
complete their scientific and artistic character is to 
net these facts in motion; to hurl them against the 
world of physical forces till nev. r instruments of 
man's activity are formed, and to set them in circu- 
lation so that others may also participate in their 
truth and rejoice in their beauty. So far as scien- 
tific or artistic attainments are treasured as indi- 
vidual possessions, so far it is true that they are 
not social- but so far it is also true that they are 
immoral: indeed that they are not fully scientific 
or artistic, being subordinated to having certain 
sensations. 

The intellectual movement of the last four or 
five centuries has resulted in an infinite specializa- 
tion in methods, and in an immense accumulation 
of fact. It is quite true, since the diversity of fact 
and of method has not yet been brought to an 
organic unity, that their social bearing is not yet 
realized. But when the unity is attained (as at- 
tained it must be if there is unity in the object of 
knowledge), it will pass into a corresponding unity 
of practice. And then the question as to the social 
character of even the most specialized knowledge 
will seem absurd. It will be to ask whether men 
can coftperate better when they do mot know than 
when they do know what they want. Meantime 



127 

the intellectual confusion, and the resulting di- 
vorce of knowledge from practice, exists. But this 
constitutes a part of the environment of which 
action must take heed. It makes it one of the 
pressing duties , that every man of intelligence 
should do his part in bringing out the public and 
common aspects of knowledge. The duty of the 
present is the socializing of intelligence the real- 
izing of its bearing upon social practice. 

XL. 

The Ethical We have attempted to show that 
Postulate, the various interests are social in 
their very nature. We have not attempted to show 
that this can be seen or proved in any given case. 
On the contrary, in most, if not all cases, the agent 
acts from a faith that, in realizing his own capacity, 
he will satisfy the needs of society. If he were 
asked to prove that his devotion to his function 
were right because certain to promote social good, 
he might well reply: " That is none of my affair. 
I have only to work myself out as strength and 
opportunity are given me, and let the results take 
care of themselves. I did not make the world, and 
if it turns out that devotion to the capacity which 
was given me, and loyalty to the surroundings in 
which I find myself do not result in good, I do not 
hold myself responsible. But, after all, I cannot 
believe that it will so turn out. What is really 



128 



good for me must turn out good for all, or else 
there is no good in the world at all." The basis, 
in a word, of moral conduct, with respect to the 
exercise of function, is a faith that moral self-satis- 
faction (that is, satisfaction in accordance with the 
performance of function as already defined) means 
social satisfaction or the faith that self and others 
make a true community. Now such faith or con- 
viction is at the basis of all moral conduct not 
simply of the scientific or artistic. Interest in self 
must mean belief in one's business, conviction of 
its legitimacy and worth, even prior to any sensible 
demonstration. Under any circumHtanceH, such dem- 
onstration can extend only to past action; the social 
efficiency of any new end must be a matter of 
faith. Where such faith is wanting, action becomes 
halting and character weak. Forcible action fails, 
and its place is taken by a feeble idealism, of 
vague* longing for that which is not, or by a pessi- 
mistic and fruitless discontent with things as they 
are leading, in either case, to neglect of actual 
and pressing duty. The basis of moral strength is 
limitation, the resolve to be one's self only, and to 
be loyal to the actual powers and surroundings of 
that self. The saying of Carlyle's about doing 
the " duty that lies nearest ", and of Goethe's that 
u America is here or nowhere ", both imply that 
faith in the existing moral capacity and environ- 



129 

ment is the basis of conduct. All fruitful and 
sound human endeavor roots in the conviction that 
there is something absolutely worth while, some- 
thing t divine ' in the demands imposed by one's 
actual situation and powers. In the great moral 
heroes of the world the conviction of the worth of 
their destiny, and of what they were meant to do, 
has amounted to a kind of fatalism. They have 
done not simply what they could do, but what they 
must do. 

On the other hand, effective social interest is 
based upon what is vaguely called ' faith in hu- 
manity ', or, more specifically, belief in the value of 
each man's individuality, belief in some particular 
function which he might exercise, given appropri- 
ate conditions and stimuli. Moral interest in others 
must be an interest in their possibilities, rather 
than in their accomplishments; or, better, inr 
their accomplishments so far as these testify 
to a fulfilling of function to a working out of ca- 
pacity. Sympathy and work for men which do not 
grow out of faith in them are a perfunctory and 
unfertile sort of thing. 

This faith is generally analyzed no further; it 
is left as faith in one's 'calling' or in 'humanity'. 
But what is meant is just this: in the performing 
of such special service as each is capable of, there 

is to be found not only the satisfaction of self, but 
9 



130 

also the satisfaction of the entire moral order, the 
furthering of the community in which one lives. 
All moral conduct is based upon such a faith; and 
moral theory must recognize this as the postulate 
upon which it rests. In calling it a postulate, we 
do not mean that it is a postulate which our theory 
makes or must make in order to be a theory ; but 
that, through analysis, theory finds that moral 
practice makes this postulate, and that with its 
reality the reality end value of conduct are bound 
up. 

In calling it a postulate we do not mean to call 
it improvable, much less un verifiable, for moral 
experience is itself, so far as it goes, its verification. 
But wo mean that the further consideration of this 
postulates its demonstration or (if the case so bo) 
its refutation, do not belong to the realm of ethics 
as such. Each branch of human experience rests 
upon some presupposition which, for that branch, 
is ultimate. The further inquiry into such pre- 
suppositions belong not to mathematics, or physics, 
or ethics, but to metaphysics. 

Unless, then, we are to extend our ethical theory 
to inquire into the possibility and value of moral 
experience, unless, that is, we are to make an ex- 
cursion into the metaphysics of ethics, we have here 
reached our foundation. The ethical postulate, the 
presupposition involved in conduct, in this: 



131 

IN THE REALIZATION OF INDIVIDUALITY THERE 18 
FOUND ALSO THE NEEDED REALIZATION OF SOME COM- 
MUNITY OF PERSONS OF WHICH THE INDIVIDUAL 18 A 
MEMBER; AND, CONVERSELY, THE AGENT WHO DULY 
SATISFIES THE COMMUNITY IN WHICH HE SHARES, BY 
THAT SAME CONDUCT SATISFIES HIMSELF. 

Otherwise put, the postulate is that there is a 
community of persons; a good which realized by 
the will of one is made not private but public. 
It is this unity of individuals as respects the end 
of action, this existence of a practical common 
good, that makes what we call the moral order of 
the world. 

Shakespeare has stated the postulate- 
To thine ownself be true; 
And it must follow, as the night the day, 
Thou can'st not then be false to any man. 

Its significance may be further developed by 
comparing it with the scientific postulate. 

All science rests upon the conviction of the thor- 
ough-going and permanent unity of the world of 
objects known a unity which is sometimes termed 
the ' uniformity of nature ' or the i reign of law ' ; 
without this conviction that objects are not mere 
isolated and transitory appearances, but are con- 
nected together in a system by laws or relations, 
science would be an impossibility. Moral experience 
makes for the world of practice an assumption anal- 
ogous in kind to that which intellectual experience 



132 

makes for the*world of knowledge. And just as it 
is not the affair of science, as such, or even of logic 
(the theory of science) to justify this presupposi- 
tion of science, or to do more than show its presence 
in intellectual experience, so it is not the business 
of conduct, or even of ethics (the theory of con- 
duct) to justify what we hav<> termed the 'ethical 
postulate'. In each case the further inquiry be- 
longs to metaphysics. 

XLI. 

Does the End We have now concluded that 
Proposed an end which may be termed in- 
Serve as a differently 'The Realization of 
Criterion of Individuality', 'The Performance 
Conduct? of Specific Functions', 'The Sat- 
isfaction of Interests 1 , 'The Idealization of a Com- 
munity of Individuals ' is the moral end. Will 
this end serve the two aims (seo Sec. XYI) required 
of a criterion, or standard: (1) Will it unify in- 
dividual conduct? (-) Will it afford a common 
good? We have just been endeavoring to show 
that it does both of these things; that as the reali- 
zation of one's specific capacity, it unifies individual 
conduct, and that, as the performance of function, it 
serves to satisfy the entire community. To take 
up just these points, accordingly, would involve a 
repetition of what has been said, and we shall 
therefore take up instead some aspects of the indi- 



133 



vidual and social unity of conduct, not already con- 
sidered. 

1. The System of Individual Conduct. We 
must be careful not to interpret the idea of 
specific function too rigidly or abstractly. It does 
not mean that each one has some supreme mission 
in life to which everything else must be sacrificed 
that a man is to be an artist, or a soldier, or a 
student, or a day-laborer and nothing else. On the 
contrary, the idea of function is that which com- 
prehends all the various sides of life, and it cannot 
be narrowed below the meaning we have already 
given: the due adjustment of capacity and sur- 
roundings. Wherever there is any capacity or any 
circumstance, no matter how trivial, there is some- 
thing included in the exercise of function, and, 
therefore to be satisfied according to its place, of 
course, in the whole of life. Amusements and all 
the minor details of life are included within the 
scope of morality. They are elements in the exer- 
cise of function, and their insignificance and triv- 
iality does not exclude them from the grasp of 
duty and of the good. It is a mistake to suppose 
that because it is optional or indifferent as it con- 
stantly is what acts among the minor details of 
life' are to be done or left undone, or unimportant 
whether they are done or left undone at all, there- 
fore such acts have no moral value. Morality con- 



134 

gists in treating them just as they are if they are 
slight or trivial they are to be performed as slight 
and trivial. Morality does not simply permit the 
performance of such acts, but demands it. To try 
to make, in the interests of duty, a serious matter 
out of every detail of life would be immoral as 
much so, in kind, as to make Hght of momentous 
matters. 

See Alexander, Op. cit. pp. 53-54. 
Bradley, Op. cit., pp, 194 197. 

Consider, also, how this conception of the end 
stands in definite relation to concrete acts; how it 
explains the possibility of decision as to whether 
this or that proposed act is right. We do not have 
to trace the connection of the act with some end 
beyond, as pleasure, or abstract law. We have 
only to analyze the act itself. We have certain 
definite and wholly concrete facts; the given capac- 
ity of the person at the given moment, and his 
given surroundings. The judgment as to the 
nature of these facts is, in and of itself, a judgment 
as to the act to be done. The question is not: 
What is the probability that this act will result in 
the balance of maximum pleasure; it is not what 
general rule can we hunt up under which to bring 
this case. It is simply: What is this case? The 
moral act is not that which satisfies some far away 
principle, hedonistic or transcendental. It is that 



135 

which meets the present, actual situation. Difficul- 
ties indeed, arise, but they are simply the difficulty 
of resolving a complex case; they are intellectual, 
not moral. The case made out, the moral end 
stands forth. No extraneous manipulation, to bring 
the case under some foreign end, is required. 

And this suggests the elasticity of the criterion. 
In fact moral conduct is entirely individualized. 
It is where, when, how and of whom. There has 
been much useless discussion as to the absolute or 
relative character of morals useless because the 
terms absolute and relative are not defined- If abso- 
lute is taken to mean immobile and rigid, it is any- 
thing but desirable that morals should be absolute. 
If the physical world is a scene of movement, in 
which there is no rest, it is a poor compliment to 
pay the moral world to conceive of it as static and 
lifeless. A rigid criterion in a world of develop- 
ing social relations would speedily prove no crite- 
rion at all. It would be an abstract rule, taking no 
account of the individualized character of each act; 
its individuality of capacity and of surroundings, 
of time, place and relationships involved. A truly 
absolute criterion is one which adjusts itself to each 
case according to the specific nature of the case; 
one. which moves with the moving world. On the 
other hand, if relative means uncertain in application, 
changing in time and place without reason for change 



136 

in the facts themselves, then certainly the criterion is 
not relative. If it means taking note of all con- 
crete relations involved, it is relative. The abso- 
luteness, in fine, of the standard of action consists 
not in some rigid statement, but in never- failing 
application. Universality here, as elsewhere, re- 
sides not in a thing, but in a way, a method of 
action. The absolute standard is the one applica- 
ble to all deeds, and the conception of the exercise 
of function is thus absolute, covering all conduct 
from the mainly impulsive action of the savage to 
the most complex reaches of modern life. 

Aristotle's well known theory of the 'mean' 
seems to have its bearing here. "It is possible," he 
says (Peters' trans, of Ethics, p. 46), " to feel fear, 
confidence, desire, anger, pity, and generally to be 
affected pleasantly and painfully, either too much or 
too little- in either case wrongfully; but to be 
affected thus at the right times, and on the right occa- 
sions, and toward the right persons, and with the 
right object and in the right fashions, is the mean 
course and the best course, and these are characteris- 
tics of virtue." The right time, occasion, person, pur- 
pose and fashion what is it but the complete indi- 
vidualization of conduct in order to meet the whole 
demands of the whole situation, instead of some ab- 
straction? And ^ what else do we mean by fit, due, 
proper, right action, but that which just hits the 
mark, without falling short or deflecting, and, to mix 
the metaphor, without slopping over? 

2. The system of social conduct, or common 
good. Moral conduct springs from the faith that 



137 

all right action is social and its purpose is to justify 
this faith by working out the social values in- 
volved. The term 4 moral community ' can mean 
only a unity of action, made what it is by the co- 
operating activities of diverse individuals. There is 
unity in the work of a factory, not in spite of, but 
because of the division of labor. Each workman 
forms the unity not by doing the same that every- 
body else does, or by trying to do the whole, but by 
doing his specific part. The unity is the one ac- 
tivity which their varied activities make. And so 
it is with the moral activity of society and the 
activities of individuals. The more individualized 
the functions, the more perfect the unity. (See 
section LII. ) 

The exercise of function by an agent serves, 
then, both to define and to unite him. It makes him 
a distinct social member at the same time that it 
makes him a member. Possession of peculiar ca- 
pacities, and special surroundings mark one per- 
son off from another and make him an individual; 
and the due adjustment of capacities to surround- 
ings (in the exercise of function) effects, therefore, 
the realization of individuality the realization of 
what we specifically are as distinct from others. 
At the same time, this distinction is not isolation; 
the exercise of function is the performing of a 
-special service without which the social whole is de- 



138 

fective. Individuality means not separation, but 
defined position in a whole; special aptitude in 
constituting the whole. 

We are now in a position to take up the consid- 
eration of the two other fundamental ethical con- 
ceptions obligation and freedom. These ideaa 
answer respectively to the two sides of the exercise 
of function. On the one hand, the performing of 
a function realizes the social whole. Man is thus 
4 bound ' by the relations necessary to constitute 
this whole. He is subject to the conditions which 
the existence and growth of the social unity im- 
pose. He is, in a word, under obligation ; the per- 
formance of his function is duty owed to the com- 
munity of which he is a member. 

But on the other hand, activity in the way of 
function realizes the individual; it is what makes 
him an individual, or distinct person. In the per- 
formance of his own function the agent satisfies his 
own interests and gains power. In it is found his 
freedom. 

Obligation thus corresponds to the social satis- 
faction, freedom to the ^//-satisfaction, involved in 
the exercise of function ; and they can no more 
be separated from each other than the correlative 
satisfaction can be. One has to realize himself as 
a member of a community. In this fact are found 
both freedom and duty. 



139 
CHAPTER II THE IDEA OF OBLIGATION. 



XLII. 

Theories Regarding The idea of obligation 
Moral Authority, or duty has two sides. 
There is the idea of law, of something which con- 
trols conduct, and there is the consciousness of the 
necessity of conforming to this law. There is, of 
course, no separation between the two sides, but 
the consideration of the latter side the recogni- 
tion of obligation may be best dealt with in dis- 
cussing conscience. Here we shall deal simply with 
the fact that there is buch a thing in conduct as 
law controlling action, and constituting obligation. 
Theories regarding obligation may, for our pur- 
poses, be subdivided into those which make its 
exercise restraint or coercion (and which therefore 
hold that in perfect moral conduct, duty as such 
disappears); and those which hold that obliga- 
tion is a normal element in conduct as such, and 
that it is not, essentially, but only under certain 
circumstances, coercive. Of the former type, some 
theories (mainly the hedonistic) regard the re- 
straint as originally imposed from without upon 
the desires of the individual, while others (as the 
Kantian) regard it as imposed by man's reason 
upon his desires and inclinations. 



140 

XLIII. 

Bain's It is obvious that the question 

Theory of of obligation presents considerable 
Obligation, difficulty to the hedonistic school. 
If the end of conduct is pleasure, as the satisfac- 
tion of desire, why should not each desire be satis- 
fied, if possible, as it arises, and thus pleasure 
secured? What meaning is there in the term 
4 duty ' or ' obligation ' if the moral end or good 
coincides wholly with the natural end of the incli- 
nations themselves y It is evident, at all events, that 
the term can have significance only if there is 
some cause preventing the desires as they arise 
from natural satisfaction. The problem of obliga- 
tion in hedonism thus becomes the problem of 
discovering that outside force which restrains, or, at 
least, constrains, the desire from immediate gratifi- 
cation. According to Bain, this outside force is 
social disapprobation manifested through the form 
of punishment. 

" 1 consider that the proper meaning, or import of 
the terms [duty, obligation] refers to that class of 
action which is enforced by the sanction ot punish- 
ment TJie powers that impose the obligatory 

sanction are Law and Society, or the community acting 
through the Government by public judicial acts, and 
apart from the Government by the unofficial expres- 
sions of disapprobation and the exclusion from social 
good offices ". Emotions and Will, p. 28G. See also pp. 
321-323 and p. 527. 



141 

Through this * actual and ideal avoidance of cer- 
tain acts and dread of punishment ' the individual 
learns to forego the gratification of some of his nat- 
ural impulses, and learns also to cultivate and even 
to originate desires not at first spontaneous. " The 
child is open from the first to the blame and praise 
of others, and thus is led to do or avoid certain acts". 

On the model, however, of the action of this 
external authority there grows up, in timo an 
internal authority " an ideal resemblance of public 
authority " (p. 287), or " a fac simile of the system 
of government around us " (p. 313). 

"The sentiment, at first formed and cultivated by 
the relations of actual command and obedience, may 
come at last to stand upon an independent foundation. 

When the young 1 mind, accustomed at the 

outset to implicitly obeying any set of rules is suffi- 
ciently advanced to appreciate the motive the utilities 
or the sentiment that led to their imposition the 

character of the conscience is entirely changed 

"Regard is now had to the intent and meaning of the 
law, and not to the mere fact of its being prescribed 
by some power " (E. and AV M p. 318). 

But when the sense of obligation becomes entirely 
detached from the social sanction, "even then the 
notion, sentiment or form of duty is derived from 
what society imposes, although the particular matter 
is quite different. Social obligation develops in the 
mind -originally the feeling and habit of obligation, 
and this remain's although the particular articles are 
changed" (page 319, note). Cf. also Bain, Moral Sci- 
ence, pp. 20-21 and 41-43. 



142 

XLIV. 

Spencer's Spencer's theory is, in substance, 
Theory of an enlarged and better analyzed 
Obligation, restatement of Bain's theory. Bain 
nowhere clearly states in what the essence of obli- 
gation consists, when it becomes independent, when 
the internal fac simile is formed. Why should I 
not gratify my desires as I please in case social 
pressure is absent or lets up ? Spencer supplies 
the missing element. According to him, "the essen- 
tial trait in the moral consciousness is the control 
of some fooling or fool ings by some other feeling 
or feelings 1 ' (Data of Ethics, p. 118). The kind 
of fooling which controls is that which is more com- 
plex and which relates to more remote ends; or, 
wo aro 'obliged ' to give up more immediate, special 
and direct pleasures for the sake of securing more 
general, remote and indirect ones. Obligation, in 
its essence, is the surrender or subordination of 
present to future satisfaction. This control, re- 
straint, or suppression nm\ bo 'independent 1 or, 
self -imposed, but is not so at. first, either in tho 
man or in the child. Prior to self restraint are the 
restraints imposed by the u visible ruler, the invisi- 
ble ruler and society at large" 1 the policeman, the 
priest and public opinion. Tho man is induced to 
postpone immediate gratification through his fear of 
others, especially of the chief, of tho dead and of 



143 

social displeasure " legal penalty, supernatural 
punishment and social reprobation". Thus there 
grows up the sense of obligation. This refers at first 
only to the above-mentioned extrinsic effects of 
action. But finally the mind learns to consider the 
intrinsic effect of the action itself the evil inflicted 
by the evil deed, and then the sense of duty, or 
coercion, evolved through the aforesaid external 
agencies, becomes transferred to this new mode of 
controlling action. Desires are now controlled 

through considerations of what their own effects 

o 

would be, were the desires acted upon. 

It follows "that the sense of duty or moral obli- 
gation is transitory, and will diminish as fast as 
moralization increases " (page 127). Even when 
compulsion is self-imposed, there is still compul- 
sion, coercion, and this must be done away with. 
It is done away with as far as an act which is at 
first done only for the sake of its own remoter 
consequences comes to be done for its own sake. 
And this will ultimately occur, if the act is con- 
tinued, since "persistence in performing a duty 
ends in making it a pleasure '\ 

See Guyau, La Morale Anglaise Conteinporaine, 
besides the works of Bain and Spencer. In addition 
to objections which will forthwith be made, we may 
here note a false abstraction of Spencer's. He makes 
the act and its consequences two things, while the act 
and its consequences (provided they are known as 



144 

such) are the same thing, no matter whether conse- 
quences are near or remote. The only distinction is 
that consequences once not known as such at all are 
seen in time to be really consequences, and thus to be 
part of the content of the act. The transfer from the 
"external consequences" imposed by the ruler, priest 
and public-opinion to the intrinsic consequences of the 
act itself, is thus a transfer from an immoral to a 
moral basis. This is very different from a change 
of the form of obligation itself. 

XLV. 

Criticism Putting aside the consideration of 
of these the relation of desire to duty, (the 
Theories, question whether duty is essentially 
coercive) until after we have taken up the Kantian 
idea of obligation, we may note the following 
objections to the theories just stated. Their great 
defect 'is that they do not give us any method 
of differentiating moral coercion (or obligation) 
from the action of mere superior physical force. 
Taking it (first) upon the side of the individual : IB 
there any reason why the individual submits to the 
external authority of government except that he has 
to do so ? He may argue that, since* others possess 
superior force, he will avoid certain pains by con- 
forming to tneir demands, but such yielding, 
whether temporary or permanent, to superior force 
is very far from being a recognition that one ought 
to act as the superior force dictates. The theories 
must logically commit us to the doctrine that i might 



145 

makes right' in its baldest form. Every one knows 
that, when the individual surrenders the natural 
gratifications of his desires to the command of 
others, if his sole reason is the superior force of the 
commanding party, he does not forego in the sur- 
render his right to such gratification the moment 
he has the chance to get it. Actual slavery would 
be the model school of duties, if these theories were 
true. 

The facts adduced by Bain and Spencer the 
growth of the recognition of duties in the child 
through the authority of the parents, and in the 
savage through the use of authority by the chief 
are real enough, but what they prove is that obliga- 
tion may be brought home to one by force, not that 
force creates obligation. The child and the man 
yield to force in such a way that their sense of duty 
is developed only in case they recognize, implicitly, 
the force or the authority as already right Let it 
be recognized that rightful force (as distinct from 
mere brute strength) resides in certain social 
authorities, and these social authorities may do 
much, beyond the shadow of doubt, to give effect to 
the special deeds and relations which are to be con- 
sidered obligatory. These theories, in fine, take 
the fact of obligation for granted, and, at most, only 
show the historical process by which its fuller 

recognition is brought about. Force in the service 
10 



146 

of right is one thing ; force as constituting and 
creating right is another. 

And this is to say (secondly), considering the 
matter from the side of society, that the theories of 
Bain and Spencer do not explain why or how social 
authority should exercise coercive force over the 
individual. If it is implied that they do so in the 
moral interests of the individual or of the com- 
munity, this takes it for granted that there already is 
in existence a moral ideal obligatory upon the 
individual. If it is implied that they exercise 
coercive force in the interests of their own private 
pleasure, this might establish a despotism, or lead 
to a political revolt, but it is difficult to see how it 
could create the fact of duty. When we consider 
any concrete case, we see that society, in its com- 
pelling of the individual, is possessed of moral 
ideals; and that it conceives itself not merely as 
having the power to make the individual conform to 
them, nor as having the right merely; but as under 
the bounden duty of bringing home to the individual 
his duties. The social authorities do not, perforce, 
create morality, but they embody and make effective 
the existing morality. It is only just because the 
actions which they impose are thought of as good, 
good for others as for themselves, that this imposi- 
tion is taken out of the realm of tyranny into that of 
duty (see Sec. XXXVIII). 



147 

XLVI. 

The Kantian As we have seen, Kant takes the 
Theory of conception of duty as the primary 
Obligation, ethical notion, superior to that of 
the good, and places it in the most abrupt opposi- 
tion to desire. The relation of duty to desire is 
not control of some feelings by others, but rather 
suppression of all desire (not in itself, but as a 
motiw of action) in favor of the consciousness of 
law universal. We have, on one side, according to 
Kant, the desire and inclination, which are sensuous 
and pathological. These constitute man's ' lower 
nature '. On the other side there is lleasou, which 
is essentially universal, above all caprice and all 
prostitution to private pleasure. This lleason, or 
' higher nature ', imposes a law upon the sentient 
being of man, a law which takes the form of a 
command (the i Categorical Imperative '). This 
relation of a higher rational nature issuing com- 
mands to a lower sensuous nature (both within man 
himself), is the very essence of duty. If man 
were wholly a sentient being, he would have only 
to follow his natural impulses, like the animals. 
If he were only a rational being, he would necessa- 
rily obey his reason, and there would still be no 
talk 'of obligation. But because of the dualism, 
because of the absolute opposition between Reason 
and Desire, man is a being subject to obligation. 



148 

Reason says to the desires "Thou shalt " or " Thou 
shalt not". Yet this obligation is not externally 
imposed; the man as rational imposes it upon him- 
self as sensuous. Thus Kant says that, in the 
realm of morality, man is both sovereign and sub- 
ject. 

The reflex influence of Rousseau's social theories 
upon Kant's moral doctrines in this respect is worthy 
of more attention than it usually receives. Kant's 
moral theory is hardly more than a translation of 
Rousseau's politics into ethical terms, through its 
union with Kant's previously established dualism of 
reason and sense. 

XLVII. 

Criticism of the 1. No one can deny that a 
Kantian genuine opposition exists be- 
Theory. tween the ' natural' desires and 
moral activity. The being that satisfies each desire 
or appetite as it arises, without reference of it to, 
or control of it by, some principle, has not had the 
horizon of conduct lift before him. But Kant 
makes the satisfaction of desire as such (not of 
this or that desire) antagonistic to action from 
duty. Kant was forced into this position by his 
fundamental division of sense from reason, but it 
carries with it its own condemnation and thus that 
of the premises from which it is derived. It comes 
to saying that the actual desires and appetites 
are not what they ought to be. This, in itself, 



149 

is true enough. Bat when Kant goes on to 
say, as he virtually does, that what ought to be can- 
not be, that the desires as such cannot be brought 
into harmony with principle, he has made the 
moral life not only a riddle, but a riddle with no 
answer. If mankind were once convinced that the 
moral ideal were something which ought to be but 
which could not be, we may easily imagine how 
much longer moral endeavor would continue. The 
first or immediate stimulus to moral effort is the 
conviction that the desires and appetites are not 
what they should be; the underlying and continu- 
ing stimulus is the conviction that the expression of 
desires in harmony with law is the sole abiding good 
of man. To reconcile the two is the very meaning of 
the moral struggle (see Sec. LXIV). Strictly, ac- 
cording to Kant, morality would either leave the 
appetites untouched or would abolish them in 
either case destroying morality. 

See Caird, Op. cit., Vol. II, pp. 226-28. 

2. Kant again seems to be on the right track 
in declaring that obligation is not anything exter- 
nally imposed, but is the law of man's being, self- 
imposed. This principle of ' autonomy ' is the 
only escape from a theory of obligation which 
would make obligation external, and regard for it 
slavish fear, or servile hope of reward. To regard 
even a Divine Being as the author of obligation is 



150 

to make it a form of external constraint, appealing 
only to hope or fear, unless this Divine Being is 
shown to be organically connected with self. 

But this abstract universal reason which some- 
how dwells, without mediation or reason, in each 
individual, seems to be somewhat scholasHc, a trifle 
mythological. There is undoubtedly in man's ex- 
perience a function which corresponds to what 
Kant is aiming, thus mythologically, to describe. 
But it is one thing to recognize an opposition of a 
desire, in its isolation, to desire as organic to the 
function of the whole man; it is another to split 
man into a blank dualism of an abstract reason, 
on one side, having no antecedents or bearings, and 
of a mess of appetites, having only animal rela- 
tionship, on the other. The truth that Kant is 
aiming to preserve seems to be fairly stated as two- 
fold: first, that duty is self-imposed, and thus 
the dutiful will autonomous or free; and, sec- 
ond, the presence of struggle in man between 
a ' lower ' and a ' higher '. The first point 
seems to be sufficiently met by the idea already ad- 
vanced that self, or individuality, is essentially 
social, being constituted not by isolated capacity, 
but by capacity acting in response to the needs of 
an environment an environment which, when 
taken in its fullness, is a community of persons. 
Any law imposed by such a self would be * univer- 



151 

sal ', but this universality would not be an isolated 
possession of the individual; it would be another 
name for the concrete social relationships which 
make the individual what he is, as a social member 
or organ. Furthermore, such a universal law would 
not be formal, but would have a content these 
same relationships. 

The second point seems to be met by recogniz- 
ing that in the realization of the law of social 
function, conflict must occur between the desire as 
an immediate and direct expression of the individ- 
ual the desire in its isolation and desire as an 
expression of the whole man; desire, that is, as 
wholly conformable to the needs of the surround- 
ings. Such a conflict is real enough, as everyone's 
experience will testify, but it is a conflict which 
may be solved which must be solved so far as 
morality is attained. And since it is a conflict 
within desire itself, its solution* or morality, does 
not require any impossible obliteration of desire, 
nor any acting from an ' ought ' which has no rela- 
tion to what ' is '. This, indeed, is the failure of 
the Kantian Ethics: in separating what should be 
from what is, it deprives the latter, the existing 
social world as well as the desires of the individual, 
of all moral value; while> by the same separation, it 
condemns that which should be to a barren ab- 
straction. An * ought ' which does not root in and 



152 

flower from the ' is', which is not the fuller realiza- 
tion of the actual state of social relationships, is a 
mere pious wish that things should be better. And 
morality, that is, right action, is not so feeble as 
this would come to. 

XLVIII. 

The Source The basis of a correct theory 

and Nature of of obligation lies, as already 

Obligation. stated, in holding fast to its 
concrete relations to the moral end, or good. This 
end consists in an activity in which capacity is ex- 
ercised in accordance with surroundings, with the 
social needs which affect the individual. It is im- 
plied in this very idea, that the end is not some- 
thing which the individual may set up at his own 
arbitrary will. The social needs give control, law, 
authority. The individual may not manifest his 
capacity, satisfy his desires, apart from their spe- 
cific relation to the environment in which they 
exist. The general fact of obligation which is 
constituted through this control of capacity by the 
wider function is, of course, differentiated into 
specific ' laws ' or duties by the various forms which 
the one function takes, as capacity and circum- 
stances vary. 

In other words, obligation or duty is simply the 
aspect which the good or the moral end assumes, as 
the individual conceives of it. From the very fact 



153 

that the end is the good, and jet is not realized by 
the individual, it presents itself to him as that 
which should be realized as the ideal of action. 
It requires no further argument to show that obli- 
gation is at once self-imposed, and social in its con- 
tent. It is self-imposed because it flows from the 
good, from the idea of the full activity of the indi- 
vidual's own will. It is no law imposed from with- 
out; but is his own law, the law of his own function, 
of his individuality. Its social content flows from 
the fact that this individuality is not mere capacity, 
but is this capacity acting, and acting so as to com- 
prehend social relationships. 

Suppose that man's good and his conviction of 
duty were divorced from one another that man's 
duty were other than to fulfill his own specific 
function. Such a thing would make duty purely 
formal; the moral law would have no intrinsic rela- 
tion to daily conduct, to the expression of man's 
powers and wants. There have, indeed, been mor- 
alists who think they do the Lord service, who 
think they add to the dignity and sacredness of 
Duty by making it other than the idea of the ac- 
tivity of man, regulated indeed, but regulated only 
by its own principle of activity. But such moral- 
ists in their desire to consecrate the idea of duty 
remove from it all content, and leave it an empty 
abstraction. On the other hand, their eagerness to 



154 

give absoluteness and imperativeness to duty by 
making it a law other than that of the normal ex- 
pression of man, casts discredit upon the one moral 
reality the full, free play of human life. In deny- 
ing that duty is simply the intrinsic law, the self- 
manifestation of this life, they make this life 
immoral, or at least non moral. They degrade it 
to a bundle of appetites and powers having no 
moral value until the outside moral law is applied 
to them. In reality, the dignity and imperativeness 
of duty are simply the manifest dignity and uncon- 
ditioned worth of human life as exhibited in its 
free activity. The whole idea of the separateness 
of duty from the concrete flow of human action is 
a virulent example of the fallacy mentioned in an 
early section the fallacy that moral action means 
something more than action itself (see Sec. II). 

The attempt to act upon a theory of the divorce 
of satisfaction and duty, to carry it out in practice, 
means the maiming of desire through distrust of 
its moral significance, and thus, by withdrawing 
the impetus of action, the reduction of life to mere 
passivity. So far as this does not happen, it means 
the erection of the struggle itself, the erection of 
the opposition of law to desire, into the very prin- 
ciple of the moral life. The essential principle of 
the moral life, that good consists in the freeing of 
impulse, of appetite, of desire, of power, by enab- 



155 

ling them to flow in the channel of a unified and 
full end is lost sight of, and the free service of the 
spirit is reduced to the slavish fear of a bond-man 
under a hard taskmaster. 

The essential point in the analysis of moral law, 
or obligation, having been found, we may briefly 
discuss some subsidiary points. 

1. The relation of duty to a given desire. 
As any desire arises, it will be, except so far as 
character has already been moralized, a demand 
for its own satisfaction; the desire, in a word, will 
be isolated. In so far, duty will be in a negative 
attitude towards the desire; it will insist first upon 
its limitation, and then upon its transformation. 
So far as it is merely limitative, it demands the 
denying of the desire, and so far assumes a coercive 
form. But this limitation is not for its own sake, 
but for that of the transformation of desire into a 
freer and more adequate form into a form, that is, 
where it will carry with it, when it passes into 
action, more of activity, than the original desire 
would have done. 

Does duty itself disappear when its constraint 
disappears? On the contrary, so far as an act is 
done unwillingly, under constraint, so far the act is 
impure, and undutiful. The very fact that there is 
need of constraint shows that the self is divided; 
that there is a two -fold interest and purpose one 



156 

in the law of the activity according to function, the 
other in the special end of the particular desire. 
Let the act be done wholly as duty, and it is done 
wholly for its own sake; love, passion take theplaca 
of constraint. This suggests: 

2. Duty for duty's sake. 

It is clear that such an expression states a real 
moral fact; unless a duty is done as duty it is not 
done morally. An act may be outwardly just what 
what morality demands, and yet if done for the 
sake of some private advantage it is not counted 
moral. As Kant expresses it, an act must be done 
not only in accordance with duty, but from duty. 
This truth, however, is misinterpreted when it is 
taken to mean that the act is to be done for the 
sake of duty, and duty is conceived as a third 
thing outside the act itself. Such a theory contra- 
dicts the true sense of the phrase * duty for duty's 
sake ', for it makes the act done not for its own sake, 
but as a mere means to an abstract law beyond it- 
self. 'Do the right because it is the right' means 
do the right thing because it is the right thing; that 
is, do the act disinterestedly from interest in the act 
itself. A duty is always some act or line of action, 
not a third thing outside the act to which it is to 
conform. In short, duty means the act which is to 
be done, and * duty for duty's sake ' means do the 
required act as it really is; do not degrade it into 



157 

A means for some ulterior end. This is as true in 
practice as in theory. A man who does his duty 
not for the sake of the acts themselves, but for the 
sake of some abstract 'ideal' which he christens 
duty in general, will have a morality at once hard 
and barren, and weak and sentimental. 

3. The agency of moral authority in prescrib- 
ing moral law and stimulating to moral conduct. 

The facts, relied upon by Bain and Spencer, as 
to the part played by social influences in imposing 
duties, are undeniable. The facts, however, are 
unaccountable upon the theory of these writers, as 
that theory would, as we have seen, explain only 
the influence of society in producing acts done from 
fear or for hope of reward. But if the individual 
and others are equally members of one society, if 
the performance by each man of his own function 
constitutes a good common to all, it is inevitable 
that social authorities should be an influence in 
constituting and teaching duties. The community, 
in imposing its own needs and demands upon the 
individual, is simply arousing him to a knowledge 
of his relationships in life, to a knowledge of the 
moral environment in which he lives, and of the 
acts which he must perform if he is to realize his 
individuality. The community in awakening moral 
consciousness in the morally immature may appeal 
to motives of hope and fear. But even this fact 



158 

does not mean that to the child, duty is necessarily 
constituted by fear of punishment or hope of re- 
ward. It means simply that his capacity and his 
surroundings are both so undeveloped that the 
exercise of his function takes mainly the form of 
pleasing others. He may still do his duty as his 
duty, but his duty now consists in pleasing others. 

On Obligation see Green, Op. cit., pp. 352-356; 
Alexander, Op. cit, pp. 142-147. For different views, 
Martineau, Op. cit., Vol. II, pp 92-119; Oalderwood, 
Op. cit., pp. 131-138, and see also, Grote, Treatise on 
Moral Ideals, ch. VII. 



CHAPTEB III. THE IDEA OF FREEDOM. 



XLIX. 

The Forms We may now deal, more briefly, 
of with the problem of moral capacity. 

Freedom. It is, in principle, the ability to con- 
ceive of an end and to be governed in action by this 
conceived end. We may consider this capacity in 
three aspects, as negative, as potential and as 
positive. 

1. Negative Aspect of freedom. The power to 
be governed in action by the thought of some end to 
be reached is freedom from the appetites and de- 
sires. An animal which does not have the power 
of proposing ends to itself is impelled to action by 
its wants and appetites just as they come into con- 



159 

sciousness. It *is irritated into acting. Each 
impulse demands its own satisfaction, and the 
animal is helpless to rise above the particular want. 
But a person, one who can direct his action by 
conscious ends, is emancipated from subjection to 
the particular appetites. He can consider their 
relation to the end which he has set before himself, 
and can reject, modify or use them as best agrees 
with the purposed end. This capacity to control 
and subjugate impulses by reflection upon their 
relationship to a rational end is the power of self- 
government, and the more distinct and the more 
comprehensive in scope the end is, the more real 
the self government. 

2. Potential Freedom. The power to con- 
ceive of ends involves the possibility of thinking of 
many and various ends, and even of ends which 
are contrary to one another. If an agent could 
conceive of but one end in some case, it would al- 
ways seem to him afterwards that he had been 
necessitated to act in the direction of that end; 
but the power to put various ends before self con- 
stitutes " freedom of choice ", or potential free- 
dom. After action, the agent calls to mind that 
there was another end open to him, and that if he 
did not choose the other end, it was because of 
something in his character which made him prefer 
the one he actually chose. 



160 

L. 

Moral Here we have the basis of moral re- 
Responsi- sponsibility or accountability. There 

bility. is no responsibility for any result 
which is not intended or foreseen. Such a con- 
sequence is only physical, not moral. (Sec. VII). 
But when any result has been foreseen, and adopted 
as foreseen, such result is the outcome not of any 
external circumstances, nor of mere desires and 
impulses, but of the agent's conception of his own 
end. Now, because the result thus flows from the 
agent's own conception of an end, he feels himself 
responsible for it. 

It must be remembered that the end adopted is 
that which is conceived as satisfying self that, 
indeed, when we say end of action, we mean only 
some proposed form of self-satisfaction. The 
adopted end always indicates, therefore, that sort 
of condition which the agent considers to be good, 
or self -satisfactory. It is because a result flows 
from the agent's ideal of himself, the thought 
of himself which he considers desirable or worth 
realizing, that the agent feels himself responsible. 
The result is simply an expression of himself ; a 
manifestation of what he would have himself be. 
Responsibility is thus one aspect of the identity of 
character and conduct. (Sec. VII). We are re- 



161 

sponsible for our conduct because that conduct is 
ourselves objectified in actions. 

The idea of responsibility is intensified when- 
ever there have been two contrary lines of conduct 
conceived, of which one has been chosen. If the 
end adopted turns out not to be satisfactory, but, 
rather, unworthy and degrading, the agent feels 
that he might have chosen the other end, and that 
if he did not, it was because his character was such, 
his ideal of himself was such, that this other end 
did not appeal to him. The actual result is felt to 
be the outcome of an unworthy character mani- 
fested in the adoption of a low form of satisfac- 
tion; and the evident contrast of this low form 
with a higher form, present to consciousness but 
rejected, makes the sense of responsibility more 
acute. As such, it is the judgment of disapproba- 
tion passed upon conduct; the feeling of remorse 
and of the desert of punishment. Freedom as the 
power of conceiving ends and of realizing the ideal 
end in action, is thus the basis both of responsi- 
bility and of approbation (or disapprobation). 

The Freedom of Indifference. It is this potential 
freedom, arising from the power of proposing various 
ends of action, which, misinterpreted, gives rise to the 
theory of a liberty of indifferent choice the, theory 
that the agent can choose this or that without any 
ground or motive. The real experience is the knowl- 
edge, after the choice of one end, that since another 
11 



162 

end was also present to consciousness that other end 
might have been chosen, if only the character had 
been such as to find its satisfaction in that other end. 
The theory of indifference misconstrues this fact to 
mean that the agent might just as well have chosen 
that other end, without any if or qualification what- 
ever. The theory of indifference, moreover, defeats 
its own end. The point which it is anxious to save is 
responsibility. It sees that if only one course of 
action were ever open to an agent, without the possi- 
bility of any conception of another course, an agent, 
so acting, could not be held responsible for not having 
adopted that other course. And so it argues that 
there must always be the possibility of indifferent or 
alternate choice; the possibility of adopting this or 
that line of action without any motive. But if such 
were the case responsibility would be destroyed. If 
the end chosen is not an expression of character, if it 
does not manifest the agent's ideal of himself, if its 
choice is a matter of indifference, it does not signify 
morally, but is mere accident or caprice. It is because 
choice is not a matter of indifference, but an outcome 
of character that the agent feels responsibility, and 
approves or disapproves. He virtually says : " 1 am 
responsible for this outcome, not because I could have 
chosen another end just as well without any reason^ 
but because I thought of another end and rejected it; 
because my character was such that that end did not 
seem good, and was such that this end did seem good. 
My character is myself, and in this unworthy end I 
stand self-Gondemried." 

LI. 

Moral Freedom considered as poten- 

Reformation. tial, depending upon the power 

of the agent to frame diverse ends, is the basis not 



163 

only of responsibility, but also of the possibility of 
reformation, or of change in character and con- 
duct. All moral action is the expression of self, 
but the self is not something fixed or rigid. 
It includes as a necessary part of itself the pos- 
sibility of framing conceptions of what it would 
be, and there is, therefore, at any time the pos- 
sibility of acting upon some ideal hitherto un- 
realized. If conduct were the expression of char- 
acter, in a sense which identified character wholly 
with past attainments, then reformation would be 
impossible. What a man once was he must always 
continue to be. But past attainments do not ex- 
haust all the possibilities of character. Since con- 
duct necessarily implies a continuous adjustment of 
developing capacity to new conditions, there is the 
ability to frame a changed ideal of self-satisfaction 
that is, ability to lead a new life. That the new 
ideal is adopted from experience of the unworthy 
nature of former deeds is what we should expect 
The chosen end having proved itself unsatisfactory, 
the alternative end, previously rejected, recurs to 
consciousness with added claims. To sum up: 
The doctrine that choice depends upon character is 
correct, but the doctrine is misused when taken to 
mean that a man's outward conduct will always be 
in the same direction that it has been. Character 
involves all the ideas of different and of better 



164 

things which have been present to the agent, al- 
though he has never attempted to carry them out. 
And there is always the possibility that, if the 
proper influences are brought to bear, some one of 
these latent ideals may be made vital, and wholly 
change the bent of character and of conduct. 
LII. 

Positive The capacity of freedom lies in 
Freedom, the power to form an ideal or con- 
ception of an end. Actual freedom lies in the 
realization of that end which actually satisfies. An 
end may be freely adopted, and yet its actual work- 
ing out may result not in freedom, but in slavery. 
It may result in rendering the agent more sul>ject 
to his passions, less able to direct his own conduct, 
and more cramped and feeble in powers. Only 
that end which executed really effects greater energy 
and comprehensiveness of character makes for 
actual freedom. In a word, only the good man, 
the man who is truly realizing his individuality, is 
free, in the positive sense of that word. 

Every action which is not in the line of. per- 
formance of functions must necessarily result in 
self enslavement. The end of desire is activity; 
and it is only in fullness and unity of activity that 
freedom is found. When desires are not unified 
when, that is, the idea of the exercise of function 
does not control conduct one desire must conflict 



165 

with another. Action is directed now this way, now 
that, and there is friction, loss of power. On ac- 
count of this same lack of control of desires by^the 
comprehensive law of social activity, one member 
of society is brought into conflict with another, with 
waste of energy, and with i mpeded and divided ac- 
tivity and satisfaction of desire. Exercise of func- 
tion, on the other hand, unifies the desires, giving 
each its relative, although subordinate, place. It fits 
each into the others, and, through the harmonious 
adjustment of one to another, effects that complete 
and unhindered action which is freedom. The 
performance of specific function falls also into 
free relations with the activities of other persons, 
cooperating with them, giving and receiving what 
is needed, and thus constituting full liberty. 
Other aspects of freedom, as the negative and the 
potential, are simply means instrumental to the re- 
alization of individuality, and when not employed 
toward this, their true end, they become methods 
of enslaving the agent. 

On the subject of moral freedom, as, upon the 
whole, in agreement with the view presented here: See 

Green: Prolegomena to Ethics, pp. 90-117; 142-158. 
Bradley: Ethical Studies, ch. I; Caird: Phil, of Kant, 
Vol. II, Bk. II, ch. 3; Alexander: Moral Order and 
Progress, pp. 336-341. 

And, for a view agreeing in part, Stephen: Science 
of Ethics, pp. 278-293. 

For presentations of the freedom of indifference, 



166 

see, Lotze: Practical Philosophy, ch. 3. Martineau: 
Op. cit., Vol. II, pp. 34-40. Calderwood: Handbook 
of Moral Philosophy. 



PART II. 



THE ETHICAL WORLD. 



LIU. 

The Reality The habit of conceiving moral 
of Moral action as a certain kind of action, 
Relations, instead of all action so far as it really 
is action, leads us to conceive of morality as a 
highly desirable something which somehow ought 
to be brought into our lives, but which upon the 
whole is not. It gives rise to the habit of con- 
ceiving morality as a vague ideal which it is praise- 
worthy for the individual to strive for, but which 
depends wholly for its existence upon the indi- 
vidual's wish in the matter. Morality, that is, is 
considered as a relation existing between something 
which merely ought to be, on one hand, and the 
individual's choice, or his conscience on the other. 
This point of view has found typical expression in 
Bishop Butler's saying: " If conscience had might 
as it has right, it would rule the world." 

But right is not such a helpless creature. It 
exists not in word but in power. The moral world 
is, here and now; it is a reality apart from the 



168 

wishes, or failures to wish, of any given individual. 
It bears the same relation to the individual's activity 
that the * physical world' does to his knowledge. 
Not till the individual has to spin the physical 
world out of his consciousness in order to know it, 
will it be necessary for him to create morality by 
his choice, before it can exist. As knowledge is mas- 
tery in one's self of the real world, the reproduction 
of it in self-consciousness, so moral action is the 
appropriation and vital self-expression of the values 
contained in the existing practical world. 

The existence of this moral world is not any- 
thing vaguely mysterious. Imagine a well organ- 
ized factory, in which there is some comprehensive 
industry carried on say the production of cotton 
cloth. This is the end; it is a common end that 
for which each individual labors. Not all indi- 
viduals, however, are doing the same thing. The 
more perfect the activity, the better organized the 
work, the more differentiated their respective labors. 
This is the side of individual activity or freedom. 
To make the analogy with moral activity complete 
we have to suppose that each individual is doing the 
work because of itself, and not merely as drudgery 
for the sake of some further end, as pay. Now 
these various individuals are bound together by 
their various acts; some more nearly because doing 
closely allied things, all somewhat, because contrib- 



169 

nting to a common activity. This is the side of 
laws and duties. 

This group of the differentiated and yet related 
activities is the analogue of the moral world. 
There are certain wants which have constantly to be 
fulfilled; certain ends which demand cooperating 
activities, and which establish fixed relations be- 
tween men. There is a world of ends, a realm of 
definite activities in existence, as concrete as the 
ends and activities in our imagined factory. The 
child finds, then, ends and actions in existence when 
he is born. More than this: he is not born as a 
mere spectator of the world; he is born into it. 
He finds himself encompassed by such relations, 
and he finds his own being and activity intermeshed 
with them. If he takes away from himself, as an 
agent, what he has, as sharing in these ends and 
actions, nothing remains. 

L1V. 

Moral This world of purposes and ac- 

Institutions. tivities is differentiated into various 
institutions. The child is born as a member of a 
family; as he grows up he finds that others have 
possessions which he must respect, that is, he runs 
upon the institution of property. As he grows still 
older, he finds persons outside of the family of 
whose actions he must take account as respects his 
own: society, in the limited sense as meaning rela- 



170 

tions of special intimacy or acquaintanceship. Then 
he finds the political institutions; the city, state 
and nation. He finds an educational institution, the 
school, the college ; religious institutions, the church, 
etc., etc. Everywhere he finds men having com- 
mon wants and thus proposing common ends and 
using cooperative modes of action. To these organ- 
ized modes of action, with their reference to com- 
mon interests and purposes, he must adjust his 
activities; he must take his part therein, if he acts 
at all, though it be only negatively or hostilely, as 
in evil conduct. These institutions are morality 
real and objective; the individual becomes moral as 
he shares in this moral world, and takes his due 
place in it. 

Institutions, then, are organized modes of action, 
on the basis of the wants arid interests which unite 
men. They differ as the family from the town, 
the church from the state, according to the scope 
and character of the wants from which they 
spring. They are not bare facts like objects of 
knowledge; they ar practical, existing for the sake 
of, and by means of the will as execution of ideas 
which have interest. Because they are expressions 
of common purposes and ideas, they are not merely 
private will and intelligence, but, in the literal sense, 
public will and reason. 

The moral endeavor of man thus takes the form 



171 

not of isolated fancies about right and wrong, not 
of attempts to frame a morality for himself, not of 
efforts to bring into being some praiseworthy ideal 
never realized; but the form of sustaining and 
furthering the moral world of which he is a mem- 
ber. Since the world is one of action, and not of 
contemplation like the world of knowledge, it can 
be sustained and furthered only as he makes its 
ends his own, and identifies himself and his satis- 
faction with the activities in which other wills find 
their fulfillment. 

This is simply a more concrete rendering of what 
has already been said about the moral environment 
(see Sec. 33). 

LV. 

The Aspects An institution is, as we have 
of a Moral seen the expression of unity of de- 
Institution, sires and ideas; it is general intel- 
ligence in action, or common will. As such com- 
mon will, it is, as respects the merely private or 
exclusive wants and aims of its members, abso- 
lutely sovereign. It must aim to control them. 
It must set before them the common end or ideal 
and insist upon this as the only real end of indi- 
vidual conduct. The ends so imposed by the pub- 
lic 'reason are laivs. But these laws are for the 
sake of realizing the common end, of securing that 
organized unity of action in which alone the indi- 



172 

vidual can find freedom and fullness of action, or 
his own satisfaction. Thus the activity of the 
common will gives freedom, or rights, to the vari- 
ous members of the institution. 

Every institution, then, has its sovereignty, or 
authority, and its laws and rights. It is only a 
false abstraction which makes us conceive of sov- 
ereignty, or authority, and of law and of rights 
as inhering only in some supreme organization, as 
the national state. The family, the school, the 
neighborhood group, has its authority as respects 
its members, imposes its ideals of action, or laws, 
and confers its respective satisfactions in way of 
enlarged freedom, or rights. It is true that no 
one of these institutions is isolated; that each 
stands in relation with other like and unlike insti- 
tutions. Each minor institution is a member of 
some more comprehensive whole, to which it bears 
the same relation that the individual bears to it. 
That is to say, its sovereignty gives way to the 
authority of the more comprehensive organization; 
its laws must be in harmony with the laws which 
flow from the larger activity; its rights must be- 
come aspects of a fuller satisfaction. Only human- 
ity or the organized activity of all the wants, 
powers and interests common to men, can have ab- 
solute sovereignty, law and rights. 

But the narrower group has its relations, none 



173 

the less, although, in ultimate analysis, they flow 
from and manifest the wider good, which, as 
wider, must be controlling. Without such minor 
local authorities, rights and laws, humanity would 
be a meaningless abstraction, and its activity 
wholly empty. There is an authority in the family, 
and the moral growth of the child consists in iden- 
tifying the law of his own conduct with the ends 
aimed at by the institution, and in growing into 
maturity and freedom of manhood through the 
rights which are bestowed upon him as such a 
member. Within its own range .this institution is 
ultimate. But its range is not ultimate; the fam- 
ily, valuable and sacred as it is, does not exist for 
itself. It is not a larger selfishness. It exists as 
one mode of realizing that comprehensive common 
good to which all institutions must contribute, if 
they are not to decay. It is the same with prop- 
erty, the school, the local church, and with the 
national state. 

We can now translate into more concrete terms 
what was said, in Part I, regarding the good, 
obligation and freedom. That performance of 
function which is ' the good ', is now seen to con- 
sist in vital union with, and reproduction of, the 
practical institutions of which one is a member. 
The maintenance of such institutions by the free 
participation therein of individual wills, is, of 



174 

itself, the common good. Freedom also gets con- 
creteness; it is the assured rights, or powers of 
action which one gets as such a member: powers 
which are not mere claims, nor simply claims 
recognized as valid by others, but claims re-inforced 
by the will of the who]e community. Freedom be- 
comes real in the ethical world; it becomes force 
and efficiency of action, because it does not mean 
some private possession of the individual, but means 
the whole cooperating and organized action of an 
institution in securing to an individual some power 
of self expression. 

LVI. 

Moral Law Without the idea of the eth- 

and the ical world, as the unified 

Ethical World, activity of diverse functions 
exercised by different individuals, the idea of the 
good, and of freedom, would be undefined. But 
probably no one has ever attempted to conceive of 
the good and of freedom in total abstraction from 
the normal activity of man. Such has not been 
the lot of duty, or of the element of law. Often by 
implication, sometimes in so many words, it is 
stated that while a physical law may be accounted 
for, since it is simply an abstract from observed 
facts, a moral law stands wholly above and apart 
from actual facts; it expresses solely what 'ought 
to be ' and not what is; that, indeed, whether any- 



176 

thing in accordance with it ever has existed or not, 
is a matter of no essential moral importance the- 
oretically, however it may be practically. Now it 
is evident that a law of something which has not 
existed, does not and perhaps never will exist, is es- 
sentially inexplicable and mysterious. It is as 
against such a notion of moral law that the idea of 
a real ethical world has perhaps its greatest service. 

A moral law, e. g., the law of justice, is no more 
merely a law of what ought to be than is the law of 
gravitation. As the latter states a certain relation 
of moving masses to one another, so the law of 
justice states a certain relation of active wills to 
one another. For a given individual, at a given 
time aiid circumstances, the law of justice may ap- 
pear as the law of something which ought to be, 
but is not: is not for him in this respect, that is to 
say. But the very fact that it ought to be for him 
implies that it already is for others. It is a law of 
the society of which he is a member. And it is be- 
cause he is a member of a society having this law, 
that is a law of what should be for him. 

Would then justice cease to be a law for him if 
it were not observed at all in the society of which 
he is a member? Such a question is as contradic- 
tory as asking what would happen to a planet if 
the solar system went out of existence. It is the 
law of justice (with other such laws) that makes 



176 

society; that is, it is those active relations which find 
expression in these laws that unify individuals so 
that they have a common end, and thus mutual 
duties. To imagine the abolition of these laws is 
lo imagine the abolition of society ; and to ask for 
the law of individual conduct apart from all relation- 
ship, actual or ideal, to society, is to ask in what 
morality consists when moral conditions are de- 
stroyed. A society in which the social bond we 
call justice does not obtain to some degree in the re- 
lations of man to man, is not society; and, on the 
other hand, wherever some law of justice actually 
obtains, there the law is for every individual who 
is a member of the society. 

This does not mean that the ' is ', the actual 
status of the moral world, is identical with the 
' ought ', or the ideal relations of man to man. 
But it does mean that there is no obligation, either 
in general or as any specific duty, which does not 
grow out of the ' is ', the actual relations now ob- 
taining. * The ethical world at any given time is 
undoubtedly imperfect, and, therefore, it demands 
a certain act to meet the situation. The very im- 
perfection, -the very badness in the present condi- 
tion of things, is a part of the environment with 
reference to which we must act; it is, thus, an ele- 



*See Sees. 59, 00 and f>3 for discussion of other aspects of 
this question. 



177 

ment in the law of future action that it shall not 
exactly repeat the existing condition. In other 
words, the 'is' gives the law of the ' ought', but it 
is a part of this law that the ' ought ' shall not be 
as the ' is '. It is because the relation of justice 
does hold in members of a stratum of society, hav- 
ing a certain position, power or wealth, but does 
not hold between this section and another class, 
that the law of what should be is equal justice for 
all. In holding that actual social relations afford 
the law of what should be, wo must not forget that 
these actual relations have a negative as well as a 
positive side, and that the new law must be framed 
in view of the negatives, the deficiencies, the 
wrongs, the contradictions, as well as of the posi- 
tive attainments. A moral law, to sum up, is the 
principle of action, which, acted upon, will meet 
the needs of the existing situation as respects the 
wants, powers, and circumstances of the individuals 
concerned. It is no far-away abstraction, but ex- 
presses the movement of the ethical world. 

One example will help define the discussion. 
Take the case of a street railway conductor, 
whose union has ordered a strike. What deter- 
mines the law of his conduct under the circum- 
stances? Evidently the existing ethical institu- 
tions of which he is a member, so far as he is 

conscious of their needs. To determine what he 
12 



178 

should do, he does not hunt up some law of an 
'ought ' apart from what is; if he should hunt for 
and should find such a law he would not know 
what to do with it. Just because it is apart from 
his concrete circumstances it is no guide, no law 
for his conduct at all. He has to act not in view 
of some abstract principle, but in view of a con- 
crete situation. He considers his present wage, 
its relation to its needs and abilities; his capacity 
and taste for this and for that work; the reasons 
for the strike; the conditions of labor at present 
with reference to winning the strike, and as to the 
chance of getting other work. He considers his 
family, their needs and developing powers; the 
demand that they should live decently; that his 
children should be fairly educated and get a fair 
start in the world; ho considers his relationships 
to his fellow members in the union, etc. These 
considerations, and such as these, give the law to 
his decision in so far as he acts morally and not in- 
stinctively. Where in this law- giving is there any 
separation from facts ? On the contrary, the more 
right the act (the nearer it comes to its proper law), 
the more it will simply express and reflect the 
actual concrete facts. The law, in other words, of 
action, is the law of actual social forces in their on- 
ward movement, in so far as these demand some 
response in the way of conduct from the individual. 



179 

We may restate from this point of view, what 
we have already learned: A moral law is thor- 
oughly individualized. It cannot be duplicated; it 
cannot be for one act just what it is for another. 
The ethical world is too rich in capacity and cir- 
cumstance to permit of monotony; it is too swift 
in its movement to allow of bare repetition. It 
will not hold still; it moves on, and moral law is 
the law of action required from individuals by this 
movement. 

The consideration of specific institutions, as the 
family, industrial society, civil society, the nation, 
etc., with their respective rights and laws, belongs 
rather to political philosophy than to the general the- 
ory of ethics. 



PART III. 



THE MORAL LIFE OF THE INDIVIDUAL 



LVII. 

Division We have now analyzed the funda- 
of mental moral notions the good, duty 
Subject, and freedom; we have considered their 
objective realization, and seen that they are out- 
wardly expressed in social relations, the more typi- 
cal and abiding of which we call institutions; that 
abstract duties are realized in the laws created and 
imposed by such institutions, and that abstract 
freedom is realized in the rights possessed by 
members in them. We have now to consider the 
concrete moral life of an individual born into this 
existing ethical world and finding himself con- 
fronted with institutions in which he must execute 
his part, and in which he obtains his satisfaction 
and free activity. We have to consider how these 
institutions appeal to the individual, awakening in 
him a distinct moral consciousness, or the con- 
sciousness of active relations to persons, in antith- 
esis to the theoretical consciousness of relations 
which exist in contemplation; how the individual 



182 

behaves towards these institutions, realizing them 
by assuming his proper position in bhem, or at- 
tempting to thwart them by living in isolation 
from them; and how a moral character is thus 
called into being. More shortly, we have to deal 
(I) with the practical consciousness, or the forma- 
tion and growth of ideals of conduct; (II) with 
the moral struggle, or the process of realizing 
ideals, and (III) with moral character, or the 
virtues. 

CHAPTER I. THE FORMATION AND GROWTH 
OF IDEALS. 



LVIII. 

Analysis The practical consciousness, or 

of the recognition of ends and rela- 

Con science, tions of action, is what is usually 
termed conscience. The analysis of conscience 
shows that it involves three elements, which may be 
distinguished in theory, although they have no 
separate existence in the actual fact of conscience 
itself. These three elements are (1) the knowledge 
of certain- specific forms of conduct, (2) the 
recognition of the authority or obligatoriness of 
the forms, and (3) the emotional factors which 
cluster about this recognition. That is to say, we 
often speak ( 1 ) of conscience telling or informing 



183 

us of duties; we speak of an enlightened or un- 
enlightened conscience; of savage, or mediaeval, or 
modern conscience. Here we are evidently think- 
ing of the kind and range of particular acts con- 
sidered right or wrong. But we also speak (2) of 
the authority and majesty of conscience; of the 
commands of conscience, etc. Here we are think- 
ing of the consciousness of obligation in general. 
The savage and the civilized man may vary 
greatly in their estimate of what particular acts 
are right or wrong, and yet agree in the recogni- 
tion that such acts as are right are absolutely 
obligatory. Finally we speak of an approving or 
disapproving, or remorseful conscience, of a tender 
or a hardened conscience, of the pangs, the pricks 
of conscience, etc. Here (3) we are evidently deal- 
ing with the responsiveness of the disposition to 
moral distinctions, either in particular acts, or in 
the recognition of moral law in general. 

LVIX. 

Conscience Conscience in this sense is 

as the no peculiar, separate faculty 

Recognition of mind. It is simply intelli- 
of gence dealing with a certain 

Special Acts subject-matter. That is, con- 
as science is distinguished not 
Right or Wrong, by the kind of mental activity 
at work, but by the kind of material the mind 



184 

works upon. Intelligence deals with the nature 
and relations of things, and we call it understand- 
ing; intelligence deals with the relations of persons 
and deeds, and it is termed conscience. 

We may, with advantage, recognize these stages 
in the development of intelligence as dealing with 
moral relationships : 

1. The Customary or Conventional Con- 
science. The existing moral world, with the types 
and varieties of institutions peculiar to it, is con- 
stantly impressing itself upon the immature mind; 
it makes certain demands of moral agents and en- 
forces them with all the means in its power pun- 
ishment, reward, blame, public-opinion, and the 
bestowal of social leadership. These demands and 
expectations naturally give rise to certain convic- 
tions in the individual as to what he should or 
should not do. Such convictions are not the out- 
come of independent reflection, but of the mould- 
ing influence of social institutions. Moreover the 
morality of a time becomes consolidated into 
proverbs, maxims and law- codes. It takes shape 
in certain habitual ways of looking at and judging 
matters. All these are instilled into the growing 
mind through language, literature, association and 
legal custom, until they leave in the mind a corre- 
sponding habit and attitude toward things to be 
done. This process may be compared to the proc- 



185 

ess by which knowledge of the world of things 
is first attained. Certain of the more permanent 
features of this world, especially those whose ob- 
servance is important in relation to continued 
physical existence and well-being, impress them- 
selves upon the mind. Consciousness, with no 
reflective activity of its own. comes to mirror 
some of the main outlines of the world. The 
more important distinctions are iixed in language, 
and they find their way into the individual mind, 
giving it unconsciously a certain bent and color- 
ing. 

2. The Loyal Conscience. But just as the 
mind, which seems at first to have the facts and 
features of the world poured into itself as a passive 
vessel, comes in time through its own experience to 
appreciate something of their meaning, and, to 
some extent, to verify them for itself; so the mind 
in its moral relations. Without forming any 
critical theory of the institutions and codes which 
are forming character, without even considering 
whether they are what they should be, the indi- 
vidual yet comes at least to a practical recognition 
that it is in these institutions that he gets his satis- 
factions, and through these codes that he is pro- 
tected. He identifies himself, his own life, with 
the social forms and ideals in which he lives, and 
repels any attack upon them as he would an attack 



186 



upon himself. Tl^e demands which the existing 
institutions make upon him are not felt as the 
coercions of a despot, but as expressions of his 
own will, and requiring loyalty as such. The 
conventional conscience, if it does not grow into 
this, tends to become slavish, while an intel- 
ligence which practically realizes, although with- 
out continual reflection, the significance of con- 
ventional morality is free in its convictions and 
service. 

^. The Independent or Reflective Conscience. 
The intelligence may not simply appropriate, as 
its own, conventions embodied in current institu- 
tions and codes, but may reflect upon them. It 
may ask: What is this institution of family, 
property for? Does the institution in its pres- 
ent form work as it should work, or is some modi- 
fication required ? Does this rule which is now 
current embody the true needs of the situation, 
or is it an antiquated expression of by -gone rela- 
tions? What is the true spirit of existing insti- 
tutions, and what sort of conduct does this spirit 
demand ? 

Here, ia a word, we have the same relation to 
the ethical world, that we have in physical science 
to the external world. Intelligence is not content, 
on its theoretical side, with having facts impressed 
upon it by direct contact or through language; it 



187 



is not content with coming to feel for itself the 
value of the truths so impressed. It assumes an 
independent attitude, putting itself over against 
nature and cross -questioning her. It proposes its 
own ideas, its own theories and hypotheses, and 
manipulates facts to see if this rational meaning 
can be verified. It criticises what passes as truth, 
and pushes on to more adequate statement. 

The correlative attempt, on the part of intelli- 
gence on its practical side, may have a larger or a 
smaller scope. In its wider course it aims to criti- 
cise and to re form prevailing social ideals and in- 
stitutions even those apparently most fixed. 
This is the work of the great moral teachers of the 
world. But in order that conscience be critical, 
it is not necessary that its range be so wide. The 
average member of a civilized community is nowa- 
days called upon to reflect upon his immediate re- 
lationships in life, to see if they are what they 
should be; to regulate his own conduct by rules 
which he follows not simply because they are cus- 
tomary, but the result of his own examination of 
the situation. There is no difference in kind be- 
tween the grander and the minuter work. And it 
is only the constant exercise of reflective examina- 
tion on the smaller scale which makes possible, 
and which gives efficiency to, the deeper criticism 
and transformation. 



188 

LX. 

Reflective Conscience This conception of 
and the conscience as critical 

Ethical World. and reflective is one of 

the chief fruits of the Socratic ethics, fructi- 
fied by the new meaning given life through the 
Christian spirit. It involves the 'right of free 
conscience ' the right of the individual to know 
the good, to know the end of action, for himself, 
rather than to have some good, however impos- 
ing and however beneficent, enjoined from with- 
out. It is this principle of subjective freedom, 
says Hegel, which marks the turning-point in the 
distinction of modern from ancient times (Sec. 124, 
Orundlinien der Philosophic des Rechts, Vol. VIII 
of Hegel's Works).* 

But this notion of conscience is misinterpreted 
when the content as well as the form of conscience 
is thought to be individual. There is no right of 
private judgment, in the sense that there is not a 
public source and standard of judgment. What is 
meant by this right is that the standard, the source, 
is not the opinion of some other person, or group 
of persons. It is a common, objective standard. It 
is that embodied in social relationships themselves. 



*I hardly need say how largely T am indebted in the 
treatment of this topic, and indeed, in the whole matter of 
the 'ethical world', to Hegel. 



189 

The conception of conscience as a private pos- 
session, to be exercised by each one in independ- 
ence of historical forms and contemporary ideals, i& 
thoroughly misleading. The saying " I had to fol- 
low my own notion of what is right " has been 
made the excuse for all sorts of capricious, obsti- 
nate and sentimental performance. It is of such 
notions that Hegel further says: "The striving 
for a morality of one's own is futile, and by its 
very nature impossible of attainment; in respect 
of morality the saying of the wisest men of an- 
tiquity is the only true one: To be moral is 
to live in accordance with the moral tradition 
of one's country" (Hegel, Works, Vol. I, p. 389). 
And in discussing the same question, Bradley has. 
said that the wish to have a morality of one's own 
better than that of the world is to be on the 
threshold of -morality (p. 180). 

Yet, on the other hand, conscience should not 
simply repeat the burden of existing usages and 
opinions. No one can claim that the existing 
morality embodies the highest possible conception 
of personal relations. A morality which does not 
recognize both the possibility and the necessity 
of advance is immorality. Where then is the way 
out from a capricious self-conceit, on one hand, 
and a dead conformity on the other? Reflective 
conscience must be based on the moral conscious- 



190 

ness expressed in existing institutions, manners and 
beliefs. Otherwise it is empty and arbitrary. 
But the existing moral status is never wholly self- 
consistent. It realizes ideals in one relation which 
it does not in another; it gives rights to * aristo- 
crats' which it denies to low-born; to men, which 
it refuses to women; it exempts the rich from obli- 
gations which it imposes upon the poor. Its insti- 
tutions embody a common good which turns out 
to be good only to a privileged few, and thus 
existing in self-contradiction. They suggest ends 
which they execute only feebly or intermittently. 
Reflective intelligence cross-questions the existing 
morality; and extracts from it the ideal which it 
pretends to embody, and thus is able to criticise 
the existing morality in the light of its own ideal. 
It points out the inconsistencies, the in coherencies, 
the compromises, the failures, between the actual 
practice and the theory at the basis of this prac- 
tice. And thus the new ideal proposed by the in- 
dividual is not a product of his private opinions, 
but is the outcome of the ideal embodied in exist- 
ing customs, ideas and institutions. 

LXI. 

The Sense of There has been much discus- 
Obligation, sion regarding the nature of the 
act of mind by which obligation is recognized. A 
not uncommon view has been that the sense of 



191 

duty as such must be the work of a peculiar fac- 
ulty of the mind. Admitting that the recognition 
of this or that particular thing as right or wrong, is 
the work of ordinary intelligence, it is held that 
the additional recognition of the absolute obliga- 
toriness of the right cannot be the work of this 
intelligence. For our intellect is confined to judg- 
ing what is or has been; the conception of obliga- 
tion, of something which should be, wholly tran- 
scends its scope. There is, therefore, some special 
moral an faculty called^/which affixes to the ordin- 
ary judgments the stamp of the categorical impera- 
tive "You ought ". 

See for example Maurice on "Conscience". The 
view is traceable historically to Kant's conception of 
Practical Reason, but as the view is ordinarily ad- 
vanced the function of Practical Reason in Kant's 
philosophy is overlooked. The Practical Reason is no 
special faculty of man's being:; it is his consciousness 
of himself as an acting being; that is, as a being 
capable of acting from ideas. Kant never separates 
the consciousness of duty from the very nature of 
will as the realization of conceptions. In the average 
modern presentation, this intrinsic connection of duty 
with activity is absent. Conscience becomes a faculty 
whose function it is to clap the idea of duty upon the 
existent conception of an act; and this existent con- 
ception is regarded as morally indifferent. 

It is true that Kant's Practical Reason has a cer- 
tain separateness or isolation. But this is because of 
his general separation of the rational from the sen- 
suous factor, and not because of any separation of the 



192 

consciousness of action from the consciousness of 
duty. If Kant erred in his divorce of desire and 
duty, then even the relative apartness of the Practical 
Reason must be given up. The consciousness of obli- 
gation is involved in the recognition of any end of 
conduct, and not simply in the end of abstract law. 

Such a conception of conscience, however, is 
open to serious objections. Aside from the fact 
that large numbers of men declare that no amount 
of introspection reveals any such machinery within 
themselves, this separate faculty seems quite 
superflous. The real distinction is not between the 
consciousness of an action with, and without, the 
recognition of duty, but between a consciousness 
which is and one which is not capable of conduct. 
Any being who is capable of putting before himself 
ideas as motives of conduct, who is capable of 
forming a conception of something which he would 
realize, is, by that very fact, capable of a sense of 
obligation. The consciousness of an end to be 
realized, the idea of something to be done, is, in 
and of itself, the consciousness of duty. 

Let us consider again the horse-car conductor 
(see Sec. LVI ). After he has analyzed the situation 
which faces him and decided that a given course of 
conduct is the one which fits the situation, does he 
require some additional faculty to inform him that 
this course is the one which should be followed? 
The analysis of practical ideas, that is, of proposed 



193 

ends of conduct, is from the first an analysis of 
what should be done. Such being the case, it is no 
marvel that the conclusion of the reflection is: " This 
should (ought to) be done." 

Indeed, just as every judgment about existent 
fact naturally takes the form *S is P', so every 
judgment regarding an activity which executes an 
idea takes the form, 4 S ought (or ought not) to be 
P'. It requires no additional faculty of mind, after 
intelligence has been studying the motions of the 
moon, to insert itself, and affirm some objective 
relation or truth as that the moon's motions are 
explainable by the law of gravitation. It is the 
very essence of theoretical judgment, judgment 
regarding fact, to state truth what is. And it is the 
very essence of practical judgment, judgment re- 
garding deeds, to state that active relation which 
we call obligation, what ought to be. 

The judgment as to what a practical situation is, 
is an untrue or abstract judgment. 

The practical situation is itself an activity, the 
needs, powers, and circumstances which make it 
are moving on. At no instant in time is the scene 
quiescent. But the agent, in order to determine his 
course of action in view of this situation, has to fix 
it; he has to arrest its onward movement in order 
to tell what it is. So his abstracting intellect cuts a 

cross-section through its on- going, and says ' This 
13 



194 

is the situation '. Now the judgment l This ought 
to be the situation', or ' in view of the situation, my 
conduct ought to be thus and so ', ifl simply restor- 
ing the movement which the mind has temporarily 
put out of sight. By means of its cross -section, intel- 
ligence has detected the principle, or law of move- 
ment, of the situation, and it is on the basis of this 
movement that conscience declares what ought to be. 
Just as the fact of moral law, or of authority, of 
the incumbency of duty, needs for its explanation 
no separation of the i is ' from the 4 ought ' ( see 
LVI), but only recognition of the law of the 'is' 
which is, perforce, a law of movement, and of 
change; so thu consciousness of law, 'the sense 
of obligation' requires no special mental faculty 
which may declare what ought to be. The intelli- 
gence that is capable of declaring truth, or what 
is, is capable also of making known obligation. 
For obligation is only practical truth, the ' is ' of 
doing. 

See upon this point, as well as upon the relation of 
laws and rules to action, my article in Vol. I, No. 2, of 
the International Journal of Ethics, entitled 'Moral 
Theory and Practice'. 

LXII. 

Conscience Probably no judgment is entire- 

as Emotional free from emotional coloring and 

Disposition, accompaniments. It is doubtful 

whether the most indifferent judgment is not based 



195 

upon, and does not appeal to, some interest. Cer- 
tainly all the more important judgments awaken 
some response from the self, and excite its interests 
to their depths. Some of them may be excited by the 
intrinsic nature of the subject-matter under judg- 
ment, while others are the results of associations 
more or less accidental. The former will necessar- 
ily be aroused in every being, who has any emo- 
tional nature at all, whenever the judgment is 
made, while the latter will- vary from time to time, 
and may entirely pass away. That moral judg- 
ments, judgments of what should be (or should 
have been) done, arouse emotional response, is 
therefore no cause for surprise. It may help clear 
up difficulties if we distinguish three kinds of such 
emotional accompaniment. 

1. There are, first, the interests belonging to 
the sense of obligation as such. We have just 
seen that this sense of obligation is nothing separ- 
ate from the consciousness of the particular act 
which is to be performed. Nevertheless the con- 
sciousness of obligation, of an authority and law, 
recurs with every act, while the special content of 
the act constantly varies. Thus an idea of law, or of 
duty in general, is formed, distinct from any special 
duty. Being formed, it arouses the special emo- 
tional excitation appropriate to it. The formation 
of this general idea of duty, and the growth of 



196 

feeling of duty as such, is helped on through the 
fact that children ( and adults so far as their moral 
life is immature) need to have their moral judg- 
ments constantly reinforced by recurrence to the 
thought of law. That is to say, a child, who is not 
capable of seeing the true moral bearings and 
claims of an act, is yet continually required to per- 
form such an act on the ground that it is obli- 
gatory. The feeling, therefore, is natural and 
legitimate. It must, however, go hand in hand 
with the feelings aroused by the special moral 
relations under consideration. Disconnected from 
such union, it necessarily leads to slavish and arbi- 
trary forms of conduct. A child, for example, who 
is constantly taught to perform acts simply because 
he ought to do so, without having at the same time 
his intelligence directed to the nature of the act 
which is obligatory (without, that is, being led to 
see how or why it is obligatory), may have a 
strongly developed sense of obligation. As he 
grows up, however, this sense of duty will be 
largely one of dread and apprehension; a feeling 
of constraint, rather than of free service. Besides 
this, it will -be largely a matter of accident to what 
act this feeling attaches itself. Anything that 
comes to the mind with the force of associations of 
past education, any ideal that forces itself persis- 
tently into consciousness from any source may 



197 

awaken this sense of obligation, wholly irrespective 
of the true nature of the act. This is the expla- 
nation of strongly ' conscientious ' persons, whose 
morality is yet unintelligent and blundering. It 
is of such persons that it has been said that a 
thoroughly good man can do more harm than a num- 
ber of bad men. 

When, however, the feeling of obligation in 
general is developed along with particular moral 
judgments (that is, along with the habit of consid- 
ering the special nature of acts performed), it is one 
of the strongest supports to morality. Acts con- 
stantly need to be performed which are recognized 
as right and as obligatory, and yet with reference 
to which there is no fixed habit of conduct. In 
these cases, the more direct, or spontaneous, stim- 
ulus to action is wanting. 

If, however, there is a strong sense of obliga- 
tion in general, this may attach itself to the par- 
ticular act and thus afford the needed impetus. In 
unusual experiences, and in cases where the ordi- 
nary motive- forces are lacking, such a feeling of 
regard for law may be the only sure stay of 
right conduct. 

2. There is the emotional accompaniment ap- 
propriate to the special content of the act. If, for 
example, the required act has to do with some 
person, there arise in consciousness the feelings of 



198 

interest, of love and friendship, or of dislike, 
which belong to that person. If it relate to some 
piece of work to be done, the sweeping of a room, 
the taking of a journey, the painting of a picture, 
there are the interests natural to such subjects. 
These feelings when aroused necessarily form part 
of the emotional attitude as respects the act. It is 
the strength and normal welling-up of such spe- 
cific interests which afford the best assurance, of 
healthy and progressive moral conduct, as distinct 
from mere sentimental dwelling upon ideals. Only 
interests prevent the divorce of feelings and ideas 
from habits of action. Such interests are the 
union of the subjective element, the self, and the 
objective, the special relations to be realized (Sec. 
XXXIV), and thus necessarily produce a right 
and healthy attitude towards moral ends. It is 
obvious that in a normal moral life, the law of obli- 
gation in general, and the specific interests in 
particular cases, should more and more fuse. The 
interests, at their strongest, take the form of loiw. 
And thus there is realized the ideal of an effec- 
tive character; the union of law and inclination 
in its pure form love for the action in and of 
itself. 

3. Emotions due to accidental associations. It 
is matter of common notice that the moral feelings 
are rarely wholly pure; that all sorts of sentiments, 



199 

due to associations of time and place and person 
not strictly belonging to the acts themselves, cluster 
about them. While this is true, we should not 
forget the great difficulty there is in marking off 
any associations as wholly external to the nature of 
the act. We may say that mere fear of punishment 
is such a wholly external feeling, having no place 
in moral emotion. Yc^t it inay be doubted whether 
there is any feeling that may be called mere fear of 
punishment. It is, perhaps, fear of punishment by 
a parent, for whom one has love and respect, and 
thus the fear has partially a genuinely moral aspect. 
Some writers would call the aesthetic feelings, the 
feelings of beauty, of harmony, which gather about 
moral ends adventitious. Yet the fact that other 
moralists have made all moral feelings essentially 
aesthetic, as due to the perception of the fitness 
and proportion of the acts, should warn us from 
regarding aesthetic feelings as wholly external. 
About all that can be said is that feelings which 
do not spring from some aspect of the content 
of the act itself should be extruded, with grow- 
ing maturity of character, from influence upon 
conduct. 

LXMI. 

Conscientiousness. Conscientiousness is pri- 
marily the virtue of intelligence in regard to 
conduct. That is to say, it is the formed habit of 



200 

bringing intelligence to bear upon the analysis of 
moral relations the habit of considering what 
ought to be done. It is based upon the recogni- 
tion of the idea first distinctly formulated by 
Socrates that u an unexamined life is not one that 
should be led by man". It is the outgrowth of 
the customary morality embodied in usages, codes 
and social institutions, but it is an advance upon 
custom, because it requires a meaning and a rea- 
son. It is the mark of a " character which will not 
be satisfied without understanding the law that it 
obeys; without knowing what the good is, for 
which the demand has hitherto been blindly at 
work" (Green, Op. cit, p. 270). Conscientious- 
ness, then, is reflective intelligence grown into 
character. It involves a greater and wider recog- 
nition of obligation in general, and a larger 
and more stable emotional response to every- 
thing that presents itself as duty; as well as 
the habit of deliberate consideration of the moral 
situation and of the acts demanded by it. 

Conscientiousness is an analysis of the con- 
ditions under which > conduct takes place, and 
of the action that will meet these conditions; 
it is a thoroughly objective analysis. What is 
sometimes termed conscientiousness is merely the 
habit of analyzing internal moods and sentiments; 
of prying into ' motives ' in that sense of mo- 



201 

tive which identifies it not with the end of ac- 
tion, but with some subjective state of emotion. 
Thus considered, conscientiousness is morbid. We 
are sometimes warned against of^r-conscientious- 
ness. But such conscientiousness means simply 
over-regard of one's private self; keeping an eye 
upon the effect of conduct on one's internal state, 
rather than upon conduct itself. Over-conscien- 
tiousness is as impossible as over -intelligence, 
since it is simply the application of intelligence to 
conduct. It is as little morbid and introspective 
as is the analysis of any fact in nature. Another 
notion which is sometimes thought to be bound up 
with that of conscience, also has nothing to do 
with it; namely, the notion of a precision and cold- 
ness opposed to all large spontaneity and broad 
sympathy in conduct. The reflective man of nar- 
row insight and cramped conduct is often called 
the conscientious man and opposed to the man of 
generous impulses. This comes from identify- 
ing conscience with a ready-made code of rules, 
and its action with the application of some such 
fixed code to all acts as they come up. It is 
evident, on the contrary, that such a habit is 
opposed to conscience. Conscience means the 
consideration of each case in itself; measuring it 
not by any outside code, but in the existing moral 
situation. 



202 

On conscientiousness, see Green, Op. cit., pp. 269- 
271 and 323-327; and Alexander, Op. cit., pp. 156-160. 
These writers, however, seem to identify it too much 
with internal scrutiny. Green, for example, expressly 
identifies conscientiousness with a man's " questioning 
about himself, whether he has been as good as he 
should have been, whether a better man would not 
have acted otherwise than he has done r (p. 323). He 
again speaks of it as " comparison of our own practice, 
as we know it on the inner side in relation to the mo- 
tives and character which it expresses, with an ideal 
of virtue". The iirst definition seems to be mislead- 
ing. Questioning as to whether the end adopted was 
what it should have been, i. e., whether the analysis of 
the situation was correctly performed, may be of 
great service in aiding future decisions, but question- 
ing regarding the purity of one's own 'motive' does 
not seem of much avail. In a man upon the whole 
good, such questioning is apt to be paralyzing. The 
energy that should go to conduct goes to anxiety 
about one's conduct. It is the view of goodness as 
directed mainly towards one's own private motives, 
which has led such writers as Henry James, Sr., and 
Mr. Ilinton, to conceive of 'morality', the struggle 
for goodness, to be in essence bad. They conceived 
of the struggle for * private goodness' as no different 
from the struggle for private pleasure, although 
likely, of course, to lead to better things. Nor in a 
bad man is such scrutiny of ' motive ', as apart from 
objective end, of much value. The bad man is gener- 
ally aware of-the badness of his motive without much 
close examination. The truth aimed at by Green is, I 
think, am ply covered by recognizing that conscientious- 
ness as a constant will to know what should be, and 
to readjust conduct to meet the new insight, is the 
spring of the moral life. 



LXIV. 

Moral Commands, What is the part played 
Rules by specific commands and 

and Systems. by general rules in the ex- 
amination of conduct by conscience ? We should 
note, in the first place, that commands are not 
rules, and rules are not commands. A command, 
to be a command, must be specific and individual. 
It must refer to time, place and circumstance. 
* Thou shalt do no murder ' is not strictly speaking 
a command, for it allows questioning as to what is 
murder. Is killing in war murder ? Is the hang- 
ing of criminals murder? Is taking life in self- 
defense murder? Regarded simply as a command, 
this command would be ' void for uncertainty'. A 
true command is a specific injunction of one per- 
son to another to do or not to do a stated thing or 
things. Under what conditions do commands 
play a part in moral conduct ? In cases where the 
intelligence of the agent is so undeveloped that he 
cannot realize for himself the situation and see the 
act required, and when a part of the agent's envi- 
ronment is constituted by others who have such 
required knowledge, there is a moral element in 
command and in obedience. 

This explains the moral responsibility of parents 
to children and of children to parents. The soldier, 
too, in recognizing a general's command, is recog- 



204 

nizing the situation as it exists for him. Were there 
simply superior force on one side, and fear on the 
other, the relation would be an immoral one. It 
is implied, of course, in such an instance as the 
parents' command, that it be so directed as to 
enable the child more and more to dispense with 
it that is, that it be of such a character as to give 
the child insight into the situation for himself. 
Here is the transition from a command to a rule. 
A rule does riot tell what to do or what to leave 
undone. The Golden .Rule, for example, does not 
tell me how to act in any specific case. A rule is 
a tool of analysis. The moral situation, or capacity 
in its relation to environment, is often an extremely 
complicated affair. How shall the individual re- 
solve it? How shall he pick it to pieces, so as to 
see its real nature and the act demanded by it? It 
is evident that the analysis will be the more truly 
and speedily performed if the agent has a method 
by which to attack it, certain principles in the light 
of which he may view it, instruments for cross- 
questioning it and making it render up its mean- 
ing. Moral rules perform this service. While the 
Golden Rule does not of itself give one jot of in- 
formation as to what I should do in a given case, 
it does, if accepted, immensely simplify the situa- 
tion. Without it I should perhaps have to act 
blindly; with it the question comes to this: What 



205 

should I, under the given circumstances, like to 
have done to me ? This settled, the whole ques- 
tion of what should be done is settled. 

It is obvious, then, that the value of a moral 
rule depends upon its potency in revealing the 
inner spirit and reality of individual deeds. Rules 
in the negative form, rules whose application is 
limited in scope because of an attempt to be spe- 
cific, are midway between commands proper and 
rules. The Golden Rule, on the other hand, is 
positive, and not attempting to define any specific 
act, covers in its range all relations of man to man. 
It is indeed only a concrete and forcible statement 
of the ethical principle itself, the idea of a common 
good, or of a community of persons. This is also 
a convenient place for considering the practical 
value of ethical systems. We have already 
seen that no system can attempt to tell what in 
particular should be done. The principle of a 
system, however, may be of some aid in analyzing 
a specific case. In this way, a system may be re- 
garded as a highly generalized rule. It attempts 
to state some fundamental principle which lies at 
the basis of moral conduct. So far as it succeeds 
in doing this, there is the possibility of its prac- 
tical application in particular cases, although, of 
course, the mediate rules must continue to be the 
working tools of mankind on account of their 



206 

decided concrete character, and because they have 
themselves taken shape under the pressure of 
practice rather than of more theoretical needs. 

LXV. 
Development of Thus far we have been 

Moral Ideals. speaking of conscience mainly 
as to its method of working. We have now to 
speak more definitely of its content, or of the de- 
velopment of ideals of action. 

It is of the very nature of moral conduct to be 
progressive. Permanence of specific ideals means 
moral death. We say that truth -telling, charity, 
loyalty, temperance, have always been moral ends* 
and while this is true, the statement as ordinarily 
made is apt to hide from us the fact that the con- 
tent of the various ideals (what is meant by tem- 
perance, etc.) has been constantly changing, and 
this of necessity. The realization of moral ends 
must bring about a changed situation, so that the 
repetition of the same ends would no longer sat- 
isfy. This progress has two sides: the satisfaction 
of wants leads to a larger view of what satisfac- 
tion really is, i. e., to the creation of new capacities 
and wants; \yhile adjustment to the environment 
creates wider and more complex social relationships. 

Let the act be one of intelligence. Some new 
fact or law is discovered. On one hand, this dis- 
covery may arouse a hitherto comparatively dor- 



207 

inant mind; it may suggest the possession of 
capacities previously latent; it may stimulate 
mental activity and create a thirst for expanding 
knowledge. This readjustment of intellectual needs 
and powers may be comparatively slight, or it may 
amount, as it has with many a young person, to 
a revolution. On the other hand, the new fact 
changes the intellectual outlook, the mental hori- 
zon, and, by transforming somewhat the rela- 
tions of things, demands new conduct. All this, 
even when the growth of knowledge concerns only 
the physical world. But development of insight 
into social needs and affairs has a larger and more 
direct progressive influence. The social world 
exists spiritually, as conceived, and a new concep- 
tion of it, new perception of its scope and bearings, 
is, perforce, a change of that world. And thus it 
is with the satisfaction of the human want of 
knowledge, that patience, courage, self-respect, hu- 
mility, benevolence, all change character. When, 
for example, psychology has given an increase of 
knowledge regarding men's motives, political 
economy an increase of knowledge regarding 
men's wants, when historical knowledge has 
added its testimony regarding the effects of 
indiscriminate giving, charity must change its 
content. While once, the mere supplying of 
food or money by one to another may have been 



208 

right as meeting the recognized relations, charity 
now comes to mean large responsibility in knowl- 
edge of antecedents and circumstances, need of 
organization, careful tracing of consequences, and, 
above all, effort to remove the conditions which 
made the want possible. The activity involved has 
infinitely widened. 

Let the act be in the region of industrial life 
a new invention. The invention of the telephone 
does not simply satisfy an old want it creates 
new. It brings about the possibility of closer 
social relations, extends the distribution of intelli- 
gence, facilitates commerce. It is a common say- 
ing that the luxury of one generation is the neces- 
sity of the next; that is to say, what once satisfied 
a somewhat remote need becomes in time the basis 
upon which new needs grow up. Energy previ- 
ously pent up is set -free, new power and ideals are 
evoked. Consider again a person assuming a family 
relation. This seems, at first, to consist mainly in 
the satisfaction of certain common and obvious 
human wants. But this satisfaction, if moral, 
turns out rather to be the creation of new insight 
into life, of jiew relationships, and thus of new 
energies and ideals. We may generalize these 
instances. The secret of the moral life is not get- 
ting or having, it is doing and thus being. The 
getting and the possessing side of life has a moral 



209 

value only when it is made the stimulus and nutri- 
ment of new and wider acting. To solve the 
equation between getting and doing is the moral 
problem of life. Let the possession be acquiesced 
in for its own sake, and not as the way to freer 
(and thus more moral) action, and the selfish life 
has set in (see Sec. LXVII). It is essential to 
moral activity that it feed itself into larger appe- 
tites and thus into larger life. 

This must not be taken to deny that there is a 
mechanical side even to the moral life. A merchant, 
for example, may do the same thing over and over 
again, like going to his business every morning at the 
same hour. This is a moral act and yet it does not 
seena to lead to a change in moral wants or surround- 
ings. Yet even in such cases it should be noted that 
it is only outwardly that the act is the same. In itself, 
that is, in its relation to the will of the agent, it is 
simply one element in the whole of character; and as 
character opens up, the act must change somewhat 
also. It is performed somehow in a new spirit. If 
this is not to some extent true, if such acts become 
wholly mechanical, the moral life is hardening into 
the rigidity of death. 

This progressive development consists on one 
side in a richer and subtler individual activity, in 
increased individualization, in wider and freer 
functions of life; on the other it consists in inr- 
crease in number of those persons whose ideal is a 
* common good', or who have membership in the 

same moral community; and, further, it consists in 
14 



210 

more complex relations between them. It is both 
intensive and extensive. 

History is one record of growth in the sense of 
specific powers. Its track is marked by the ap- 
pearance of more and more internal and distin- 
guishing traits; of new divisions of labor and cor- 
responding freedom in functioning. It begins with 
groups in which everything is massed, and the good 
is common only in the sense of being undifferenti- 
ated for all. It progresses with the evolution of 
individuality, of the peculiar gifts entrusted to each, 
and hence of the specific service demanded of each. 

The other side, the enlargement of the com- 
munity of ends, has been termed growth in 
"comprehensiveness". History is again a record 
of the widening of the social consciousness of the 
range of persons whose interests have to be taken 
into account in action. There has been a period 
in which the community was nothing more than a 
man's own immediate family group, this enlarging 
to the clan, the city, the social class, the nation; 
until now, in theory, the community of interests 
and ends is humanity itself. 

This growth in comprehensiveness is not simply 
a growth in the number of persons having a com- 
mon end. The quantitative growth reacts upon 
the nature of the ends themselves. For example, 
when the conceived community is small, bravery 



211 

may consist mainly in willingness to fight for the 
recognized community against other hostile groups. 
As these groups become themselves included in the 
moral community, courage must change its form, 
and become resoluteness and integrity of purpose 
in defending manhood and humanity as such. 
That is to say, as long as the community is based 
largely upon physical facts, like oneness of blood, 
of territory, etc., the ideal of courage will have a 
somewhat external and physical manifestation. 
Let the community be truly spiritual, consisting in 
recognition of unity of destiny and function in 
cooperation toward an all-inclusive life, and the 
ideal of courage becomes more internal and spirit- 
ual, consisting in loyalty to the possibilities of 
humanity, whenever and wherever found. 

On this development of moral ideals, and especially 
of the growth in " comprehensiveness" as reacting 
upon the intrinsic form which the ideal itself takes, 
see Green, Op. cit., pp. 264-308, followed by Alexander, 
Op. cit., pp. 384-398. For the process of change of ideals 
in general, see Alexander, pp. 271-292, and 369-371. 



CHAPTEK II. THE MORAL STRUGGLE OK 
THE REALIZING OF IDEALS. 



LXV1. 

Goodness We have already seen that the 

as a Struggle, bare repetition of identically the 

same acts does not consist with morality. To aim 



212 

ftt securing a satisfaction precisely like the one 
already experienced, is to fail to recognize the 
altered capacity and environment, and the altered 
duty. Moral satisfaction prior to an act is ideal; 
ideal not simply in the sense of being conceived, 
or present to thought, but ideal in the sense that 
it has not been already enjoyed. Some satisfac- 
tion has been enjoyed in a previous activity, but 
that very satisfaction has so enlarged and compli- 
cated the situation, that its mere repetition would 
not afford moral or active satisfaction, but only 
'what Kant terms * pathological ' satisfaction. Mo- 
rality thus assumes the form of a struggle. The 
past satisfaction speaks for itself; it has been veri- 
fied in experience, it has conveyed its worth to our 
very senses. We have tried and tasted it, and 
know that it is good. If morality lay in the repe- 
tition of similar satisfactions, it would not be a 
struggle. We should know experimentally before 
hand that the chosen end would bring us satisfac- 
tion, and should be at rest in that knowledge. But 
when morality lies in striving for satisfactions 
which have not verified themselves to our sense, it 
always requires an effort. We have to surrender 
the enjoyed good, and stake ourselves upon that of 
which we cannot say : We know it is good. To 
surrender the actual experienced good for a pos- 
sible ideal good is the struggle. 



213 

We arrive, in what is termed the opposition of 
desire and duty, at the heart of the moral struggle. 
Of course, taken strictly, there can be no opposition 
here. The duty which did not awaken any desire 
would not appeal to the mind even as a duty. 
But we may distinguish between a desire which is 
based on past satisfaction actually experienced, 
and desire based simply upon the idea that the end 
is desirable that it ought to be desired. It may 
seem strange to speak of a desire based simply 
upon the recognition that an end should be desired, 
but the possibility of awakening such a desire and 
the degree of its strength are the test of a moral 
character. How far does this end awaken response 
in me because I see that it is the end which is fit 
and due? How far does it awaken this response 
although it does not fall into line with past sat- 
isfactions, or although it actually thwart some 
habitual satisfaction? Here is the opposition of 
duty and desire. It lies in the contrast of a good 
which has demonstrated itself as such in experi- 
ence, and a good whose claim to be good rests only 
on the fact that it is the act which meets the situa- 
tion. It is the contrast between a good of posses- 
sion, and one of action. 

From this point of view morality is a life of 
aspiration, and of faith ; there is required constant 
willingness to give up past goods as the good, and 



214 

to press on to new ends; not because past achieve- 
ments are bad, but because, being good, they have 
created a situation which demands larger and more 
intricately related achievements. This willingness 
is aspiration and it implies faith. ' Only the old 
good is of sight, has verified itself to sense. The 
new ideal, the end which meets the situation, is 
felt as good only in so far as the character has 
formed the conviction that to meet obligation is 
itself a good, whether bringing sensible satisfac- 
tion or not. You can prove to a man that he 
ought to act so and so (that is to say, that such an 
act is the one which fits the present occasion), but 
you cannot prove to him that the performance of 
that duty will be good. Only faith in the moral 
order, in the identity of duty and the good, can 
assert this. Every time an agent takes as his end 
(that is, chooses as good) an activity which he has 
not already tried, he asserts his belief in the good- 
ness of right action as such. This faith is not a 
mere intellectual thing, but it is practical the 
staking of self upon activity as against passive 
possession. 

LXVII. 

Moral Badness originates in the contrast 
Badness, which thus comes about between hav- 
ing the repetition of former action, and doing 
pressing forward to the new right action. Good- 



215 

ness is the choice of doing; the refusal to be con- 
tent with past good as exhausting the entire content 
of goodness. It is, says Green, ' in the continued 
effort to be better that goodness consists'. The 
man, however bad his past and however limited his 
range of intellectual, aesthetic arfd social activity, 
who is dissatisfied with his past, and whose dissat- 
isfaction manifests itself in act, is accounted better 
than the man of a respectable past and higher 
plane of life who has lapsed into contented acqui- 
eseence with past deeds. For past deeds are not 
deeds, they are passive enjoyments. The bad man, 
on the other hand, is not the man who loves bad- 
ness in and for itself. Such a man would be a 
mad man or a devil. All conduct, bad as well as 
good, is for the sake of some satisfaction, 'that is, 
some good. In the bad man, the satisfaction which 
is aimed at is simply the one congruent with exist- 
ing inclinations, irrespective of the sufficiency of 
those inclinations in view of the changed capacity 
and environment: it is a good of having. The bad 
man, that is to say, does not recognize any ideal or 
active good ; any good which has not already com- 
mended itself to him as such. This good may be 
good in itself \ but, as distinguished from the good 
which requires action, that which would fulfill the 
present capacity or meet the present situation, 
it is bad. 



Thus Alexander terms badness a survival, in part 
at least, of former goodness. Hinton says (Philosophy 
and Religion, p. 146), " That a thing is wrong does not 
mean that it ought never to have been done or 
thought, but that it ought to be left off". It will be 
noted that we are not dealing with the metaphysical 
or the religious problem of the nature and origin of 
evil, but simply w4th an account of bad action as it 
appears in individual conduct. 

Badness has four traits, all derivable from this 
basal fact. They are: (1) Lawlessness, (2) Sel- 
fishness, (3) Baseness, (4) Demoralization. 

1. Lawlessness. When desire and duty, that 
is, when desires based on past having and on future 
acting, conflict, the bad man lets duty go. He 
virtually denies that it is a good at all it may be a 
good in the abstract but not a good for him. He 
denies that obligation as such has any value; that 
any end is to be consulted save his own state of 
mind. He denies that there is law for conduct at 
least any law beyond the inclination which he hap- 
pens to have at the time of action. Keeping him- 
self within that which has verified itself to his 
feeling in the past, he abrogates all authority ex- 
cepting that of his own immediate feelings. 

2. Selfishness. It has already been shown 
that the self is not necessarily immoral, and hence 
that action for self is not necessarily bad indeed, 
that the true self is social and interest in it right 
(see Sec. XXXV). But when a satisfaction based on 



217 

past experience is set against one proceeding from 
an act as meeting obligation, there grows up a 
divorce in the self. The actual self, the self recog- 
nizing only past and sensible satisfaction, is set 
over against the self which recognizes the necessity 
of expansion and a wider environment. Since the 
former self confines its action to benefits demon - 
strably accruing to itself, while the latter, in 
meeting the demands of the situation, necessarily 
contributes to the satisfaction of others, one 
takes the form of a private self, a self whoso good 
is set over against and exclusive of that of others, 
while the self recognizing obligation becomes a 
social self the self which performs its due func- 
tion in society. It is, again, the contrast between 
getting and doing. 

All moral action is based upon the presupposi- 
tion of the identity of good (Sec. XL), but it by 
no means follows that this identity of good can be 
demonstrated to the agent at the time of action. 
On the contrary, it is matter of the commonest 
experience that the sensible good, the demonstrable 
good (that is, the one visible on the line of past sat- 
isfaction) may be contradictory to the act which 
would satisfy the interests of others. The identity 
of interests can be proved 07? ly by acting upon it; 
to the agent, prior to action, it is a matter of faith. 
Choice presents itself then in these cases as a test: 



218 

Do you believe that the Good is simply your private 
good, or is the true Good, is your good, one which 
includes the good of others? The condemnation 
passed upon the 4 selfish ' man is that he virtually 
declares that good is essentially exclusive and pri- 
vate. He shuts himself up within himself, within, 
that is, his past achievements, and the inclinations 
based upon them. The good man goes out of him- 
self in new action. Bad action is thus essentially 
narrowing, it confines the self; good action is 
expansive and vital, it moves on to a larger self. 

In fine, all conduct, good and bad, satisfies the 
self; bad conduct, however, aims at a self which, 
keeping its eye upon its private and assured sat- 
isfaction, refuses to recognize the increasing func- 
tion with its larger social range, the * selfish' self. 

Light is thrown upon this point by referring to 
what was said about interest (Sec. XXXIV). Inter- 
est is active feeling, feeling turned upon an object, 
and going out toward it so as to identify it with self. 
In this active and objective interest there is satis- 
faction, but the satisfaction is in the activity which 
has the object for its content. This is the satisfac- 
tion of the good self. In the bad self, interest is 
reduced to mere feeling; for the aim of life in such 
a self is simply to have certain feelings as its own 
possession; activity and its object are degraded 
into mere means for getting these sensations. 



219 

Activity has two sides; as activity, as projection 
or expression of one's powers, it satisfies self; as 
activity, also, it has some end, some object, for its 
content. The activity as such, therefore, the ac- 
tivity for its own sake, must involve the realization 
of this object for its own sake. But in having, in 
getting, there is no such creation or maintenance of 
an object for itself. Objects cease to be ' ends in 
themselves ' when they cease to be the content of 
action; and are degraded into means of private 
satisfaction, that is, of sensation. 

3. Baseness. For, when we say that bad action 
takes account of ideals only on the basis of posses- 
sion, we say, in effect, that it takes account only of 
sensible satisfaction. As it is in the progressive 
movement of morality that there arises the distinc- 
tion of the law-abiding and the lawless self, of the 
social and the selfish self, so in the same aspect 
there comes into existence the distinction of the 
low, degraded, sensual self, as against the higher or 
spiritual self. In themselves, or naturally, there is 
no desire high, none low. But when an inclination 
for an end which consists in possession comes into 
conflict with one which includes an active satisfac- 
tion one not previously enjoyed the contrast 
arises. It is wrong to say, with Kant, that the bad 
act is simply for pleasure; for the bad act, the 
choice of a past satisfaction as against the aspira- 



220 

tion for a wider good, may have a large content 
it may be the good of one's family; it may be scien- 
tific or aesthetic culture. Yet the moment a man 
begins to livo on the plane of past satisfaction as 
such, he has begun to live on the plane of 'sense', 
or for pleasure. The refusal to recognize the ideal 
good, to acknowledge activity as good, throws the 
agent back into a life of dwelling upon his own 
sensible good, and thus he falls more and more 
into a life of dwelling upon mere sensations. What 
made the past good a good at all was the spirit, the 
activity, in it, and when it is no longer an activity, 
but a mere keeping, the life is gone out of it. The 
selfish life must degenerate into mere sensuality 
although when sensuality is i refined' we call it 
sentimentality. 

4. Demoralization. Morality is activity; exer- 
cise of function. To cease this activity is not to 
remain on the attained level, for that, when attained^ 
was active. It is to relapse, to slip down into bad- 
ness. The moral end is always an activity. To 
fail in this activity is, therefore, to involve character 
in disintegration. It can be kept together only by 
constant organizing activity; only by acting upon 
new wants and moving toward new situations. Let 
this activity cease, and disorganization ensues, as 
surely as the body decays when life goes, instead 
of simply remaining inert as it was. Bad conduct 



221 

iff thus unprincipled; it has no center, no move- 
ment. The good man is ' organic ' ; he uses his 
attainments to discover new needs, and to assimilate 
new material. He lives from within outwards, his 
character is compact, coherent; he has integrity. 
The bad man, having no controlling unity, has no 
consistent line of action; his motives of conduct 
contradict one another; he follows this maxim in 
relation to .this person, that in relation to another; 
character is demoralized. 

The bad man is unstable and double-minded. 
He is not one person, but a group of conflicting 
wills. So far as he is really bad he becomes as 
many persons as he has desires. His conduct can- 
not be made universal. He always makes excep- 
tions in favor of himself. He does not want moral 
relations abolished, but relaxed or deflected in his 
own case, while they still hold for other men. 

This is the truth at the basis of Kant's contention 
regarding goodness as conduct whose maxim is capable 
of generalization. See also Bradley, Op. cit., pp. 261- 
271. And Alexander, Op. cit., pp. 309-312. 

LXVIII. 

Goodness in its 1. Two aspects of this we 

Relation to have already noted; one, that of 

the Struggle, conscientiousness, or habitual 

alertness and responsiveness of intelligence to the 

nature of obligation, both in general and as to the 



222 

specific acts which are obligatory. The other is 
that goodness, in this relation, consists in progressive 
adjustment, involving aspiration as to future con- 
duct, and correlative humility as to present achieve- 
ments of character. 

2. We may state what has already been sug- 
gested, that goodness as self-sacrifice or self-renun- 
ciation has also its place here. The moral attitude 
is one of renunciation, because, on account of the 
constantly growing wants and circumstances, the 
satisfactions which belong to the actually realized 
self must be given up for active goods. That the 
self-sacrifice takes largely the form of the surren- 
der of private interests to the welfare of the whole, 
is explained by what has just been said regarding 
selfishness. Self-sacrifice is not in any way the 
moral end or the last word. Life is lost that it 
may be found. The smaller local life of the pri- 
vate self is given up in order that the richer and 
fuller life of the social or active self may be real- 
ized. But none the less the self-sacrifice at the 
time that it is made is genuine and real. While it 
is involved in the very nature of morality that moral 
conduct shall bring greater activity, larger life, the 
motive of the agent in self-sacrifice is not to give 
up the lesser satisfaction for the sake of getting a 
greater. It is only so far as he is already moral that 
he is convinced that the new duty will bring satis- 



223 

faction, and his conviction is not one of sense, but 
of faith. To the agent at the time of action, it 
is a real satisfaction which is given up for one- 
that is only ideal, and given up because the ideal 
satisfaction is ethical, active one congruent to 
duty, while the actual satisfaction is only patholog- 
ical; that is, congruent to the actualized self to 
the having, instead of the doing self. 

3. Goodness is not remoteness from badness. 
In one sense, goodness is based upon badness; that 
is, good action is always based upon action good 
once, but bad if persisted in under changing cir- 
cumstances. The moral struggle thus presents itself 
as the conflict between this " bad " and the good 
which would duly meet the existing situation. This 
good, of course, does not involve the annihilation 
of the previously attained good the present bad 
but its subordination; its use in the new function. 
This is the explanation of the apparently paradox- 
ical statement that badness is the material of good 
action a statement literally correct when badness 
is understood as it is here. Evil is simply that 
which goodness has to overcome has to make an 
element of itself. 

Badness, as just spoken of, is only potential 
the end is bad as contrasted with the better. Bad- 
ness may also, of course, be actual; the bad end 
may be chosen, and adopted into character. Even 



224 

in this sense, goodness is not the absence of evil, 
or entire freedom from it. Badness even on this 
basis is the material of goodness; it is to be 
put under foot and made an element in good action. 
But how can actual evil be made a factor of right 
conduct? In this way; the good man learns from 
his own bad acts; he does not continue to repeat 
such acts, nor does he, while recognizing their bad- 
ness, simply endeavor to do right without regard to 
the previous bad conduct. Perceiving the effect of 
his own wrong acts, the change produced in his 
own capacities, and his altered relations to other 
people, he acts so as to meet the situation which 
his own bad act has helped to create. Conduct is 
then right, although made what it is, to some 
degree, by previous wrong conduct. 

In this connection, the introduction of Chris- 
tianity made one of its largest ethical contributions. 
It showed how it was possible for a man to put his 
badness behind him and even make it an element 
in goodness. Teaching that the world of social 
relations was itself an ethical reality and a good (a 
redeemed world), it taught that the individual, by 
identifying^ himself with the Bpirit of this ethical 
world, might be freed from slavery to his past 
evil; that by recognizing and taking for his own 
the evil in the world, instead of engaging in an 
isolated struggle to become good by himself, he 



225 

might make the evil a factor in his own right action. 

Moreover, by placing morality in activity and 
not in some thing, or in conformity to an external 
law, Christianity changed the nature of the 
struggle. While the old struggle had been an 
effort to get away from evil to a good beyond, 
Christianity made the struggle itself a good. It, 
then, was no longer the effort to escape to some 
fixed, unchanging state ; the constant onward move- 
ment was itself the goal. Virtue, as Hegel says, is 
the battle, the struggle, carried to its full. 

4. The conception of merit. This is, essentially, 
the idea of social desert the idea that an agent 
deserves well of others on account of his act or his 
character. An action evokes two kinds of judg- 
ments : first, that the act is right or virtuous, that it 
fulfills duty. This judgment may be passed by any 
one ; as well by the agent as by any one else. It is 
simply the recognition of the moral character of 
the act. But a right act may also awaken a convic- 
tion of desert; that the act is one which furthers 
the needs of society, and thus is meritorious. 

This is not a judgment which the agent can pass 
upon his own act. Virtue and duty are strictly 
coextensive; no act can be so virtuous, so right, as 
to go beyond meeting the demands of the situation. 
Everything is a duty which needs to be done in a 

given situation ; the doing of what needs to be done 
15 



226 

is right or virtuous. While the agent may and 
must approve of right action in himself, he cannot 
claim desert or reward because of its virtuousness; 
he simply does what he should. 

Others, however, may see that the act has been 
done in the face of great temptation; after a hard 
struggle; that it denotes some unusual qualifica- 
tion or executes some remarkable service. It is 
not only right, but obligatory, for others to take 
-due notice of these qualities, of these deeds. 
Such notice is as requisite as it is to show grati- 
tude for generosity, or forgiveness to a repentant 
man. 

Two errors are to be avoided here; both arising 
from the identification of merit with virtue. One 
view holds that the virtue and merit consist in 
doing something over and above duty. There is a 
minimum of action which is obligatory; to perform 
this, since it is obligatory, is no virtue. Anything 
above this is virtuous. The other view reverses 
this and holds that since no man can do more than 
he ought, there is no such thing as merit. Great 
excellence or heroism in one man is no more meri- 
toriojis than ordinary conduct in another; since the 
one man is naturally more gifted than the other. 
But while one act is no more right or virtuous 
than another, it may be more meritorious, because 
contributing more to moral welfare or progress. To 



227 

depreciate the meritorious deed is a sign of a carp- 
ing, a grudging or a mean spirit. 

The respective relations of duty, virtue and merit 
have been variously discussed. Different views will be 
found in Sidgwick, Method of Ethics, Bk. Ill, ch. iv; 
Alexander, Moral Order and Progress, pp. 187-195 and 
242-247; Stephen, Science of Ethics, pp. 293-303; Mar- 
tineau, Types of Ethical Theory, pp. 78-81; Laurie, 
Ethica, pp. 145-148. 



CHAPTER III. REALIZED MOEALITY OR 
THE VIRTUES. 



LXIX. 

Goodness We have treated of the forming 
as Found in of moral ideals, and of the attempt 

Character, to realize them against the counter 
attractions of sensible desire. We have now to 
treat these ideas as actual ends of conduct and 
thus reacting upon the agent. The good character, 
considered in relation to the moral struggle, is the 
one which chooses the right end, which endeavors 
to be better. The good character in itself is that 
made by this choice. It is good for the self to 
choose a due end in an effort caused by contrary 
allurements. But the very fact of the struggle 
witnesses that morality is not yet the natural and 
spontaneous manifestation of character. A wholly 



228 

good man would feel such satisfaction in the con- 
templation of the ideal good that contrary desires 
would not affect him. He would take pleasure 
only in the right. Every accomplished moral deed 
tends to bring this about. Moral realization brings 
satisfaction. The satisfaction becomes one with 
the right act. Duty and desire grow into harmony. 
Interest and virtue tend toward unity. 

This is the truth aimed at, but not attained, by 
the hedonistic school. In complete moral action, 
happiness and Tightness know no divorce. And 
this is true, even though the act, in some of its 
aspects, involves pain. The act, so far as its qual- 
ity of Tightness is concerned, calls forth unalloyed 
satisfaction, however bound up with pain to self 
and to others in some respects. The error of 
hedonism is not in insisting that right action is 
pleasurable, but in its failure to supply content to 
the idea of happiness, in its failure to define what 
happiness is. In the failure to show those active 
relations of man to nature and to man involved in 
human satisfaction, it reduces happiness to the 
abstraction of agreeable sensation. 

_A. virtue then, in the full sense, that is as the 
expression of virtuous character, and not of the 
struggle of character to be virtuous against the 
allurements of passive goods, is an interest. The 
system of virtues includes the various forms which 



229 



interest assumes. Truthfulness, for example, is 
interest in the media of human exchange; gener- 
osity is interest in sharing any form of superior 
endowment with others less rich by nature or 
training, etc. It is distinguished from natural 
generosity, which may be mere impulse, by its 
being an interest in the activity or social relation 
itself, instead of in some accidental accompaniment 
of the relation. 

Another way of getting at the nature of the 
virtues is to consider them as forms of freedom. 
Positive freedom is the good, it is realized activity, 
the full and unhindered performance of function. 
A virtue is any one aspect which the free perform- 
ance of function may take. Meekness is one form 
of the adjustment of capacity to surroundings; 
honesty another; indignation another; scientific 
excellence another, and so on. In each of these 
virtues, the agent realizes his freedom: Freedom 
from subjection to caprice and blind appetite, 
freedom in the full play of activity. 

LXX. 

Two Kinds of We may recognize two types of 
Virtues. virtuous action. These are: 
1. The Special Virtues. These arise from 
special capacities or special opportunities. The 
Greek sense of virtue was almost that of " excel- 
lence ", some special fitness or power of an agent. 



230 

There is the virtue of a painter, of a scientific 
investigator, of a philanthropist, of a comedian, of 
a statesman, and so on. The special act may be 
manifested in view of some special occasion, some 
special demand of the environment charity, 
thankfulness, patriotism, chastity, etc. Goodness, 
as the realization of the moral end, is a system, 
and the special virtues are the particular members 
of the system. 

2. Cardinal Virtues. Besides these special 
members of a system, however, the whole system 
itself may present various aspects. That is to say, 
even in a special act the whole spirit of the man 
may be called out, and this expression of the whole 
character is a cardinal virtue. While the special 
virtues differ in content, as humility from bravery, 
earnestness from compassion, the cardinal virtues 
have the same content, showing only different sides 
of it. Conscientiousness, for example, is a cardi- 
nal virtue. It does not have to do with an act 
belonging to some particular capacity, or evoked 
by some special circumstance, but with the spirit of 
the whole self as manifested in the will to recog- 
nize duty both its obligatoriness in general and 
the concrete forms which it takes. Truthfulness 
as a special virtue would be the desire to make 
word correspond to fact in some instance of speech. 
As a cardinal virtue, it is the constant will to clarify 



231 

and render true to their ideal all human relations 
those of man to man, and man to nature. 

LXX1. 
The Cardinal The cardinal virtues are 

Virtues. marked by 

1. Wholeness. This or that virtue, not calling 
the whole character into play, but only some special 
power, is partial. But a cardinal virtue is not a 
virtue, but the spirit in which all acts are per- 
formed. It lies in the attitude which the agent 
takes towards duty; his obedience to recognized 
forms, his readiness to respond to new duties, his 
enthusiasm in moving forward to new relations. 
It is a common remark that moral codes change 
from ' Do not ' to * Do ', and from this to ' Be '. A 
Mosaic code may attempt to regulate the specific 
acts of life. Christianity says, 'Be ye perfect'. 
The effort to exhaust the various special right acts 
is futile. They are not the same 'for any two men, 
and they change constantly with the same man. 
The very words which denote virtues come less and 
less to mean specific acts, and more the spirit in 
which conduct occurs. Purity, for example, does not 
mean freedom from certain limited outward forms of 
defilement; but comes to signify Tightness of na- 
tures as a whole, their freedom from all self-seeking 
or exclusive desire for private pleasure, etc. Thus 
purity of heart comes to mean perfect goodness. 



232 

2. Disinterestedness. Any act, to be virtuous, 
must of course be disinterested, but we may now 
connect this disinterestedness with the integral 
nature of moral action just spoken of. Immoral 
action never takes account of the whole nature of 
an end; it deflects the end to some ulterior purpose; 
it bends it to the private satisfaction of the agent; 
it takes a part of it by making exceptions in favor 
of self. Bad action is never ' objective '. It is ' ab- 
stract ' ; it takes into account only such portion of 
the act as satisfies some existing need of the 
private self. The immoral man shows his par- 
tial character again by being full of casuistries, 
devices by which he can get the act removed 
from its natural placing and considered in some 
other light: this act, for example, would be dis- 
honest, of course, if done under certain circum- 
stances, but since I have certain praiseworthy feel- 
ings, certain remote intentions, it may now be con- 
sidered otherwise. It is a large part of the badness 
of ' good ' people that instead of taking the whole 
act just as it is, they endeavor to make the natural 
feelings in their own mind feelings of charity, or 
benevolence do substitute duty for the end aimed 
at; they excuse wrong acts on the ground that 
their 'intentions' were good, meaning by intentions 
the prevailing mood of their mind. It is in this 
sense that ' hell is paved with good intentions. ' 



233 

Now it is against this deflection, perversion 
and mutilating of the act that disinterestedness 
takes its stand. Disinterested does not mean with- 
out interest, but without interest in anything 
except the act itself. The interest is not in the 
wonderful moods or sentiments with which we do 
the act; it is not in some ulterior end to be gained 
by it, or in some private advantage which it will 
bring, but in the act itself in the real and con- 
crete relations involved. There is a vague French 
saying that 'morality is the nature of things.' 
If this phrase has a meaning it is that moral con- 
duct is not a manifestation of private feelings nor a 
search for some unattainable ideal, but observance 
and reproduction of actual relations. And this is 
the mark of a disinterested character. 



CONCLUSION. 



LXXIl. 

The Practical End Virtues, then, are cardinal, 
of Morality. and character is integral, 
just in the degree in which every want is a want 
of the whole man. So far as this occurs, the bur- 
den of the moral struggle is transformed into 
freedom of movement. There is no longer effort 
to bring the particular desire into conformity with 



234 

a law, or a universal, outside itself. The fitting 
in of each special desire, as it arises, to the organ- 
ism of character takes place without friction, as a 
natural re -adjustment. There is not constraint, 
but growth. On the other side, the attained char- 
acter does not tend to petrify into a fixed posses- 
sion which resists the response to needs that grow 
out of the enlarged environment. It is plastic to 
new wants and demands; it does not require to be 
wrenched and wracked into agreement with the 
required act, but moves into it, of itself. The 
law is not an external ideal, but the principle of 
the movement. There is the identity of freedom 
and law in the good. 

This union of inclination and duty in act is the 
practical end. All the world's great reformers 
have set as their goal this ideal, which may be 
termed either the freeing of wants, or the human- 
izing of the moral law. It will help summarize 
our whole discussion, if we see how the theories of 
hedonism and of Kant have endeavored to express 
this same goal. Hedonism, indeed, has this 
identity for its fundamental principle. It holds 
strongly to the idea of moral law immanent in 
human wants themselves. But its error lies in 
taking this identity of desire and the good, as a 
direct or immediate unity, while, in reality, it exists 
only in and through activity; it is a unity which 



235 

can be attained only as the result of a process. It 
mistakes an ideal which is realized only in action 
for bare fact which exists of itself. 

Hedonism, as represented by Spencer, recog- 
nizes, it is true, that the unity of desire and duty is 
not an immediate or natural one; but only to fall 
into the error of holding that the separation is due 
to some external causes, and that when these are 
removed we shall have a fixed millenium. As 
against this doctrine, we must recognize that the 
difference between want and duty is always re- 
moved so far as conduct is moral; that it is not an 
ideal in the sense of something to be attained at 
some remote period, but an ideal in the sense of 
being the very meaning of moral activity whenever 
and wherever it occurs. The realizing of this ideal 
is not something to be sometime reached once for 
all, but progress is itself the ideal. Wants are 
ever growing larger, and thus freedom ever comes 
to have a wider scope (Sec. LXV). 

Kant recognizes that the identity of duty and 
inclination is not a natural fact, but is the ideal. 
However, he understands by ideal something 
which ought to be, but is not. Morality is ever a 
struggle to get desire into unity with law, but a 
struggle doomed, by its very conditions, not to 
succeed. The law is the straight line of duty, 
which the asymptotic curve of desire may approxi- 



236 

mate, but never touch. An earthly taint of pleas- 
ure-seeking always clings to our wants, and makes 
of morality a striving which defeats itself. 

The theory that morality lies in the realization 
of individuality recognizes that there is no direct, 
or natural, identity of desire and law, but also 
recognizes that their identification is not an impos- 
sible task. The problem is solved in the exercise 
of function, where the desires, however, are not 
unclothed, but clothed upon. Flowing in the 
channel of response to the demands of the moral 
environment, they unite, at once, social service and 
individual freedom. 

LXXII1. 

The Means This practical end of the 

of unification of desire and duty, 

Moralization. in the play of moral interests, is 
reached, therefore, so far as the desires are social- 
ized. A want is socialized when it is not a want 
for its own isolated and fixed satisfaction, but re- 
flects the needs of the environment. This implies, 
of course, that it is bound by countless ties to the 
whole body of desires and capacities. The eye, in 
seeing for itself, sees for the whole body, because it 
is not isolated but, through its connections, an organ 
of a system. In this same way, the satisfaction of 
a want for food, or for commercial activity, may 
necessitate a satisfaction of the whole social system. 



237 

But how shall this socialization of wants be 
secured? It is in answering this question that we 
are brought again to a point already discussed at 
length: the moral bearings of intelligence. It is 
intelligence that is the sole sure means of taking a 
want out of the isolation of merely impulsive 
action. It is the passing of the desire through the 
alembic of ideas that, in rationalizing and spiritual- 
izing it, makes it an expression of the want of the 
whole man, and thus of social needs. 

To know one's self was declared by Socrates, 
who first brought to conscious birth the spirit of 
the moral life, to be the very core of moral en- 
deavor. This knowledge of self has taken, indeed, 
a more circuitous and a more painful path, than 
Socrates anticipated. Man has had, during two 
thousand years of science, to go around through 
nature to iiud himself, and as yet he has not wholly 
come back to himself- -he oftentimes seems still 
lost in the wilderness of an outer world. But 
when man does get back to himself it will be as 
a victor laden with the spoils of subdued nature. 
HaviDg secured, in theory and invention, his unity 
with nature, his knowledge of himself will rest on 
a wide and certain basis. 

This is the final justification of the moral value 
of science and art. It is because through them 
wants are inter- connected, unified and socialized. 



238 

that they are, when all is said and done, the pre- 
eminent moral means. And if we do not readily 
recognize them in this garb, it is because we have 
made of them such fixed things, that is, such 
abstractions, by placing them outside the movement 
of human life. 



INDEX. 



ABSOLUTE and relative Ethics, according to Spencer 

72. 

Accountability See responsibility. 
Activity human, the subject-matter of ethics 1 ff. 
the object of desire 21 ff. 
the standard of pleasure 45, 50. 
equals exercise of function 101. 
opposed to mere possession 209; 215; 218; 220. 
two sides of 219. 
see freedom. 
^Esthetic feelings may be moral 199. 

see art. 
Agent moral, one capable of acting from ideas 3. 

see person. 

Alexander, S. quoted; on idea of sum of pleas- 
ures 46. 
referred to: 9; 46; 77; 111; 134; 158; 

165; 202; 216; 221; 227. 
Altruism how identified with egoism 59. 

reconciled, by Spencer, with egoism 70 ff . 
conflicts, at present, with egoism 76. 
older moralists termed benevolence 195. 
not necessarily moral 107. 
not disguised selfishness 109. 
may equal charity 125. 
Amusements moral nature of 133. 
Approbation nature of 161. 



240 

Aristotle quoted: on pleasure 18; on pleasure and 

and character 29; on the mean 136. 
referred to: 31. 
Art (and Science) nature of interest in 111. 

distinction of fine and useful 112. 
interest in, why moral 113 ff. 
interest in, really social 118 ff. 
life an, 120. 
- essentially dynamic 120. 
Asceticism means formalism 94. 

element of truth in 95. 
results when interest is excluded 106. 
Aspiration involved in morality 213; 222. 
Autonomy Kant's conception of justified 149. 
BADNESS of environment a factor in right action 

176; 224. 

its source and factors 214. 
its relation to goodness 223. 
potential and actual 223. 
of good people 232. 

Bain, A. quoted: that pleasure is a self-evident cri- 
terion 16; his definition of utilitarianism 53; 
on obligation 140; 141. 
referred to: 17; 66; 227. 

Barratt quoted : that all pleasure is individual 14. 
Baseness why badness becomes 219. 
Benevolence see altruism. 

Bentham, J. quoted: pleasure both criterion and 
motive 15; self-evident criterion 16; all 
motives good 34 ff.; hedonistic calculus 
36 ff ; identity of individual and general 
pleasure 57 ff.; influence of law 59. 
referred to: 53. 



241 

Birks referred to: 66. 
Blackie, J. S. referred to: 66. 

Bradley, F. H. quoted: on pleasure and desire 21; 
scientific interest not necessarily 
social 122; on merely individual con- 
science 189. 
referred to: 25; 26; 42; 48; 54; 91; 

124; 134; 165; 221. 
Browning, R. referred to: 111. 
Butler Bishop, quoted: on conscience 167. 

referred to: 110. 
CAIRD, E. quoted: on collision of moral ends 88. 

referred to: 21: 82; 87; 91; 92; 93; 95; 

109; 111; 149; 165. 
Calder wood referred to: 158; 166. 
Capacity its relation to environment 97. 
increased by moral action 206. 
Carlyle, T. referred to: 128. 
Casuistry inevitable, if moral end is not wholly 

social 119. 
Character reciprocal with conduct 9. 

the source of motive, desire and moral 

pleasure 26 ff. 

separated from conduct by hedonists 32 ff. 
and virtues 227 ff. 
see capacity, conduct, interests and 

motive. 

Charity idea of, involves social inequality 125. 
Christianity ethical influence of 224. 

has no specific ethical code 231. 
Coit, S. referred to: 28; 66. 

Commands moral value of: 203. 
16 



242 

Common Good an ethical ideal 51. 

not furnished by hedonism 60. 

not furnished by Kant 91. 

why necessarily involved in morality 

117; 217; 222. 
demands reciprocal satisfaction of 

individual and society 127. 
its existence postulated by moral 

conduct 130. 

results from exercise of function 168. 
constituted by activity 169 ff. 
realized in institutions 173. 
development of 210. 
see institutions and society. 
Comprehensiveness growth of, in moral end 210 ff. 
Conduct defined 3. 

relation to consequences 7. 

relation to character 9. 

an individual system 133. 

a social system 136. 

how related to character 163. 

see activity, consequences, character and 

motive. 
Conflict of moral ends 88 ff. 

morality has an aspect of 151; 227. 
Conscience Bain's idea of 141. 

equals consciousness of action 181. 
elements in 182. 
not a special faculty 183, 
kinds of 183 ff. 
not merely individual 188. 
Conscientiousness nature of 199. 

does not equal introspection 200. 



243 

Conscientiousness nor application of code 201. 

a cardinal virtue 232. 
Consequences moral value of 7 ft; 84; 114; 160. 

excluded from morality by Kantian- 
ism 13; 29. 

identified with moral value by hedon- 
ism 33. 

responsibility for 160. 
Criterion hedonistic is pleasure 15. 

criticism of hedonistic 31 ff. 
two ends to be met by every 32. 
of higher and lower pleasures 49 ff. 
when pleasure may be a 50. 
Mill's really social 63. 
Spencer's really social 73. 
Kant's nominally formal 79 ff. 
the real 132 ff. 
its elasticity 135. 
DARWIN, C. referred to: 78. 
Demoralization involved in badness 220. 
Desire pleasure as end of 16; 18 ff. 
denned 19. 
how spiritualized 23. 
not purely pleasurable 27. 
an expression of character 28. 
excluded from moral motive by Kant 79* 
all or no involved in morality 94. 
relation to pleasure 83. 
particular, an abstraction 96. 
how distinguished from interest 103. 
opposed to reason by Kant 147. 
when opposed to moral action 148; 155; 213;, 
216. 



244 

Desire how socialized, 237. 
Dewey, J. referred to: 25; 78; 194. 
Disinterestedness equals full interest 107. 

an aspect of cardinal virtue 232. 
Disposition Bentham on 35. 
Dualism the Kantian 148 ff. 
Duty see obligation. 
EGOISM see altruism. 

End moral: see common good; function; motive. 
Environment defined by relation to capacity 99 ff. 
meaning of adjustment to 115 ff. 
moral, exists in institutions 171. 
badness of, an element in right action 

176; 190. 

enlarged by moral action 207. 

Empiricism Spencer's reconciliation with intuition- 
alism 69 ff. 
Ethics denned 1. 
divided 3. 

its object according to Spencer 68. 
see theory. 
Ethical World discussed 167 ff. 

nature illustrated 168. 
relation to moral law 174. 
see Institutions. 

Evolution, Theory of combined with hedonism 67 ff. 
not really hedonistic 71 ff. 
its real standard objective 72. 
FAITH a factor in moral progress 123; 127 ff. 
in humanity, meaning of 129. 
why demanded in moral action 217; 222. 
Feelings natural and moral 5 ff.; 25 ff.; 87. 

sympathetic relied upon by utilitarians 57. 



245 

Feelings necessary in moral activity 85. 
active, equal interests 102. 
moral, defined by end IDS; see also motive, 
value of 195 ff. 

moral, not too narrowly limited 199. 
Freedom is object of desire 24. 

equals exercise of function 138. 
various aspects of 158. 
of choice detined 159. 
of indifference discussed 161 ff. 
actualized in rights 172; 174. 
positive, realized in virtues 229. 
Function union of capacity and circumstance in 

act 103. 

freedom found in exercise of 104 ff. 
GIZYCKI referred to: 66. 

God an external, cannot be the source of obliga- 
tion 149. 

Goethe referred to: 128. 
Golden Rule identified by Mill with principle of 

utilitarianism 59 

gives no directions as to conduct 204. 
is a concrete statement of ethical post- 
ulate 205. 

Green, T. H. quoted: on desire and pleasure 21; on 
sum of pleasures 43; on nature of hap- 
piness 45; on conscientiousness 200, 
202; on goodness 215. 
referred to: 9; 25; 42; 54; 110; 158; 165. 
Grote, J. referred to: 66; 158. 
Guyau referred to: 66; 143. 
HEDONISM denned 14 ff. 

its paradox 25. 



246 

Hedonism confuses feeling and idea 26; 43 ff. 
summarized 30. 
all motives good 33. 
its calculus 36. 
fails to provide laws 39 ff. 
its contrast with Kantianism 82 ff. 
its treatment of obligation 140 ff. 
is correct in holding Tightness to be 

pleasurable 228. 
truth and falsity in 234. 
Hegel quoted: on reflective conscience 188; on 

merely individual conscience 189. 
Hinton, J. quoted: on altruism 109; on badness 216. 

referred to: 202. 
Hodgson, S. H. referred to: 14. 
IDEALISM when feeble 128. 
Ideals moral, progressive, 206. 
Imperative, Categorical of Kant 147. 

of conscience 191. 
Impulse and pleasure 17. 
and desire 22. 
nature of action from 159. 
see desire. 
Individuality defined 97. 

not identical with inner side alone 98. 
evils of defining from this standpoint 

110. 

made by function 131. 
realized is autonomy 150. 
realized is freedom 164. 
-growth in 210. 
see freedom and rights. 
Institutions nature of 169 ff. 



247 

Institutionssovereignty, rights and law inhere in 

171 ff. 

influence of, upon conscience 181; 189. 
movement of, the source of duties, 194. 
see common good and society. 
Interests are functions on personal side 102 ff. 
classified and discussed 104 it. 
social, involve science and art 123 ff. 
realized in institutions 170. 
their relation to conscience 198. 
pure, are virtue 228. 
the active element of 218. 
the freeing of. the moral goal 2153. 
JAMES, SR., II. --referred to: 202. 
James, Wm. quoted: on pleasure and desire 20. 

referred to: 77. 

KANT agrees with hedonism as to end of desire 79. 
his end an abstraction 8-1. 
his practical ideal that of Mill arid Spencer 93. 
value of his theory 93. 
his theory of obligation 147. 
his conception of autonomy 1 49. 
his idea of duty 150. 
his conception of practical reason 191. 
quoted: on pleasure 47; on pleasure as common 
good 52; on priority of duty to good 78; on 
good will 79; his formula for right action 80; 
illustrations of moral law 80 ff. 
referred to: 14; 78; 212; 221; 235. 
Kantianism compared with hedonism 82 fT. 

its practical breakdown 90. 
Knowledge-- moral effect of advance in 207. 
socializes wants 237. 



248 

Knowledge see art. 

LAURIE, S. S. quoted: on happiness 66. 

referred to: 227. 
LAW utilitarian use of 58; 61 ff. 
Kant's moral, formal 78. 
relation to desire 94. 
realized in institutions 172; 174. 

of the * is ', not merely of the 'ought' 175. 
idea of, in general 195. 
see obligation. 

Lawlessness involved in morality 216. 
Leckey referred to 06. 

Limitation the basis of moral strength 128. 
Lincoln, A. anecdote regarding 28. 
Lotze referred to: 16; 166. 
Love the union of duty and desire 154. 
MARTINEAU, J. quoted: on the difficulty of the hed- 
onistic calculus. 

refer red to: 42; 78; 158; 166; 227. 
Maurice, F. D. referred to: 191. 
Merit means social desert 225. 
Mill, J. S. criticizes Kant 91. 

his equivoke of pleasure and pleasant 

thing 20. 
his fallacy 56. 

introduces quality of pleasure into hedon- 
ism 42; 46. 

quoted: pleasure self-evident criterion 16; 
end of desire 17; on rules of morality 39 ff; 
on moral tribunal 48; on utilitarian stand- 
ard 53; on importance of law and education 
59; on social feeling 63 ff. 
referred to: 25; 30; 49. 



249 

Moralitysphere of as broad as conduct 2; 154. 

not dependent upon an individual's wish. 

167 ff. 

realized in institutions 170. 
struggle for private, bad 202. 
in the nature of things 233. 
Motive defined 5. 

two elements in 10. 
determined by character 28. 
never bad according to hedonism 33. 
formal and legislative according to Kant 80. 
not a subjective mood 232. 
NORMS in philosophy 1. 
OBLIGATION in conflict with pleasure 76 f. 
how related to function 138. 
theories regarding 139. 
distinct from coercion 144. 
enforced, not created by power 145. 
Kantian idea of criticized 148. 
does not relate simply to what ought to 

be, but is not 151; 174 ff. 
relation to conscience 183. 
how made known 100 ff. 
practical value of sense of 196. 
must be individualized 197; 201. 
when opposed to desire 213; 216. 
the union with desire the moral ideal 234. 
see desire, law and universal. 
PATER referred to: 66. 
Pathological all inclination, according to Kant 86. 

opposed to active 212. 
Paulsen referred to: 67; 111. 
Person is one capable of conduct 97. 



250 

Pleasure an element in activity 24. 

not the moving spring to action 26. 

sum of, dependent on objective conditions 
44 ff. 

quality of, similarly dependent 47 ff. 

may symbolize action 51. 

general, a vague idea 62. 

fixed by social relations 65; 77. 

not a sufficient guide at present 75. 

dependent on self-realization 83. 

all right action involves 228. 

see desire and hedonism. 
Postulate moral, defined 129 IT. 

equals Golden Rule 205. 
Problem moral 3. 
Progress necessary in moral action 135 ff. 

moral, nature of 209. 
Prudence not outside moral sphere 105. 
REASON opposed to desire by Kant 147. 

Kant's conception too immediate 150. 
practical, idea of 191. 
Reformation possibility of 162 ff. 
Relativity of morals, means what 136. 
Responsibility nature of 160 ff . 

of parents and children 2 03. 
Reverence Kant regards as sole moral feeling 86. 
Rights exist by common will 172. 
RousSeau his influence upon Kant 148. 
Royce, J. referred to: 61; 111. 
Rule moral, not a command 204. 

a tool of analysis 204. 
SATISFACTION moral, creates new wants 208. 
good and bad 217. 



251 

Science nature of interest in 111. 

the preeminent moral means 237. 
see art. 

Schurman, J. G. referred to: 78. 
Self interest in 105 ff. 

involves sympathy 109. 
dualism in self, how arises 216. 
knowledge of 237. 
Selfishness involved in immorality 216. 
Self-sacrifice its moral nature 222. 
Sentimentality immoral 113. 

escape from, only through knowl- 
edge 120. 
results from abstract idea of duty 

157. 

refined, equals sensuality 220. 
Shakespeare quoted: on common good 131. 
Sidgwick, H. quoted: on the hedonistic assumption 
43; on utilitarian standard 53; on in- 
tuitional utilitarianism 54. 
referred to: 14; 16; 18; 66; 111; 227. 
its moral influence 146; 157. 
its relation to obligation 152. 
constituted by moral relationships 175. 
development of, changes moral ideals 207. 
see common good, institutions. 
Socrates author of idea of reflective conscience 

188. 

initiator of modern ethical spirit 237. 
Sorley referred to: 78; 111. 
Sovereignty exists in common will and good 171. 
ultimate possessed in humanity 173. 
Spencer, H. believes in fixed social ideal 73 ff.; 235. 



252 

Spencer, H. quoted: on pleasure as a necessary 
effect 68; not immediate object of desire 
69; egoism and altruism 70 ff.; on ideal 
man 73; equilibrium of functions 74; on 
obligation 142; 143. 

referred to: 16; 67; 72; 73; 74; 75; 76; 

111; 125; 235. 

Stephen, L. quoted: on feeling as universal motive 
27; on sympathy 109 ff. 
referred to: 16; 25; 67; 68; 78; 111; 165; 
227. 
Struggle when morality is a 212. 

changed by Christianity into movement 225. 
see conflict. 
Sully, J. referred to: 17. 
THEORY ethical and conduct 1. 
ethical, sub-divided 13. 
ethical, not cauistry 89. 
value of 186. 

UNIVERSAL a, lacking in hedonism 37. 
Kant's emphasis of 80. 
Kant's, formal 80; 85; 90. 
Kant's, leads to conflict 87. 
true, equals organization, 88; 90; 96. 
bad action cannot be 221. 
means a method, not a thing 136. 
found in movement of character 234. 
see law. 

UTILITARIANISM is universalistic hedonism 13; 53. 
defined by Mill, Sidgwick, Bain, 53, 
criticized 54 ff. 
assumes social order 63 ff. 
combined with evolution 67. 



253 

VIRTUE change in nature of 21 1. 

correlative to duty 225. 

distinguished from merit 226. 

is an interest of character 228. 

two types of 229. 

cardinal 230. 
WANTS see desires. 
Wilson (and Fowler) referred to: 67. 
Will Kant's good will 79. 



